fr: Pointure EU: 15; 15 extra large; 15 moyen; 15 étroit; 15 standard; 15 large; 15,5; 15,5 extra large; 15,5 moyen; 15,5 étroit; 15,5 standard; 15,5 large; 16; 16 extra large; 16 moyen; 16 étroit; 16 standard; 16 large; 16,5; 16,5 extra large; 16,5 moyen; 16,5 étroit; 16,5 standard; 16,5 large; 17; 17 extra large; 17 moyen; 17 étroit; 17 standard; 17 large; 17,5; 17,5 extra large; 17,5 moyen; 17,5 étroit; 17,5 standard; 17,5 large; 18; 18 extra large; 18 moyen; 18 étroit; 18 standard; 18 large; 18,5; 18,5 extra large; 18,5 moyen; 18,5 étroit; 18,5 standard; 18,5 large; 19; 19 extra large; 19 moyen; 19 étroit; 19 standard; 19 large; 19,5; 19,5 extra large; 19,5 moyen; 19,5 étroit; 19,5 standard; 19,5 large; 20; 20 extra large; 20 moyen; 20 étroit; 20 standard; 20 large; 20,5; 20,5 extra large; 20,5 moyen; 20,5 étroit; 20,5 standard; 20,5 large; 21; 21 Très large; 21 Moyen; 21 Étroit; 21 Standard; 21 Large; 21,5; 21,5 extra large; 21,5 moyen; 21,5 étroit; 21,5 standard; 21,5 large; 22; 22 Très large; 22 Moyen; 22 Étroit; 22 Standard; 22 Large; 22,5; 22,5 Très large; 22,5 Moyen; 22,5 Étroit; 22,5 Standard; 22,5 Large; 23; 23 Très large; 23 Moyen; 23 Étroit; 23 Standard; 23 Large; 23,5; 23,5 Très large; 23,5 Moyen; 23,5 Étroit; 23,5 Standard; 23,5 Large; 24; 24 Très large; 24 Moyen; 24 Étroit; 24 Standard; 24 Large; 24,5; 24,5 Très large; 24,5 Moyen; 24,5 Étroit; 24,5 Standard; 24,5 Large; 25; 25 Très large; 25 Moyen; 25 Étroit; 25 Standard; 25 Large; 25,5; 25,5 Très large; 25,5 Moyen; 25,5 Étroit; 25,5 Standard; 25,5 Large; 26; 26 Très large; 26 Moyen; 26 Étroit; 26 Standard; 26 Large; 26,5; 26,5 Très large; 26,5 Moyen; 26,5 Étroit; 26,5 Standard; 26,5 Large; 27; 27 Très large; 27 Moyen; 27 Étroit; 27 Standard; 27 Large; 27,5; 27,5 Très large; 27,5 Moyen; 27,5 Étroit; 27,5 Standard; 27,5 Large; 28; 28 Très large; 28 Moyen; 28 Étroit; 28 Standard; 28 Large; 28,5; 28,5 Très large; 28,5 Moyen; 28,5 Étroit; 28,5 Standard; 28,5 Large; 29; 29 Très large; 29 Moyen; 29 Étroit; 29 Standard; 29 Large; 29,5; 29,5 Très large; 29,5 Moyen; 29,5 Étroit; 29,5 Standard; 29,5 Large; 30; 30 Très large; 30 Moyen; 30 Étroit; 30 Standard; 30 Large; 30,5; 30,5 Très large; 30,5 Moyen; 30,5 Étroit; 30,5 Standard; 30,5 Large; 31; 31 Très large; 31 Moyen; 31 Étroit; 31 Standard; 31 Large; 31,5; 31,5 Très large; 31,5 Moyen; 31,5 Étroit; 31,5 Standard; 31,5 Large; 32; 32 Très large; 32 Moyen; 32 Étroit; 32 Standard; 32 Large; 32,5; 32,5 Très large; 32,5 Moyen; 32,5 Étroit; 32,5 Standard; 32,5 Large; 33; 33 Très large; 33 Moyen; 33 Étroit; 33 Standard; 33 Large; 33,5; 33,5 Très large; 33,5 Moyen; 33,5 Étroit; 33,5 Standard; 33,5 Large; 34; 34 Très large; 34 Moyen; 34 Étroit; 34 Standard; 34 Large; 34,5; 34,5 Très large; 34,5 Moyen; 34,5 Étroit; 34,5 Standard; 34,5 Large; 35; 35 Très large; 35 Moyen; 35 Étroit; 35 Standard; 35 Large; 35,5; 35,5 Très large; 35,5 Moyen; 35,5 Étroit; 35,5 Standard; 35,5 Large; 36; 36 Très large; 36 Moyen; 36 Étroit; 36 Standard; 36 Large; 36,5; 36,5 Très large; 36,5 Moyen; 36,5 Étroit; 36,5 Standard; 36,5 Large; 37; 37 Très large; 37 Moyen; 37 Étroit; 37 Standard; 37 Large; 37,5; 37,5 Très large; 37,5 Moyen; 37,5 Étroit; 37,5 Standard; 37,5 Large; 38; 38 Très large; 38 Moyen; 38 Étroit; 38 Standard; 38 Large; 38,5; 38,5 Très large; 38,5 Moyen; 38,5 Étroit; 38,5 Standard; 38,5 Large; 39; 39 Très large; 39 Moyen; 39 Étroit; 39 Standard; 39 Large; 39,5; 39,5 Très large; 39,5 Moyen; 39,5 Étroit; 39,5 Standard; 39,5 Large; 40; 40 Très large; 40 Moyen; 40 Étroit; 40 Standard; 40 Large; 40,5; 40,5 Très large; 40,5 Moyen; 40,5 Étroit; 40,5 Standard; 40,5 Large; 41; 41 Très large; 41 Moyen; 41 Étroit; 41 Standard; 41 Large; 41,5; 41,5 Très large; 41,5 Moyen; 41,5 Étroit; 41,5 Standard; 41,5 Large; 42; 42 Très large; 42 Moyen; 42 Étroit; 42 Standard; 42 Large; 42,5; 42,5 Très large; 42,5 Moyen; 42,5 Étroit; 42,5 Standard; 42,5 Large; 43; 43 Très large; 43 Moyen; 43 Étroit; 43 Standard; 43 Large; 43,5; 43,5 Très large; 43,5 Moyen; 43,5 Étroit; 43,5 Standard; 43,5 Large; 44; 44 Très large; 44 Moyen; 44 Étroit; 44 Standard; 44 Large; 44,5; 44,5 Très large; 44,5 Moyen; 44,5 Étroit; 44,5 Standard; 44,5 Large; 45; 45 Très large; 45 Moyen; 45 Étroit; 45 Standard; 45 Large; 45,5; 45,5 Très large; 45,5 Moyen; 45,5 Étroit; 45,5 Standard; 45,5 Large; 46; 46 Très large; 46 Moyen; 46 Étroit; 46 Standard; 46 Large; 46,5; 46,5 Très large; 46,5 Moyen; 46,5 Étroit; 46,5 Standard; 46,5 Large; 47; 47 Très large; 47 Moyen; 47 Étroit; 47 Standard; 47 Large; 47,5; 47,5 Très large; 47,5 Moyen; 47,5 Étroit; 47,5 Standard; 47,5 Large; 48; 48 Très large; 48 Moyen; 48 Étroit; 48 Standard; 48 Large; 48,5; 48,5 Très large; 48,5 Moyen; 48,5 Étroit; 48,5 Standard; 48,5 Large; 49; 49 Très large; 49 Moyen; 49 Étroit; 49 Standard; 49 Large; 49,5; 49,5 Très large; 49,5 Moyen; 49,5 Étroit; 49,5 Standard; 49,5 Large; 50; 50 Très large; 50 Moyen; 50 Étroit; 50 Standard; 50 Large; 50,5; 50,5 Très large; 50,5 Moyen; 50,5 Étroit; 50,5 Standard; 50,5 Large; 51; 51 Très large; 51 Moyen; 51 Étroit; 51 Standard; 51 Large; 51,5; 51,5 Très large; 51,5 Moyen; 51,5 Étroit; 51,5 Standard; 51,5 Large; 52; 52 Très large; 52 Moyen; 52 Étroit; 52 Standard; 52 Large; Autre
th: ขนาดของรองเท้าในสหภาพยุโรป: 15; 15 กว้างพิเศษ; 15 ปานกลาง; 15 แคบ; 15 มาตรฐาน; 15 กว้าง; 15.5; 15.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 15.5 ปานกลาง; 15.5 แคบ; 15.5 มาตรฐาน; 15.5 กว้าง; 16; 16 กว้างพิเศษ; 16 ปานกลาง; 16 แคบ; 16 มาตรฐาน; 16 กว้าง; 16.5; 16.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 16.5 ปานกลาง; 16.5 แคบ; 16.5 มาตรฐาน; 16.5 กว้าง; 17; 17 กว้างพิเศษ; 17 ปานกลาง; 17 แคบ; 17 มาตรฐาน; 17 กว้าง; 17.5; 17.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 17.5 ปานกลาง; 17.5 แคบ; 17.5 มาตรฐาน; 17.5 กว้าง; 18; 18 กว้างพิเศษ; 18 ปานกลาง; 18 แคบ; 18 มาตรฐาน; 18 กว้าง; 18.5; 18.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 18.5 ปานกลาง; 18.5 แคบ; 18.5 มาตรฐาน; 18.5 กว้าง; 19; 19 กว้างพิเศษ; 19 ปานกลาง; 19 แคบ; 19 มาตรฐาน; 19 กว้าง; 19.5; 19.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 19.5 ปานกลาง; 19.5 แคบ; 19.5 มาตรฐาน; 19.5 กว้าง; 20; 20 กว้างพิเศษ; 20 ปานกลาง; 20 แคบ; 20 มาตรฐาน; 20 กว้าง; 20.5; 20.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 20.5 ปานกลาง; 20.5 แคบ; 20.5 มาตรฐาน; 20.5 กว้าง; 21; 21 กว้างพิเศษ; 21 ปานกลาง; 21 แคบ; 21 มาตรฐาน; 21 กว้าง; 21.5; 21.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 21.5 ปานกลาง; 21.5 แคบ; 21.5 มาตรฐาน; 21.5 กว้าง; 22; 22 กว้างพิเศษ; 22 ปานกลาง; 22 แคบ; 22 มาตรฐาน; 22 กว้าง; 22.5; 22.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 22.5 ปานกลาง; 22.5 แคบ; 22.5 มาตรฐาน; 22.5 กว้าง; 23; 23 กว้างพิเศษ; 23 ปานกลาง; 23 แคบ; 23 มาตรฐาน; 23 กว้าง; 23.5; 23.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 23.5 ปานกลาง; 23.5 แคบ; 23.5 มาตรฐาน; 23.5 กว้าง; 24; 24 กว้างพิเศษ; 24 ปานกลาง; 24 แคบ; 24 มาตรฐาน; 24 กว้าง; 24.5; 24.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 24.5 ปานกลาง; 24.5 แคบ; 24.5 มาตรฐาน; 24.5 กว้าง; 25; 25 กว้างพิเศษ; 25 ปานกลาง; 25 แคบ; 25 มาตรฐาน; 25 กว้าง; 25.5; 25.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 25.5 ปานกลาง; 25.5 แคบ; 25.5 มาตรฐาน; 25.5 กว้าง; 26; 26 กว้างพิเศษ; 26 ปานกลาง; 26 แคบ; 26 มาตรฐาน; 26 กว้าง; 26.5; 26.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 26.5 ปานกลาง; 26.5 แคบ; 26.5 มาตรฐาน; 26.5 กว้าง; 27; 27 กว้างพิเศษ; 27 ปานกลาง; 27 แคบ; 27 มาตรฐาน; 27 กว้าง; 27.5; 27.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 27.5 ปานกลาง; 27.5 แคบ; 27.5 มาตรฐาน; 27.5 กว้าง; 28; 28 กว้างพิเศษ; 28 ปานกลาง; 28 แคบ; 28 มาตรฐาน; 28 กว้าง; 28.5; 28.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 28.5 ปานกลาง; 28.5 แคบ; 28.5 มาตรฐาน; 28.5 กว้าง; 29; 29 กว้างพิเศษ; 29 ปานกลาง; 29 แคบ; 29 มาตรฐาน; 29 กว้าง; 29.5; 29.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 29.5 ปานกลาง; 29.5 แคบ; 29.5 มาตรฐาน; 29.5 กว้าง; 30; 30 กว้างพิเศษ; 30 ปานกลาง; 30 แคบ; 30 มาตรฐาน; 30 กว้าง; 30.5; 30.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 30.5 ปานกลาง; 30.5 แคบ; 30.5 มาตรฐาน; 30.5 กว้าง; 31; 31 กว้างพิเศษ; 31 ปานกลาง; 31 แคบ; 31 มาตรฐาน; 31 กว้าง; 31.5; 31.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 31.5 ปานกลาง; 31.5 แคบ; 31.5 มาตรฐาน; 31.5 กว้าง; 32; 32 กว้างพิเศษ; 32 ปานกลาง; 32 แคบ; 32 มาตรฐาน; 32 กว้าง; 32.5; 32.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 32.5 ปานกลาง; 32.5 แคบ; 32.5 มาตรฐาน; 32.5 กว้าง; 33; 33 กว้างพิเศษ; 33 ปานกลาง; 33 แคบ; 33 มาตรฐาน; 33 กว้าง; 33.5; 33.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 33.5 ปานกลาง; 33.5 แคบ; 33.5 มาตรฐาน; 33.5 กว้าง; 34; 34 กว้างพิเศษ; 34 ปานกลาง; 34 แคบ; 34 มาตรฐาน; 34 กว้าง; 34.5; 34.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 34.5 ปานกลาง; 34.5 แคบ; 34.5 มาตรฐาน; 34.5 กว้าง; 35; 35 กว้างพิเศษ; 35 ปานกลาง; 35 แคบ; 35 มาตรฐาน; 35 กว้าง; 35.5; 35.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 35.5 ปานกลาง; 35.5 แคบ; 35.5 มาตรฐาน; 35.5 กว้าง; 36; 36 กว้างพิเศษ; 36 ปานกลาง; 36 แคบ; 36 มาตรฐาน; 36 กว้าง; 36.5; 36.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 36.5 ปานกลาง; 36.5 แคบ; 36.5 มาตรฐาน; 36.5 กว้าง; 37; 37 กว้างพิเศษ; 37 ปานกลาง; 37 แคบ; 37 มาตรฐาน; 37 กว้าง; 37.5; 37.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 37.5 ปานกลาง; 37.5 แคบ; 37.5 มาตรฐาน; 37.5 กว้าง; 38; 38 กว้างพิเศษ; 38 ปานกลาง; 38 แคบ; 38 มาตรฐาน; 38 กว้าง; 38.5; 38.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 38.5 ปานกลาง; 38.5 แคบ; 38.5 มาตรฐาน; 38.5 กว้าง; 39; 39 กว้างพิเศษ; 39 ปานกลาง; 39 แคบ; 39 มาตรฐาน; 39 กว้าง; 39.5; 39.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 39.5 ปานกลาง; 39.5 แคบ; 39.5 มาตรฐาน; 39.5 กว้าง; 40; 40 กว้างพิเศษ; 40 ปานกลาง; 40 แคบ; 40 มาตรฐาน; 40 กว้าง; 40.5; 40.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 40.5 ปานกลาง; 40.5 แคบ; 40.5 มาตรฐาน; 40.5 กว้าง; 41; 41 กว้างพิเศษ; 41 ปานกลาง; 41 แคบ; 41 มาตรฐาน; 41 กว้าง; 41.5; 41.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 41.5 ปานกลาง; 41.5 แคบ; 41.5 มาตรฐาน; 41.5 กว้าง; 42; 42 กว้างพิเศษ; 42 ปานกลาง; 42 แคบ; 42 มาตรฐาน; 42 กว้าง; 42.5; 42.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 42.5 ปานกลาง; 42.5 แคบ; 42.5 มาตรฐาน; 42.5 กว้าง; 43; 43 กว้างพิเศษ; 43 ปานกลาง; 43 แคบ; 43 มาตรฐาน; 43 กว้าง; 43.5; 43.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 43.5 ปานกลาง; 43.5 แคบ; 43.5 มาตรฐาน; 43.5 กว้าง; 44; 44 กว้างพิเศษ; 44 ปานกลาง; 44 แคบ; 44 มาตรฐาน; 44 กว้าง; 44.5; 44.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 44.5 ปานกลาง; 44.5 แคบ; 44.5 มาตรฐาน; 44.5 กว้าง; 45; 45 กว้างพิเศษ; 45 ปานกลาง; 45 แคบ; 45 มาตรฐาน; 45 กว้าง; 45.5; 45.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 45.5 ปานกลาง; 45.5 แคบ; 45.5 มาตรฐาน; 45.5 กว้าง; 46; 46 กว้างพิเศษ; 46 ปานกลาง; 46 แคบ; 46 มาตรฐาน; 46 กว้าง; 46.5; 46.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 46.5 ปานกลาง; 46.5 แคบ; 46.5 มาตรฐาน; 46.5 กว้าง; 47; 47 กว้างพิเศษ; 47 ปานกลาง; 47 แคบ; 47 มาตรฐาน; 47 กว้าง; 47.5; 47.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 47.5 ปานกลาง; 47.5 แคบ; 47.5 มาตรฐาน; 47.5 กว้าง; 48; 48 กว้างพิเศษ; 48 ปานกลาง; 48 แคบ; 48 มาตรฐาน; 48 กว้าง; 48.5; 48.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 48.5 ปานกลาง; 48.5 แคบ; 48.5 มาตรฐาน; 48.5 กว้าง; 49; 49 กว้างพิเศษ; 49 ปานกลาง; 49 แคบ; 49 มาตรฐาน; 49 กว้าง; 49.5; 49.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 49.5 ปานกลาง; 49.5 แคบ; 49.5 มาตรฐาน; 49.5 กว้าง; 50; 50 กว้างพิเศษ; 50 ปานกลาง; 50 แคบ; 50 มาตรฐาน; 50 กว้าง; 50.5; 50.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 50.5 ปานกลาง; 50.5 แคบ; 50.5 มาตรฐาน; 50.5 กว้าง; 51; 51 กว้างพิเศษ; 51 ปานกลาง; 51 แคบ; 51 มาตรฐาน; 51 กว้าง; 51.5; 51.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 51.5 ปานกลาง; 51.5 แคบ; 51.5 มาตรฐาน; 51.5 กว้าง; 52; 52 กว้างพิเศษ; 52 ปานกลาง; 52 แคบ; 52 มาตรฐาน; 52 กว้าง; อื่นๆ
de: EU-Schuhgröße: 15; 15 Extra breit; 15 Mittel; 15 Schmal; 15 Standard; 15 Breit; 15,5; 15,5 Extra breit; 15,5 Mittel; 15,5 Schmal; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Breit; 16; 16 Extra breit; 16 Mittel; 16 Schmal; 16 Standard; 16 Breit; 16,5; 16,5 Extra breit; 16,5 Mittel; 16,5 Schmal; 16,5 Standard; 16,5 Breit; 17; 17 Extra breit; 17 Mittel; 17 Schmal; 17 Standard; 17 Breit; 17,5; 17,5 Extra breit; 17,5 Mittel; 17,5 Schmal; 17,5 Standard; 17,5 Breit; 18; 18 Extra breit; 18 Mittel; 18 Schmal; 18 Standard; 18 Breit; 18,5; 18,5 Extra breit; 18,5 Mittel; 18,5 Schmal; 18,5 Standard; 18,5 Breit; 19; 19 Extra breit; 19 Mittel; 19 Schmal; 19 Standard; 19 Breit; 19,5; 19,5 Extra breit; 19,5 Mittel; 19,5 Schmal; 19,5 Standard; 19,5 Breit; 20; 20 Extra breit; 20 Mittel; 20 Schmal; 20 Standard; 20 Breit; 20,5; 20,5 Extra breit; 20,5 Mittel; 20,5 Schmal; 20,5 Standard; 20,5 Breit; 21; 21 Extra Weit; 21 Mittel; 21 Schmal; 21 Standard; 21 Weit; 21,5; 21,5 Extra breit; 21,5 Mittel; 21,5 Schmal; 21,5 Standard; 21,5 Breit; 22; 22 Extra Weit; 22 Mittel; 22 Schmal; 22 Standard; 22 Weit; 22,5; 22,5 Extra Weit; 22,5 Mittel; 22,5 Schmal; 22,5 Standard; 22,5 Weit; 23; 23 Extra Weit; 23 Mittel; 23 Schmal; 23 Standard; 23 Weit; 23,5; 23,5 Extra Weit; 23,5 Mittel; 23,5 Schmal; 23,5 Standard; 23,5 Weit; 24; 24 Extra Weit; 24 Mittel; 24 Schmal; 24 Standard; 24 Weit; 24,5; 24,5 Extra Weit; 24,5 Mittel; 24,5 Schmal; 24,5 Standard; 24,5 Weit; 25; 25 Extra Weit; 25 Mittel; 25 Schmal; 25 Standard; 25 Weit; 25,5; 25,5 Extra Weit; 25,5 Mittel; 25,5 Schmal; 25,5 Standard; 25,5 Weit; 26; 26 Extra Weit; 26 Mittel; 26 Schmal; 26 Standard; 26 Weit; 26,5; 26,5 Extra Weit; 26,5 Mittel; 26,5 Schmal; 26,5 Standard; 26,5 Weit; 27; 27 Extra Weit; 27 Mittel; 27 Schmal; 27 Standard; 27 Weit; 27,5; 27,5 Extra Weit; 27,5 Mittel; 27,5 Schmal; 27,5 Standard; 27,5 Weit; 28; 28 Extra Weit; 28 Mittel; 28 Schmal; 28 Standard; 28 Weit; 28,5; 28,5 Extra Weit; 28,5 Mittel; 28,5 Schmal; 28,5 Standard; 28,5 Weit; 29; 29 Extra Weit; 29 Mittel; 29 Schmal; 29 Standard; 29 Weit; 29,5; 29,5 Extra Weit; 29,5 Mittel; 29,5 Schmal; 29,5 Standard; 29,5 Weit; 30; 30 Extra Weit; 30 Mittel; 30 Schmal; 30 Standard; 30 Weit; 30,5; 30,5 Extra Weit; 30,5 Mittel; 30,5 Schmal; 30,5 Standard; 30,5 Weit; 31; 31 Extra Weit; 31 Mittel; 31 Schmal; 31 Standard; 31 Weit; 31,5; 31,5 Extra Weit; 31,5 Mittel; 31,5 Schmal; 31,5 Standard; 31,5 Weit; 32; 32 Extra Weit; 32 Mittel; 32 Schmal; 32 Standard; 32 Weit; 32,5; 32,5 Extra Weit; 32,5 Mittel; 32,5 Schmal; 32,5 Standard; 32,5 Weit; 33; 33 Extra Weit; 33 Mittel; 33 Schmal; 33 Standard; 33 Weit; 33,5; 33,5 Extra Weit; 33,5 Mittel; 33,5 Schmal; 33,5 Standard; 33,5 Weit; 34; 34 Extra Weit; 34 Mittel; 34 Schmal; 34 Standard; 34 Weit; 34,5; 34,5 Extra Weit; 34,5 Mittel; 34,5 Schmal; 34,5 Standard; 34,5 Weit; 35; 35 Extra Weit; 35 Mittel; 35 Schmal; 35 Standard; 35 Weit; 35,5; 35,5 Extra Weit; 35,5 Mittel; 35,5 Schmal; 35,5 Standard; 35,5 Weit; 36; 36 Extra Weit; 36 Mittel; 36 Schmal; 36 Standard; 36 Weit; 36,5; 36,5 Extra Weit; 36,5 Mittel; 36,5 Schmal; 36,5 Standard; 36,5 Weit; 37; 37 Extra Weit; 37 Mittel; 37 Schmal; 37 Standard; 37 Weit; 37,5; 37,5 Extra Weit; 37,5 Mittel; 37,5 Schmal; 37,5 Standard; 37,5 Weit; 38; 38 Extra Weit; 38 Mittel; 38 Schmal; 38 Standard; 38 Weit; 38,5; 38,5 Extra Weit; 38,5 Mittel; 38,5 Schmal; 38,5 Standard; 38,5 Weit; 39; 39 Extra Weit; 39 Mittel; 39 Schmal; 39 Standard; 39 Weit; 39,5; 39,5 Extra Weit; 39,5 Mittel; 39,5 Schmal; 39,5 Standard; 39,5 Weit; 40; 40 Extra Weit; 40 Mittel; 40 Schmal; 40 Standard; 40 Weit; 40,5; 40,5 Extra Weit; 40,5 Mittel; 40,5 Schmal; 40,5 Standard; 40,5 Weit; 41; 41 Extra Weit; 41 Mittel; 41 Schmal; 41 Standard; 41 Weit; 41,5; 41,5 Extra Weit; 41,5 Mittel; 41,5 Schmal; 41,5 Standard; 41,5 Weit; 42; 42 Extra Weit; 42 Mittel; 42 Schmal; 42 Standard; 42 Weit; 42,5; 42,5 Extra Weit; 42,5 Mittel; 42,5 Schmal; 42,5 Standard; 42,5 Weit; 43; 43 Extra Weit; 43 Mittel; 43 Schmal; 43 Standard; 43 Weit; 43,5; 43,5 Extra Weit; 43,5 Mittel; 43,5 Schmal; 43,5 Standard; 43,5 Weit; 44; 44 Extra Weit; 44 Mittel; 44 Schmal; 44 Standard; 44 Weit; 44,5; 44,5 Extra Weit; 44,5 Mittel; 44,5 Schmal; 44,5 Standard; 44,5 Weit; 45; 45 Extra Weit; 45 Mittel; 45 Schmal; 45 Standard; 45 Weit; 45,5; 45,5 Extra Weit; 45,5 Mittel; 45,5 Schmal; 45,5 Standard; 45,5 Weit; 46; 46 Extra Weit; 46 Mittel; 46 Schmal; 46 Standard; 46 Weit; 46,5; 46,5 Extra Weit; 46,5 Mittel; 46,5 Schmal; 46,5 Standard; 46,5 Weit; 47; 47 Extra Weit; 47 Mittel; 47 Schmal; 47 Standard; 47 Weit; 47,5; 47,5 Extra Weit; 47,5 Mittel; 47,5 Schmal; 47,5 Standard; 47,5 Weit; 48; 48 Extra Weit; 48 Mittel; 48 Schmal; 48 Standard; 48 Weit; 48,5; 48,5 Extra Weit; 48,5 Mittel; 48,5 Schmal; 48,5 Standard; 48,5 Weit; 49; 49 Extra Weit; 49 Mittel; 49 Schmal; 49 Standard; 49 Weit; 49,5; 49,5 Extra Weit; 49,5 Mittel; 49,5 Schmal; 49,5 Standard; 49,5 Weit; 50; 50 Extra Weit; 50 Mittel; 50 Schmal; 50 Standard; 50 Weit; 50,5; 50,5 Extra Weit; 50,5 Mittel; 50,5 Schmal; 50,5 Standard; 50,5 Weit; 51; 51 Extra Weit; 51 Mittel; 51 Schmal; 51 Standard; 51 Weit; 51,5; 51,5 Extra Weit; 51,5 Mittel; 51,5 Schmal; 51,5 Standard; 51,5 Weit; 52; 52 Extra Weit; 52 Mittel; 52 Schmal; 52 Standard; 52 Weit; Sonstige
nb: EU-skostørrelse: 15; 15 ekstra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 ekstra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 16,5; 16,5 ekstra bred; 16,5 medium; 16,5 smal; 16,5 standard; 16,5 bred; 17; 17 ekstra bred; 17 medium; 17 smal; 17 standard; 17 bred; 17,5; 17,5 ekstra bred; 17,5 medium; 17,5 smal; 17,5 standard; 17,5 bred; 18; 18 ekstra bred; 18 medium; 18 smal; 18 standard; 18 bred; 18,5; 18,5 ekstra bred; 18,5 medium; 18,5 smal; 18,5 standard; 18,5 bred; 19; 19 ekstra bred; 19 medium; 19 smal; 19 standard; 19 bred; 19,5; 19,5 ekstra bred; 19,5 medium; 19,5 smal; 19,5 standard; 19,5 bred; 20; 20 ekstra bred; 20 medium; 20 smal; 20 standard; 20 bred; 20,5; 20,5 ekstra bred; 20,5 medium; 20,5 smal; 20,5 standard; 20,5 bred; 21; 21 ekstra bred; 21 medium; 21 smal; 21 standard; 21 bred; 21,5; 21,5 ekstra bred; 21,5 medium; 21,5 smal; 21,5 standard; 21,5 bred; 22; 22 ekstra bred; 22 medium; 22 smal; 22 standard; 22 bred; 22,5; 22,5 ekstra bred; 22,5 medium; 22,5 smal; 22,5 standard; 22,5 bred; 23; 23 ekstra bred; 23 medium; 23 smal; 23 standard; 23 bred; 23,5; 23,5 ekstra bred; 23,5 medium; 23,5 smal; 23,5 standard; 23,5 bred; 24; 24 ekstra bred; 24 medium; 24 smal; 24 standard; 24 bred; 24,5; 24,5 ekstra bred; 24,5 medium; 24,5 smal; 24,5 standard; 24,5 bred; 25; 25 ekstra bred; 25 medium; 25 smal; 25 standard; 25 bred; 25,5; 25,5 ekstra bred; 25,5 medium; 25,5 smal; 25,5 standard; 25,5 bred; 26; 26 ekstra bred; 26 medium; 26 smal; 26 standard; 26 bred; 26,5; 26,5 ekstra bred; 26,5 medium; 26,5 smal; 26,5 standard; 26,5 bred; 27; 27 ekstra bred; 27 medium; 27 smal; 27 standard; 27 bred; 27,5; 27,5 ekstra bred; 27,5 medium; 27,5 smal; 27,5 standard; 27,5 bred; 28; 28 ekstra bred; 28 medium; 28 smal; 28 standard; 28 bred; 28,5; 28,5 ekstra bred; 28,5 medium; 28,5 smal; 28,5 standard; 28,5 bred; 29; 29 ekstra bred; 29 medium; 29 smal; 29 standard; 29 bred; 29,5; 29,5 ekstra bred; 29,5 medium; 29,5 smal; 29,5 standard; 29,5 bred; 30; 30 ekstra bred; 30 medium; 30 smal; 30 standard; 30 bred; 30,5; 30,5 ekstra bred; 30,5 medium; 30,5 smal; 30,5 standard; 30,5 bred; 31; 31 ekstra bred; 31 medium; 31 smal; 31 standard; 31 bred; 31,5; 31,5 ekstra bred; 31,5 medium; 31,5 smal; 31,5 standard; 31,5 bred; 32; 32 ekstra bred; 32 medium; 32 smal; 32 standard; 32 bred; 32,5; 32,5 ekstra bred; 32,5 medium; 32,5 smal; 32,5 standard; 32,5 bred; 33; 33 ekstra bred; 33 medium; 33 smal; 33 standard; 33 bred; 33,5; 33,5 ekstra bred; 33,5 medium; 33,5 smal; 33,5 standard; 33,5 bred; 34; 34 ekstra bred; 34 medium; 34 smal; 34 standard; 34 bred; 34,5; 34,5 ekstra bred; 34,5 medium; 34,5 smal; 34,5 standard; 34,5 bred; 35; 35 ekstra bred; 35 medium; 35 smal; 35 standard; 35 bred; 35,5; 35,5 ekstra bred; 35,5 medium; 35,5 smal; 35,5 standard; 35,5 bred; 36; 36 ekstra bred; 36 medium; 36 smal; 36 standard; 36 bred; 36,5; 36,5 ekstra bred; 36,5 medium; 36,5 smal; 36,5 standard; 36,5 bred; 37; 37 ekstra bred; 37 medium; 37 smal; 37 standard; 37 bred; 37,5; 37,5 ekstra bred; 37,5 medium; 37,5 smal; 37,5 standard; 37,5 bred; 38; 38 ekstra bred; 38 medium; 38 smal; 38 standard; 38 bred; 38,5; 38,5 ekstra bred; 38,5 medium; 38,5 smal; 38,5 standard; 38,5 bred; 39; 39 ekstra bred; 39 medium; 39 smal; 39 standard; 39 bred; 39,5; 39,5 ekstra bred; 39,5 medium; 39,5 smal; 39,5 standard; 39,5 bred; 40; 40 ekstra bred; 40 medium; 40 smal; 40 standard; 40 bred; 40,5; 40,5 ekstra bred; 40,5 medium; 40,5 smal; 40,5 standard; 40,5 bred; 41; 41 ekstra bred; 41 medium; 41 smal; 41 standard; 41 bred; 41,5; 41,5 ekstra bred; 41,5 medium; 41,5 smal; 41,5 standard; 41,5 bred; 42; 42 ekstra bred; 42 medium; 42 smal; 42 standard; 42 bred; 42,5; 42,5 ekstra bred; 42,5 medium; 42,5 smal; 42,5 standard; 42,5 bred; 43; 43 ekstra bred; 43 medium; 43 smal; 43 standard; 43 bred; 43,5; 43,5 ekstra bred; 43,5 medium; 43,5 smal; 43,5 standard; 43,5 bred; 44; 44 ekstra bred; 44 medium; 44 smal; 44 standard; 44 bred; 44,5; 44,5 ekstra bred; 44,5 medium; 44,5 smal; 44,5 standard; 44,5 bred; 45; 45 ekstra bred; 45 medium; 45 smal; 45 standard; 45 bred; 45,5; 45,5 ekstra bred; 45,5 medium; 45,5 smal; 45,5 standard; 45,5 bred; 46; 46 ekstra bred; 46 medium; 46 smal; 46 standard; 46 bred; 46,5; 46,5 ekstra bred; 46,5 medium; 46,5 smal; 46,5 standard; 46,5 bred; 47; 47 ekstra bred; 47 medium; 47 smal; 47 standard; 47 bred; 47,5; 47,5 ekstra bred; 47,5 medium; 47,5 smal; 47,5 standard; 47,5 bred; 48; 48 ekstra bred; 48 medium; 48 smal; 48 standard; 48 bred; 48,5; 48,5 ekstra bred; 48,5 medium; 48,5 smal; 48,5 standard; 48,5 bred; 49; 49 ekstra bred; 49 medium; 49 smal; 49 standard; 49 bred; 49,5; 49,5 ekstra bred; 49,5 medium; 49,5 smal; 49,5 standard; 49,5 bred; 50; 50 ekstra bred; 50 medium; 50 smal; 50 standard; 50 bred; 50,5; 50,5 ekstra bred; 50,5 medium; 50,5 smal; 50,5 standard; 50,5 bred; 51; 51 ekstra bred; 51 medium; 51 smal; 51 standard; 51 bred; 51,5; 51,5 ekstra bred; 51,5 medium; 51,5 smal; 51,5 standard; 51,5 bred; 52; 52 ekstra bred; 52 medium; 52 smal; 52 standard; 52 bred; Annet
pl: Rozmiar buta EU: 15; 15 bardzo szeroki; 15 średni; 15 wąski; 15 standardowy; 15 szeroki; 15,5; 15,5 bardzo szeroki; 15,5 średni; 15,5 wąski; 15,5 standardowy; 15,5 szeroki; 16; 16 bardzo szeroki; 16 średni; 16 wąski; 16 standardowy; 16 szeroki; 16,5; 16,5 bardzo szeroki; 16,5 średni; 16,5 wąski; 16,5 standardowy; 16,5 szeroki; 17; 17 bardzo szeroki; 17 średni; 17 wąski; 17 standardowy; 17 szeroki; 17,5; 17,5 bardzo szeroki; 17,5 średni; 17,5 wąski; 17,5 standardowy; 17,5 szeroki; 18; 18 bardzo szeroki; 18 średni; 18 wąski; 18 standardowy; 18 szeroki; 18,5; 18,5 bardzo szeroki; 18,5 średni; 18,5 wąski; 18,5 standardowy; 18,5 szeroki; 19; 19 bardzo szeroki; 19 średni; 19 wąski; 19 standardowy; 19 szeroki; 19,5; 19,5 bardzo szeroki; 19,5 średni; 19,5 wąski; 19,5 standardowy; 19,5 szeroki; 20; 20 bardzo szeroki; 20 średni; 20 wąski; 20 standardowy; 20 szeroki; 20,5; 20,5 bardzo szeroki; 20,5 średni; 20,5 wąski; 20,5 standardowy; 20,5 szeroki; 21; 21 Bardzo szerokie; 21 Średnie; 21 Wąskie; 21 Standardowe; 21 Szerokie; 21,5; 21,5 bardzo szeroki; 21,5 średni; 21,5 wąski; 21,5 standardowy; 21,5 szeroki; 22; 22 Bardzo szerokie; 22 Średnie; 22 Wąskie; 22 Standardowe; 22 Szerokie; 22,5; 22,5 Bardzo szerokie; 22,5 Średnie; 22,5 Wąskie; 22,5 Standardowe; 22,5 Szerokie; 23; 23 Bardzo szerokie; 23 Średnie; 23 Wąskie; 23 Standardowe; 23 Szerokie; 23,5; 23,5 Bardzo szerokie; 23,5 Średnie; 23,5 Wąskie; 23,5 Standardowe; 23,5 Szerokie; 24; 24 Bardzo szerokie; 24 Średnie; 24 Wąskie; 24 Standardowe; 24 Szerokie; 24,5; 24,5 Bardzo szerokie; 24,5 Średnie; 24,5 Wąskie; 24,5 Standardowe; 24,5 Szerokie; 25; 25 Bardzo szerokie; 25 Średnie; 25 Wąskie; 25 Standardowe; 25 Szerokie; 25,5; 25,5 Bardzo szerokie; 25,5 Średnie; 25,5 Wąskie; 25,5 Standardowe; 25,5 Szerokie; 26; 26 Bardzo szerokie; 26 Średnie; 26 Wąskie; 26 Standardowe; 26 Szerokie; 26,5; 26,5 Bardzo szerokie; 26,5 Średnie; 26,5 Wąskie; 26,5 Standardowe; 26,5 Szerokie; 27; 27 Bardzo szerokie; 27 Średnie; 27 Wąskie; 27 Standardowe; 27 Szerokie; 27,5; 27,5 Bardzo szerokie; 27,5 Średnie; 27,5 Wąskie; 27,5 Standardowe; 27,5 Szerokie; 28; 28 Bardzo szerokie; 28 Średnie; 28 Wąskie; 28 Standardowe; 28 Szerokie; 28,5; 28,5 Bardzo szerokie; 28,5 Średnie; 28,5 Wąskie; 28,5 Standardowe; 28,5 Szerokie; 29; 29 Bardzo szerokie; 29 Średnie; 29 Wąskie; 29 Standardowe; 29 Szerokie; 29,5; 29,5 Bardzo szerokie; 29,5 Średnie; 29,5 Wąskie; 29,5 Standardowe; 29,5 Szerokie; 30; 30 Bardzo szerokie; 30 Średnie; 30 Wąskie; 30 Standardowe; 30 Szerokie; 30,5; 30,5 Bardzo szerokie; 30,5 Średnie; 30,5 Wąskie; 30,5 Standardowe; 30,5 Szerokie; 31; 31 Bardzo szerokie; 31 Średnie; 31 Wąskie; 31 Standardowe; 31 Szerokie; 31,5; 31,5 Bardzo szerokie; 31,5 Średnie; 31,5 Wąskie; 31,5 Standardowe; 31,5 szerokie; 32; 32 Bardzo szerokie; 32 Średnie; 32 Wąskie; 32 Standardowe; 32 Szerokie; 32,5; 32,5 Bardzo szerokie; 32,5 Średnie; 32,5 Wąskie; 32,5 Standardowe; 32,5 Szerokie; 33; 33 Bardzo szerokie; 33 Średnie; 33 Wąskie; 33 Standardowe; 33 Szerokie; 33,5; 33,5 Bardzo szerokie; 33,5 Średnie; 33,5 Wąskie; 33,5 Standardowe; 33,5 Szerokie; 34; 34 Bardzo szerokie; 34 Średnie; 34 Wąskie; 34 Standardowe; 34 Szerokie; 34,5; 34,5 Bardzo szerokie; 34,5 Średnie; 34,5 Wąskie; 34,5 Standardowe; 34,5 Szerokie; 35; 35 Bardzo szerokie; 35 Średnie; 35 Wąskie; 35 Standardowe; 35 Szerokie; 35,5; 35,5 Bardzo szerokie; 35,5 Średnie; 35,5 Wąskie; 35,5 Standardowe; 35,5 Szerokie; 36; 36 Bardzo szerokie; 36 Średnie; 36 Wąskie; 36 Standardowe; 36 Szerokie; 36,5; 36,5 Bardzo szerokie; 36,5 Średnie; 36,5 Wąskie; 36,5 Standardowe; 36,5 Szerokie; 37; 37 Bardzo szerokie; 37 Średnie; 37 Wąskie; 37 Standardowe; 37 Szerokie; 37,5; 37,5 Bardzo szerokie; 37,5 Średnie; 37,5 Wąskie; 37,5 Standardowe; 37,5 Szerokie; 38; 38 Bardzo szerokie; 38 Średnie; 38 Wąskie; 38 Standardowe; 38 Szerokie; 38,5; 38,5 Bardzo szerokie; 38,5 Średnie; 38,5 Wąskie; 38,5 Standardowe; 38,5 Szerokie; 39; 39 Bardzo szerokie; 39 Średnie; 39 Wąskie; 39 Standardowe; 39 Szerokie; 39,5; 39,5 Bardzo szerokie; 39,5 Średnie; 39,5 Wąskie; 39,5 Standardowe; 39,5 Szerokie; 40; 40 Bardzo szerokie; 40 Średnie; 40 Wąskie; 40 Standardowe; 40 Szerokie; 40,5; 40,5 Bardzo szerokie; 40,5 Średnie; 40,5 Wąskie; 40,5 Standardowe; 40,5 Szerokie; 41; 41 Bardzo szerokie; 41 Średnie; 41 Wąskie; 41 Standardowe; 41 Szerokie; 41,5; 41,5 Bardzo szerokie; 41,5 Średnie; 41,5 Wąskie; 41,5 Standardowe; 41,5 Szerokie; 42; 42 Bardzo szerokie; 42 Średnie; 42 Wąskie; 42 Standardowe; 42 Szerokie; 42,5; 42,5 Bardzo szerokie; 42,5 Średnie; 42,5 Wąskie; 42,5 Standardowe; 42,5 Szerokie; 43; 43 Bardzo szerokie; 43 Średnie; 43 Wąskie; 43 Standardowe; 43 Szerokie; 43,5; 43,5 Bardzo szerokie; 43,5 Średnie; 43,5 Wąskie; 43,5 Standardowe; 43,5 Szerokie; 44; 44 Bardzo szerokie; 44 Średnie; 44 Wąskie; 44 Standardowe; 44 Szerokie; 44,5; 44,5 Bardzo szerokie; 44,5 Średnie; 44,5 Wąskie; 44,5 Standardowe; 44,5 Szerokie; 45; 45 Bardzo szerokie; 45 Średnie; 45 Wąskie; 45 Standardowe; 45 Szerokie; 45,5; 45,5 Bardzo szerokie; 45,5 Średnie; 45,5 Wąskie; 45,5 Standardowe; 45,5 Szerokie; 46; 46 Bardzo szerokie; 46 Średnie; 46 Wąskie; 46 Standardowe; 46 Szerokie; 46,5; 46,5 Bardzo szerokie; 46,5 Średnie; 46,5 Wąskie; 46,5 Standardowe; 46,5 Szerokie; 47; 47 Bardzo szerokie; 47 Średnie; 47 Wąskie; 47 Standardowe; 47 Szerokie; 47,5; 47,5 Bardzo szerokie; 47,5 Średnie; 47,5 Wąskie; 47,5 Standardowe; 47,5 Szerokie; 48; 48 Bardzo szerokie; 48 Średnie; 48 Wąskie; 48 Standardowe; 48 Szerokie; 48,5; 48,5 Bardzo szerokie; 48,5 Średnie; 48,5 Wąskie; 48,5 Standardowe; 48,5 Szerokie; 49; 49 Bardzo szerokie; 49 Średnie; 49 Wąskie; 49 Standardowe; 49 Szerokie; 49,5; 49,5 Bardzo szerokie; 49,5 Średnie; 49,5 Wąskie; 49,5 Standardowe; 49,5 Szerokie; 50; 50 Bardzo szerokie; 50 Średnie; 50 Wąskie; 50 Standardowe; 50 Szerokie; 50,5; 50,5 Bardzo szerokie; 50,5 Średnie; 50,5 Wąskie; 50,5 Standardowe; 50,5 Szerokie; 51; 51 Bardzo szerokie; 51 Średnie; 51 Wąskie; 51 Standardowe; 51 Szerokie; 51,5; 51,5 Bardzo szerokie; 51,5 Średnie; 51,5 Wąskie; 51,5 Standardowe; 51,5 Szerokie; 52; 52 Bardzo szerokie; 52 Średnie; 52 Wąskie; 52 Standardowe; 52 Szerokie; Inne
pt-PT: Eu gosto do sapato: 15; 15 extralargo; 15 médio; 15 estreito; 15 padrão; 15 largo; 15,5; 15,5 extralargo; 15,5 médio; 15,5 estreito; 15,5 padrão; 15,5 largo; 16; 16 extralargo; 16 médio; 16 estreito; 16 padrão; 16 largo; 16,5; 16,5 extralargo; 16,5 médio; 16,5 estreito; 16,5 padrão; 16,5 largo; 17; 17 extralargo; 17 médio; 17 estreito; 17 padrão; 17 largo; 17,5; 17,5 extralargo; 17,5 médio; 17,5 estreito; 17,5 padrão; 17,5 largo; 18; 18 extralargo; 18 médio; 18 estreito; 18 padrão; 18 largo; 18,5; 18,5 extralargo; 18,5 médio; 18,5 estreito; 18,5 padrão; 18,5 largo; 19; 19 extralargo; 19 médio; 19 estreito; 19 padrão; 19 largo; 19,5; 19,5 extralargo; 19,5 médio; 19,5 estreito; 19,5 padrão; 19,5 largo; 20; 20 extralargo; 20 médio; 20 estreito; 20 padrão; 20 largo; 20,5; 20,5 extralargo; 20,5 médio; 20,5 estreito; 20,5 padrão; 20,5 largo; 21; 21 extra largo; 21 médio; 21 estreito; 21 padrão; 21 largo; 21,5; 21,5 extralargo; 21,5 médio; 21,5 estreito; 21,5 padrão; 21,5 largo; 22; 22 extra largo; 22 médio; 22 estreito; 22 padrão; 22 largo; 22,5; 22,5 extra largo; 22,5 médio; 22,5 estreito; 22,5 padrão; 22,5 largo; 23; 23 extra largo; 23 médio; 23 estreito; 23 padrão; 23 largo; 23,5; 23,5 extra largo; 23,5 médio; 23,5 estreito; 23,5 padrão; 23,5 largo; 24; 24 extra largo; 24 médio; 24 estreito; 24 padrão; 24 largo; 24,5; 24,5 extra largo; 24,5 médio; 24,5 estreito; 24,5 padrão; 24,5 largo; 25; 25 extra largo; 25 médio; 25 estreito; 25 padrão; 25 largo; 25,5; 25,5 extra largo; 25,5 médio; 25,5 estreito; 25,5 padrão; 25,5 largo; 26; 26 extra largo; 26 médio; 26 estreito; 26 padrão; 26 largo; 26,5; 26,5 extra largo; 26,5 médio; 26,5 estreito; 26,5 padrão; 26,5 largo; 27; 27 extra largo; 27 médio; 27 estreito; 27 padrão; 27 largo; 27,5; 27,5 extra largo; 27,5 médio; 27,5 estreito; 27,5 padrão; 27,5 largo; 28; 28 extra largo; 28 médio; 28 estreito; 28 padrão; 28 largo; 28,5; 28,5 extra largo; 28,5 médio; 28,5 estreito; 28,5 padrão; 28,5 largo; 29; 29 extra largo; 29 médio; 29 estreito; 29 padrão; 29 largo; 29,5; 29,5 extra largo; 29,5 médio; 29,5 estreito; 29,5 padrão; 29,5 largo; 30; 30 extra largo; 30 médio; 30 estreito; 30 padrão; 30 largo; 30,5; 30,5 extra largo; 30,5 médio; 30,5 estreito; 30,5 padrão; 30,5 largo; 31; 31 extra largo; 31 médio; 31 estreito; 31 padrão; 31 largo; 31,5; 31,5 extra largo; 31,5 médio; 31,5 estreito; 31,5 padrão; 31,5 largo; 32; 32 extra largo; 32 médio; 32 estreito; 32 padrão; 32 largo; 32,5; 32,5 extra largo; 32,5 médio; 32,5 estreito; 32,5 padrão; 32,5 largo; 33; 33 extra largo; 33 médio; 33 estreito; 33 padrão; 33 largo; 33,5; 33,5 extra largo; 33,5 médio; 33,5 estreito; 33,5 padrão; 33,5 largo; 34; 34 extra largo; 34 médio; 34 estreito; 34 padrão; 34 largo; 34,5; 34,5 extra largo; 34,5 médio; 34,5 estreito; 34,5 padrão; 34,5 largo; 35; 35 extra largo; 35 médio; 35 estreito; 35 padrão; 35 largo; 35,5; 35,5 extra largo; 35,5 médio; 35,5 estreito; 35,5 padrão; 35,5 largo; 36; 36 extra largo; 36 médio; 36 estreito; 36 padrão; 36 largo; 36,5; 36,5 extra largo; 36,5 médio; 36,5 estreito; 36,5 padrão; 36,5 largo; 37; 37 extra largo; 37 médio; 37 estreito; 37 padrão; 37 largo; 37,5; 37,5 extra largo; 37,5 médio; 37,5 estreito; 37,5 padrão; 37,5 largo; 38; 38 extra largo; 38 médio; 38 estreito; 38 padrão; 38 largo; 38,5; 38,5 extra largo; 38,5 médio; 38,5 estreito; 38,5 padrão; 38,5 largo; 39; 39 extra largo; 39 médio; 39 estreito; 39 padrão; 39 largo; 39,5; 39,5 extra largo; 39,5 médio; 39,5 estreito; 39,5 padrão; 39,5 largo; 40; 40 extra largo; 40 médio; 40 estreito; 40 padrão; 40 largo; 40,5; 40,5 extra largo; 40,5 médio; 40,5 estreito; 40,5 padrão; 40,5 largo; 41; 41 extra largo; 41 médio; 41 estreito; 41 padrão; 41 largo; 41,5; 41,5 extra largo; 41,5 médio; 41,5 estreito; 41,5 padrão; 41,5 largo; 42; 42 extra largo; 42 médio; 42 estreito; 42 padrão; 42 largo; 42,5; 42,5 extra largo; 42,5 médio; 42,5 estreito; 42,5 padrão; 42,5 largo; 43; 43 extra largo; 43 médio; 43 estreito; 43 padrão; 43 largo; 43,5; 43,5 extra largo; 43,5 médio; 43,5 estreito; 43,5 padrão; 43,5 largo; 44; 44 extra largo; 44 médio; 44 estreito; 44 padrão; 44 largo; 44,5; 44,5 extra largo; 44,5 médio; 44,5 estreito; 44,5 padrão; 44,5 largo; 45; 45 extra largo; 45 médio; 45 estreito; 45 padrão; 45 largo; 45,5; 45,5 extra largo; 45,5 médio; 45,5 estreito; 45,5 padrão; 45,5 largo; 46; 46 extra largo; 46 médio; 46 estreito; 46 padrão; 46 largo; 46,5; 46,5 extra largo; 46,5 médio; 46,5 estreito; 46,5 padrão; 46,5 largo; 47; 47 extra largo; 47 médio; 47 estreito; 47 padrão; 47 largo; 47,5; 47,5 extra largo; 47,5 médio; 47,5 estreito; 47,5 padrão; 47,5 largo; 48; 48 extra largo; 48 médio; 48 estreito; 48 padrão; 48 largo; 48,5; 48,5 extra largo; 48,5 médio; 48,5 estreito; 48,5 padrão; 48,5 largo; 49; 49 extra largo; 49 médio; 49 estreito; 49 padrão; 49 largo; 49,5; 49,5 extra largo; 49,5 médio; 49,5 estreito; 49,5 padrão; 49,5 largo; 50; 50 extra largo; 50 médio; 50 estreito; 50 padrão; 50 largo; 50,5; 50,5 extra largo; 50,5 médio; 50,5 estreito; 50,5 padrão; 50,5 largo; 51; 51 extra largo; 51 médio; 51 estreito; 51 padrão; 51 largo; 51,5; 51,5 extra largo; 51,5 médio; 51,5 estreito; 51,5 padrão; 51,5 largo; 52; 52 extra largo; 52 médio; 52 estreito; 52 padrão; 52 largo; Outro
zh-CN: 欧盟鞋码: 15; 15 加宽; 15 中等; 15 窄; 15 标准; 15 宽; 15.5; 15.5 加宽; 15.5 中等; 15.5 窄; 15.5 标准; 15.5 宽; 16; 16 加宽; 16 中等; 16 窄; 16 标准; 16 宽; 16.5; 16.5 加宽; 16.5 中等; 16.5 窄; 16.5 标准; 16.5 宽; 17; 17 加宽; 17 中等; 17 窄; 17 标准; 17 宽; 17.5; 17.5 加宽; 17.5 中等; 17.5 窄; 17.5 标准; 17.5 宽; 18; 18 加宽; 18 中等; 18 窄; 18 标准; 18 宽; 18.5; 18.5 加宽; 18.5 中等; 18.5 窄; 18.5 标准; 18.5 宽; 19; 19 加宽; 19 中等; 19 窄; 19 标准; 19 宽; 19.5; 19.5 加宽; 19.5 中等; 19.5 窄; 19.5 标准; 19.5 宽; 20; 20 加宽; 20 中等; 20 窄; 20 标准; 20 宽; 20.5; 20.5 加宽; 20.5 中等; 20.5 窄; 20.5 标准; 20.5 宽; 21; 21 特宽; 21 中等; 21 窄; 21 标准; 21 宽; 21.5; 21.5 加宽; 21.5 中等; 21.5 窄; 21.5 标准; 21.5 宽; 22; 22 特宽; 22 中等; 22 窄; 22 标准; 22 宽; 22.5; 22.5 特宽; 22.5 中等; 22.5 窄; 22.5 标准; 22.5 宽; 23; 23 特宽; 23 中等; 23 窄; 23 标准; 23 宽; 23.5; 23.5 特宽; 23.5 中等; 23.5 窄; 23.5 标准; 23.5 宽; 24; 24 特宽; 24 中等; 24 窄; 24 标准; 24 宽; 24.5; 24.5 特宽; 24.5 中等; 24.5 窄; 24.5 标准; 24.5 宽; 25; 25 特宽; 25 中等; 25 窄; 25 标准; 25 宽; 25.5; 25.5 特宽; 25.5 中等; 25.5 窄; 25.5 标准; 25.5 宽; 26; 26 特宽; 26 中等; 26 窄; 26 标准; 26 宽; 26.5; 26.5 特宽; 26.5 中等; 26.5 窄; 26.5 标准; 26.5 宽; 27; 27 特宽; 27 中等; 27 窄; 27 标准; 27 宽; 27.5; 27.5 特宽; 27.5 中等; 27.5 窄; 27.5 标准; 27.5 宽; 28; 28 特宽; 28 中等; 28 窄; 28 标准; 28 宽; 28.5; 28.5 特宽; 28.5 中等; 28.5 窄; 28.5 标准; 28.5 宽; 29; 29 特宽; 29 中等; 29 窄; 29 标准; 29 宽; 29.5; 29.5 特宽; 29.5 中等; 29.5 窄; 29.5 标准; 29.5 宽; 30; 30 特宽; 30 中等; 30 窄; 30 标准; 30 宽; 30.5; 30.5 特宽; 30.5 中等; 30.5 窄; 30.5 标准; 30.5 宽; 31; 31 特宽; 31 中等; 31 窄; 31 标准; 31 宽; 31.5; 31.5 特宽; 31.5 中等; 31.5 窄; 31.5 标准; 31.5 宽; 32; 32 特宽; 32 中等; 32 窄; 32 标准; 32 宽; 32.5; 32.5 特宽; 32.5 中等; 32.5 窄; 32.5 标准; 32.5 宽; 33; 33 特宽; 33 中等; 33 窄; 33 标准; 33 宽; 33.5; 33.5 特宽; 33.5 中等; 33.5 窄; 33.5 标准; 33.5 宽; 34; 34 特宽; 34 中等; 34 窄; 34 标准; 34 宽; 34.5; 34.5 特宽; 34.5 中等; 34.5 窄; 34.5 标准; 34.5 宽; 35; 35 特宽; 35 中等; 35 窄; 35 标准; 35 宽; 35.5; 35.5 特宽; 35.5 中等; 35.5 窄; 35.5 标准; 35.5 宽; 36; 36 特宽; 36 中等; 36 窄; 36 标准; 36 宽; 36.5; 36.5 特宽; 36.5 中等; 36.5 窄; 36.5 标准; 36.5 宽; 37; 37 特宽; 37 中等; 37 窄; 37 标准; 37 宽; 37.5; 37.5 特宽; 37.5 中等; 37.5 窄; 37.5 标准; 37.5 宽; 38; 38 特宽; 38 中等; 38 窄; 38 标准; 38 宽; 38.5; 38.5 特宽; 38.5 中等; 38.5 窄; 38.5 标准; 38.5 宽; 39; 39 特宽; 39 中等; 39 窄; 39 标准; 39 宽; 39.5; 39.5 特宽; 39.5 中等; 39.5 窄; 39.5 标准; 39.5 宽; 40; 40 特宽; 40 中等; 40 窄; 40 标准; 40 宽; 40.5; 40.5 特宽; 40.5 中等; 40.5 窄; 40.5 标准; 40.5 宽; 41; 41 特宽; 41 中等; 41 窄; 41 标准; 41 宽; 41.5; 41.5 特宽; 41.5 中等; 41.5 窄; 41.5 标准; 41.5 宽; 42; 42 特宽; 42 中等; 42 窄; 42 标准; 42 宽; 42.5; 42.5 特宽; 42.5 中等; 42.5 窄; 42.5 标准; 42.5 宽; 43; 43 特宽; 43 中等; 43 窄; 43 标准; 43 宽; 43.5; 43.5 特宽; 43.5 中等; 43.5 窄; 43.5 标准; 43.5 宽; 44; 44 特宽; 44 中等; 44 窄; 44 标准; 44 宽; 44.5; 44.5 特宽; 44.5 中等; 44.5 窄; 44.5 标准; 44.5 宽; 45; 45 特宽; 45 中等; 45 窄; 45 标准; 45 宽; 45.5; 45.5 特宽; 45.5 中等; 45.5 窄; 45.5 标准; 45.5 宽; 46; 46 特宽; 46 中等; 46 窄; 46 标准; 46 宽; 46.5; 46.5 特宽; 46.5 中等; 46.5 窄; 46.5 标准; 46.5 宽; 47; 47 特宽; 47 中等; 47 窄; 47 标准; 47 宽; 47.5; 47.5 特宽; 47.5 中等; 47.5 窄; 47.5 标准; 47.5 宽; 48; 48 特宽; 48 中等; 48 窄; 48 标准; 48 宽; 48.5; 48.5 特宽; 48.5 中等; 48.5 窄; 48.5 标准; 48.5 宽; 49; 49 特宽; 49 中等; 49 窄; 49 标准; 49 宽; 49.5; 49.5 特宽; 49.5 中等; 49.5 窄; 49.5 标准; 49.5 宽; 50; 50 特宽; 50 中等; 50 窄; 50 标准; 50 宽; 50.5; 50.5 特宽; 50.5 中等; 50.5 窄; 50.5 标准; 50.5 宽; 51; 51 特宽; 51 中等; 51 窄; 51 标准; 51 宽; 51.5; 51.5 特宽; 51.5 中等; 51.5 窄; 51.5 标准; 51.5 宽; 52; 52 特宽; 52 中等; 52 窄; 52 标准; 52 宽; 其他
sl-SI: Velikost čevljev EU: 15; 15 zelo široko; 15 srednje; 15 ozko; 15 standardno; 15 široko; 15,5; 15,5 zelo široko; 15,5 srednje; 15,5 ozko; 15,5 standardno; 15,5 široko; 16; 16 zelo široko; 16 srednje; 16 ozko; 16 standardno; 16 široko; 16,5; 16,5 zelo široko; 16,5 srednje; 16,5 ozko; 16,5 standardno; 16,5 široko; 17; 17 zelo široko; 17 srednje; 17 ozko; 17 standardno; 17 široko; 17,5; 17,5 zelo široko; 17,5 srednje; 17,5 ozko; 17,5 standardno; 17,5 široko; 18; 18 zelo široko; 18 srednje; 18 ozko; 18 standardno; 18 široko; 18,5; 18,5 zelo široko; 18,5 srednje; 18,5 ozko; 18,5 standardno; 18,5 široko; 19; 19 zelo široko; 19 srednje; 19 ozko; 19 standardno; 19 široko; 19,5; 19,5 zelo široko; 19,5 srednje; 19,5 ozko; 19,5 standardno; 19,5 široko; 20; 20 zelo široko; 20 srednje; 20 ozko; 20 standardno; 20 široko; 20,5; 20,5 zelo široko; 20,5 srednje; 20,5 ozko; 20,5 standardno; 20,5 široko; 21; 21 zelo široko; 21 srednje; 21 ozko; 21 standardno; 21 široko; 21,5; 21,5 zelo široko; 21,5 srednje; 21,5 ozko; 21,5 standardno; 21,5 široko; 22; 22 zelo široko; 22 srednje; 22 ozko; 22 standardno; 22 široko; 22,5; 22,5 zelo široko; 22,5 srednje; 22,5 ozko; 22,5 standardno; 22,5 široko; 23; 23 zelo široko; 23 srednje; 23 ozko; 23 standardno; 23 široko; 23,5; 23,5 zelo široko; 23,5 srednje; 23,5 ozko; 23,5 standardno; 23,5 široko; 24; 24 zelo široko; 24 srednje; 24 ozko; 24 standardno; 24 široko; 24,5; 24,5 zelo široko; 24,5 srednje; 24,5 ozko; 24,5 standardno; 24,5 široko; 25; 25 zelo široko; 25 srednje; 25 ozko; 25 standardno; 25 široko; 25,5; 25,5 zelo široko; 25,5 srednje; 25,5 ozko; 25,5 standardno; 25,5 široko; 26; 26 zelo široko; 26 srednje; 26 ozko; 26 standardno; 26 široko; 26,5; 26,5 zelo široko; 26,5 srednje; 26,5 ozko; 26,5 standardno; 26,5 široko; 27; 27 zelo široko; 27 srednje; 27 ozko; 27 standardno; 27 široko; 27,5; 27,5 zelo široko; 27,5 srednje; 27,5 ozko; 27,5 standardno; 27,5 široko; 28; 28 zelo široko; 28 srednje; 28 ozko; 28 standardno; 28 široko; 28,5; 28,5 zelo široko; 28,5 srednje; 28,5 ozko; 28,5 standardno; 28,5 široko; 29; 29 zelo široko; 29 srednje; 29 ozko; 29 standardno; 29 široko; 29,5; 29,5 zelo široko; 29,5 srednje; 29,5 ozko; 29,5 standardno; 29,5 široko; 30; 30 zelo široko; 30 srednje; 30 ozko; 30 standardno; 30 široko; 30,5; 30,5 zelo široko; 30,5 srednje; 30,5 ozko; 30,5 standardno; 30,5 široko; 31; 31 zelo široko; 31 srednje; 31 ozko; 31 standardno; 31 široko; 31,5; 31,5 zelo široko; 31,5 srednje; 31,5 ozko; 31,5 standardno; 31,5 široko; 32; 32 zelo široko; 32 srednje; 32 ozko; 32 standardno; 32 široko; 32,5; 32,5 zelo široko; 32,5 srednje; 32,5 ozko; 32,5 standardno; 32,5 široko; 33; 33 zelo široko; 33 srednje; 33 ozko; 33 standardno; 33 široko; 33,5; 33,5 zelo široko; 33,5 srednje; 33,5 ozko; 33,5 standardno; 33,5 široko; 34; 34 zelo široko; 34 srednje; 34 ozko; 34 standardno; 34 široko; 34,5; 34,5 zelo široko; 34,5 srednje; 34,5 ozko; 34,5 standardno; 34,5 široko; 35; 35 zelo široko; 35 srednje; 35 ozko; 35 standardno; 35 široko; 35,5; 35,5 zelo široko; 35,5 srednje; 35,5 ozko; 35,5 standardno; 35,5 široko; 36; 36 zelo široko; 36 srednje; 36 ozko; 36 standardno; 36 široko; 36,5; 36,5 zelo široko; 36,5 srednje; 36,5 ozko; 36,5 standardno; 36,5 široko; 37; 37 zelo široko; 37 srednje; 37 ozko; 37 standardno; 37 široko; 37,5; 37,5 zelo široko; 37,5 srednje; 37,5 ozko; 37,5 standardno; 37,5 široko; 38; 38 zelo široko; 38 srednje; 38 ozko; 38 standardno; 38 široko; 38,5; 38,5 zelo široko; 38,5 srednje; 38,5 ozko; 38,5 standardno; 38,5 široko; 39; 39, zelo široka; 39, srednja; 39, ozka; 39, standardna; 39, široka; 39,5; 39,5, zelo široka; 39,5, srednja; 39,5, ozka; 39,5, standardna; 39,5, široka; 40; 40, zelo široka; 40, srednja; 40, ozka; 40, standardna; 40, široka; 40,5; 40,5, zelo široka; 40,5, srednja; 40,5, ozka; 40,5, standardna; 40,5, široka; 41; 41, zelo široka; 41, srednja; 41, ozka; 41, standardna; 41, široka; 41,5; 41,5, zelo široka; 41,5, srednja; 41,5, ozka; 41,5, standardna; 41,5, široka; 42; 42, zelo široka; 42, srednja; 42, ozka; 42, standardna; 42, široka; 42,5; 42,5, zelo široka; 42,5, srednja; 42,5, ozka; 42,5, standardna; 42,5, široka; 43; 43, zelo široka; 43, srednja; 43, ozka; 43, standardna; 43, široka; 43,5; 43,5, zelo široka; 43,5, srednja; 43,5, ozka; 43,5, standardna; 43,5, široka; 44; 44, zelo široka; 44, srednja; 44, ozka; 44, standardna; 44, široka; 44,5; 44,5, zelo široka; 44,5, srednja; 44,5, ozka; 44,5, standardna; 44,5, široka; 45; 45, zelo široka; 45, srednja; 45, ozka; 45, standardna; 45, široka; 45,5; 45,5, zelo široka; 45,5, srednja; 45,5, ozka; 45,5, standardna; 45,5, široka; 46; 46, zelo široka; 46, srednja; 46, ozka; 46, standardna; 46, široka; 46,5; 46,5, zelo široka; 46,5, srednja; 46,5, ozka; 46,5, standardna; 46,5, široka; 47; 47, zelo široka; 47, srednja; 47, ozka; 47, standardna; 47, široka; 47,5; 47,5, zelo široka; 47,5, srednja; 47,5, ozka; 47,5, standardna; 47,5, široka; 48; 48, zelo široka; 48, srednja; 48, ozka; 48, standardna; 48, široka; 48,5; 48,5, zelo široka; 48,5, srednja; 48,5, ozka; 48,5, standardna; 48,5, široka; 49; 49, zelo široka; 49, srednja; 49, ozka; 49, standardna; 49, široka; 49,5; 49,5, zelo široka; 49,5, srednja; 49,5, ozka; 49,5, standardna; 49,5, široka; 50; 50, zelo široka; 50, srednja; 50, ozka; 50, standardna; 50, široka; 50,5; 50,5, zelo široka; 50,5, srednja; 50,5, ozka; 50,5, standardna; 50,5, široka; 51; 51, zelo široka; 51, srednja; 51, ozka; 51, standardna; 51, široka; 51,5; 51,5, zelo široka; 51,5, srednja; 51,5, ozka; 51,5, standardna; 51,5, široka; 52; 52, zelo široka; 52, srednja; 52, ozka; 52, standardna; 52, široka; Drugo
hr-HR: EU veličina cipela: 15; 15 ekstra široko; 15 srednje; 15 usko; 15 standardno; 15 široko; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra široko; 15,5 srednje; 15,5 usko; 15,5 standardno; 15,5 široko; 16; 16 ekstra široko; 16 srednje; 16 usko; 16 standardno; 16 široko; 16,5; 16,5 ekstra široko; 16,5 srednje; 16,5 usko; 16,5 standardno; 16,5 široko; 17; 17 ekstra široko; 17 srednje; 17 usko; 17 standardno; 17 široko; 17,5; 17,5 ekstra široko; 17,5 srednje; 17,5 usko; 17,5 standardno; 17,5 široko; 18; 18 ekstra široko; 18 srednje; 18 usko; 18 standardno; 18 široko; 18,5; 18,5 ekstra široko; 18,5 srednje; 18,5 usko; 18,5 standardno; 18,5 široko; 19; 19 ekstra široko; 19 srednje; 19 usko; 19 standardno; 19 široko; 19,5; 19,5 ekstra široko; 19,5 srednje; 19,5 usko; 19,5 standardno; 19,5 široko; 20; 20 ekstra široko; 20 srednje; 20 usko; 20 standardno; 20 široko; 20,5; 20,5 ekstra široko; 20,5 srednje; 20,5 usko; 20,5 standardno; 20,5 široko; 21; 21 ekstra široko; 21 srednje; 21 usko; 21 standardno; 21 široko; 21,5; 21,5 ekstra široko; 21,5 srednje; 21,5 usko; 21,5 standardno; 21,5 široko; 22; 22 ekstra široko; 22 srednje; 22 usko; 22 standardno; 22 široko; 22,5; 22,5 ekstra široko; 22,5 srednje; 22,5 usko; 22,5 standardno; 22,5 široko; 23; 23 ekstra široko; 23 srednje; 23 usko; 23 standardno; 23 široko; 23,5; 23,5 ekstra široko; 23,5 srednje; 23,5 usko; 23,5 standardno; 23,5 široko; 24; 24 ekstra široko; 24 srednje; 24 usko; 24 standardno; 24 široko; 24,5; 24,5 ekstra široko; 24,5 srednje; 24,5 usko; 24,5 standardno; 24,5 široko; 25; 25 ekstra široko; 25 srednje; 25 usko; 25 standardno; 25 široko; 25,5; 25,5 ekstra široko; 25,5 srednje; 25,5 usko; 25,5 standardno; 25,5 široko; 26; 26 ekstra široko; 26 srednje; 26 usko; 26 standardno; 26 široko; 26,5; 26,5 ekstra široko; 26,5 srednje; 26,5 usko; 26,5 standardno; 26,5 široko; 27; 27 ekstra široko; 27 srednje; 27 usko; 27 standardno; 27 široko; 27,5; 27,5 ekstra široko; 27,5 srednje; 27,5 usko; 27,5 standardno; 27,5 široko; 28; 28 ekstra široko; 28 srednje; 28 usko; 28 standardno; 28 široko; 28,5; 28,5 ekstra široko; 28,5 srednje; 28,5 usko; 28,5 standardno; 28,5 široko; 29; 29 ekstra široko; 29 srednje; 29 usko; 29 standardno; 29 široko; 29,5; 29,5 ekstra široko; 29,5 srednje; 29,5 usko; 29,5 standardno; 29,5 široko; 30; 30 ekstra široko; 30 srednje; 30 usko; 30 standardno; 30 široko; 30,5; 30,5 ekstra široko; 30,5 srednje; 30,5 usko; 30,5 standardno; 30,5 široko; 31; 31 ekstra široko; 31 srednje; 31 usko; 31 standardno; 31 široko; 31,5; 31,5 ekstra široko; 31,5 srednje; 31,5 usko; 31,5 standardno; 31,5 široko; 32; 32 ekstra široko; 32 srednje; 32 usko; 32 standardno; 32 široko; 32,5; 32,5 ekstra široko; 32,5 srednje; 32,5 usko; 32,5 standardno; 32,5 široko; 33; 33 ekstra široko; 33 srednje; 33 usko; 33 standardno; 33 široko; 33,5; 33,5 ekstra široko; 33,5 srednje; 33,5 usko; 33,5 standardno; 33,5 široko; 34; 34 ekstra široko; 34 srednje; 34 usko; 34 standardno; 34 široko; 34,5; 34,5 ekstra široko; 34,5 srednje; 34,5 usko; 34,5 standardno; 34,5 široko; 35; 35 ekstra široko; 35 srednje; 35 usko; 35 standardno; 35 široko; 35,5; 35,5 ekstra široko; 35,5 srednje; 35,5 usko; 35,5 standardno; 35,5 široko; 36; 36 ekstra široko; 36 srednje; 36 usko; 36 standardno; 36 široko; 36,5; 36,5 ekstra široko; 36,5 srednje; 36,5 usko; 36,5 standardno; 36,5 široko; 37; 37 ekstra široko; 37 srednje; 37 usko; 37 standardno; 37 široko; 37,5; 37,5 ekstra široko; 37,5 srednje; 37,5 usko; 37,5 standardno; 37,5 široko; 38; 38 ekstra široko; 38 srednje; 38 usko; 38 standardno; 38 široko; 38,5; 38,5 ekstra široko; 38,5 srednje; 38,5 usko; 38,5 standardno; 38,5 široko; 39; 39 iznimno široko; 39 srednje; 39 usko; 39 standardno; 39 široko; 39,5; 39,5 iznimno široko; 39,5 srednje; 39,5 usko; 39,5 standardno; 39,5 široko; 40; 40 iznimno široko; 40 srednje; 40 usko; 40 standardno; 40 široko; 40,5; 40,5 iznimno široko; 40,5 srednje; 40,5 usko; 40,5 standardno; 40,5 široko; 41; 41 iznimno široko; 41 srednje; 41 usko; 41 standardno; 41 široko; 41,5; 41,5 iznimno široko; 41,5 srednje; 41,5 usko; 41,5 standardno; 41,5 široko; 42; 42 iznimno široko; 42 srednje; 42 usko; 42 standardno; 42 široko; 42,5; 42,5 iznimno široko; 42,5 srednje; 42,5 usko; 42,5 standardno; 42,5 široko; 43; 43 iznimno široko; 43 srednje; 43 usko; 43 standardno; 43 široko; 43,5; 43,5 iznimno široko; 43,5 srednje; 43,5 usko; 43,5 standardno; 43,5 široko; 44; 44 iznimno široko; 44 srednje; 44 usko; 44 standardno; 44 široko; 44,5; 44,5 iznimno široko; 44,5 srednje; 44,5 usko; 44,5 standardno; 44,5 široko; 45; 45 iznimno široko; 45 srednje; 45 usko; 45 standardno; 45 široko; 45,5; 45,5 iznimno široko; 45,5 srednje; 45,5 usko; 45,5 standardno; 45,5 široko; 46; 46 iznimno široko; 46 srednje; 46 usko; 46 standardno; 46 široko; 46,5; 46,5 iznimno široko; 46,5 srednje; 46,5 usko; 46,5 standardno; 46,5 široko; 47; 47 iznimno široko; 47 srednje; 47 usko; 47 standardno; 47 široko; 47,5; 47,5 iznimno široko; 47,5 srednje; 47,5 usko; 47,5 standardno; 47,5 široko; 48; 48 iznimno široko; 48 srednje; 48 usko; 48 standardno; 48 široko; 48,5; 48,5 iznimno široko; 48,5 srednje; 48,5 usko; 48,5 standardno; 48,5 široko; 49; 49 iznimno široko; 49 srednje; 49 usko; 49 standardno; 49 široko; 49,5; 49,5 iznimno široko; 49,5 srednje; 49,5 usko; 49,5 standardno; 49,5 široko; 50; 50 iznimno široko; 50 srednje; 50 usko; 50 standardno; 50 široko; 50,5; 50,5 iznimno široko; 50,5 srednje; 50,5 usko; 50,5 standardno; 50,5 široko; 51; 51 iznimno široko; 51 srednje; 51 usko; 51 standardno; 51 široko; 51,5; 51,5 iznimno široko; 51,5 srednje; 51,5 usko; 51,5 standardno; 51,5 široko; 52; 52 iznimno široko; 52 srednje; 52 usko; 52 standardno; 52 široko; Ostalo
zh-TW: EU 鞋碼: 15; 15 特寬版; 15 中等版型; 15 窄版; 15 標準版型; 15 寬版; 15.5; 15.5 特寬版; 15.5 中等版型; 15.5 窄版; 15.5 標準版型; 15.5 寬版; 16; 16 特寬版; 16 中等版型; 16 窄版; 16 標準版型; 16 寬版; 16.5; 16.5 特寬版; 16.5 中等版型; 16.5 窄版; 16.5 標準版型; 16.5 寬版; 17; 17 特寬版; 17 中等版型; 17 窄版; 17 標準版型; 17 寬版; 17.5; 17.5 特寬版; 17.5 中等版型; 17.5 窄版; 17.5 標準版型; 17.5 寬版; 18; 18 特寬版; 18 中等版型; 18 窄版; 18 標準版型; 18 寬版; 18.5; 18.5 特寬版; 18.5 中等版型; 18.5 窄版; 18.5 標準版型; 18.5 寬版; 19; 19 特寬版; 19 中等版型; 19 窄版; 19 標準版型; 19 寬版; 19.5; 19.5 特寬版; 19.5 中等版型; 19.5 窄版; 19.5 標準版型; 19.5 寬版; 20; 20 特寬版; 20 中等版型; 20 窄版; 20 標準版型; 20 寬版; 20.5; 20.5 特寬版; 20.5 中等版型; 20.5 窄版; 20.5 標準版型; 20.5 寬版; 21; 21 特寬; 21 中等; 21 窄版; 21 標準; 21 寬版; 21.5; 21.5 特寬版; 21.5 中等版型; 21.5 窄版; 21.5 標準版型; 21.5 寬版; 22; 22 特寬; 22 中等; 22 窄版; 22 標準; 22 寬版; 22.5; 22.5 特寬; 22.5 中等; 22.5 窄版; 22.5 標準; 22.5 寬版; 23; 23 特寬; 23 中等; 23 窄版; 23 標準; 23 寬版; 23.5; 23.5 特寬; 23.5 中等; 23.5 窄版; 23.5 標準; 23.5 寬版; 24; 24 特寬; 24 中等; 24 窄版; 24 標準; 24 寬版; 24.5; 24.5 特寬; 24.5 中等; 24.5 窄版; 24.5 標準; 24.5 寬版; 25; 25 特寬; 25 中等; 25 窄版; 25 標準; 25 寬版; 25.5; 25.5 特寬; 25.5 中等; 25.5 窄版; 25.5 標準; 25.5 寬版; 26; 26 特寬; 26 中等; 26 窄版; 26 標準; 26 寬版; 26.5; 26.5 特寬; 26.5 中等; 26.5 窄版; 26.5 標準; 26.5 寬版; 27; 27 特寬; 27 中等; 27 窄版; 27 標準; 27 寬版; 27.5; 27.5 特寬; 27.5 中等; 27.5 窄版; 27.5 標準; 27.5 寬版; 28; 28 特寬; 28 中等; 28 窄版; 28 標準; 28 寬版; 28.5; 28.5 特寬; 28.5 中等; 28.5 窄版; 28.5 標準; 28.5 寬版; 29; 29 特寬; 29 中等; 29 窄版; 29 標準; 29 寬版; 29.5; 29.5 特寬; 29.5 中等; 29.5 窄版; 29.5 標準; 29.5 寬版; 30; 30 特寬; 30 中等; 30 窄版; 30 標準; 30 寬版; 30.5; 30.5 特寬; 30.5 中等; 30.5 窄版; 30.5 標準; 30.5 寬版; 31; 31 特寬; 31 中等; 31 窄版; 31 標準; 31 寬版; 31.5; 31.5 特寬; 31.5 中等; 31.5 窄版; 31.5 標準; 31.5 寬版; 32; 32 特寬; 32 中等; 32 窄版; 32 標準; 32 寬版; 32.5; 32.5 特寬; 32.5 中等; 32.5 窄版; 32.5 標準; 32.5 寬版; 33; 33 特寬; 33 中等; 33 窄版; 33 標準; 33 寬版; 33.5; 33.5 特寬; 33.5 中等; 33.5 窄版; 33.5 標準; 33.5 寬版; 34; 34 特寬; 34 中等; 34 窄版; 34 標準; 34 寬版; 34.5; 34.5 特寬; 34.5 中等; 34.5 窄版; 34.5 標準; 34.5 寬版; 35; 35 特寬; 35 中等; 35 窄版; 35 標準; 35 寬版; 35.5; 35.5 特寬; 35.5 中等; 35.5 窄版; 35.5 標準; 35.5 寬版; 36; 36 特寬; 36 中等; 36 窄版; 36 標準; 36 寬版; 36.5; 36.5 特寬; 36.5 中等; 36.5 窄版; 36.5 標準; 36.5 寬版; 37; 37 特寬; 37 中等; 37 窄版; 37 標準; 37 寬版; 37.5; 37.5 特寬; 37.5 中等; 37.5 窄版; 37.5 標準; 37.5 寬版; 38; 38 特寬; 38 中等; 38 窄版; 38 標準; 38 寬版; 38.5; 38.5 特寬; 38.5 中等; 38.5 窄版; 38.5 標準; 38.5 寬版; 39; 39 特寬; 39 中等; 39 窄版; 39 標準; 39 寬版; 39.5; 39.5 特寬; 39.5 中等; 39.5 窄版; 39.5 標準; 39.5 寬版; 40; 40 特寬; 40 中等; 40 窄版; 40 標準; 40 寬版; 40.5; 40.5 特寬; 40.5 中等; 40.5 窄版; 40.5 標準; 40.5 寬版; 41; 41 特寬; 41 中等; 41 窄版; 41 標準; 41 寬版; 41.5; 41.5 特寬; 41.5 中等; 41.5 窄版; 41.5 標準; 41.5 寬版; 42; 42 特寬; 42 中等; 42 窄版; 42 標準; 42 寬版; 42.5; 42.5 特寬; 42.5 中等; 42.5 窄版; 42.5 標準; 42.5 寬版; 43; 43 特寬; 43 中等; 43 窄版; 43 標準; 43 寬版; 43.5; 43.5 特寬; 43.5 中等; 43.5 窄版; 43.5 標準; 43.5 寬版; 44; 44 特寬; 44 中等; 44 窄版; 44 標準; 44 寬版; 44.5; 44.5 特寬; 44.5 中等; 44.5 窄版; 44.5 標準; 44.5 寬版; 45; 45 特寬; 45 中等; 45 窄版; 45 標準; 45 寬版; 45.5; 45.5 特寬; 45.5 中等; 45.5 窄版; 45.5 標準; 45.5 寬版; 46; 46 特寬; 46 中等; 46 窄版; 46 標準; 46 寬版; 46.5; 46.5 特寬; 46.5 中等; 46.5 窄版; 46.5 標準; 46.5 寬版; 47; 47 特寬; 47 中等; 47 窄版; 47 標準; 47 寬版; 47.5; 47.5 特寬; 47.5 中等; 47.5 窄版; 47.5 標準; 47.5 寬版; 48; 48 特寬; 48 中等; 48 窄版; 48 標準; 48 寬版; 48.5; 48.5 特寬; 48.5 中等; 48.5 窄版; 48.5 標準; 48.5 寬版; 49; 49 特寬; 49 中等; 49 窄版; 49 標準; 49 寬版; 49.5; 49.5 特寬; 49.5 中等; 49.5 窄版; 49.5 標準; 49.5 寬版; 50; 50 特寬; 50 中等; 50 窄版; 50 標準; 50 寬版; 50.5; 50.5 特寬; 50.5 中等; 50.5 窄版; 50.5 標準; 50.5 寬版; 51; 51 特寬; 51 中等; 51 窄版; 51 標準; 51 寬版; 51.5; 51.5 特寬; 51.5 中等; 51.5 窄版; 51.5 標準; 51.5 寬版; 52; 52 特寬; 52 中等; 52 窄版; 52 標準; 52 寬版; 其他
sk-SK: Veľkosť topánok v EÚ: 15; 15 extra široké; 15 stredné; 15 úzke; 15 štandardné; 15 široké; 15,5; 15,5 extra široké; 15,5 stredné; 15,5 úzke; 15,5 štandardné; 15,5 široké; 16; 16 extra široké; 16 stredné; 16 úzke; 16 štandardné; 16 široké; 16,5; 16,5 extra široké; 16,5 stredné; 16,5 úzke; 16,5 štandardné; 16,5 široké; 17; 17 extra široké; 17 stredné; 17 úzke; 17 štandardné; 17 široké; 17,5; 17,5 extra široké; 17,5 stredné; 17,5 úzke; 17,5 štandardné; 17,5 široké; 18; 18 extra široké; 18 stredné; 18 úzke; 18 štandardné; 18 široké; 18,5; 18,5 extra široké; 18,5 stredné; 18,5 úzke; 18,5 štandardné; 18,5 široké; 19; 19 extra široké; 19 stredné; 19 úzke; 19 štandardné; 19 široké; 19,5; 19,5 extra široké; 19,5 stredné; 19,5 úzke; 19,5 štandardné; 19,5 široké; 20; 20 extra široké; 20 stredné; 20 úzke; 20 štandardné; 20 široké; 20,5; 20,5 extra široké; 20,5 stredné; 20,5 úzke; 20,5 štandardné; 20,5 široké; 21; 21 extra široké; 21 stredné; 21 úzke; 21 štandardné; 21 široké; 21,5; 21,5 extra široké; 21,5 stredné; 21,5 úzke; 21,5 štandardné; 21,5 široké; 22; 22 extra široké; 22 stredné; 22 úzke; 22 štandardné; 22 široké; 22,5; 22,5 extra široké; 22,5 stredné; 22,5 úzke; 22,5 štandardné; 22,5 široké; 23; 23 extra široké; 23 stredné; 23 úzke; 23 štandardné; 23 široké; 23,5; 23,5 extra široké; 23,5 stredné; 23,5 úzke; 23,5 štandardné; 23,5 široké; 24; 24 extra široké; 24 stredné; 24 úzke; 24 štandardné; 24 široké; 24,5; 24,5 extra široké; 24,5 stredné; 24,5 úzke; 24,5 štandardné; 24,5 široké; 25; 25 extra široké; 25 stredné; 25 úzke; 25 štandardné; 25 široké; 25,5; 25,5 extra široké; 25,5 stredné; 25,5 úzke; 25,5 štandardné; 25,5 široké; 26; 26 extra široké; 26 stredné; 26 úzke; 26 štandardné; 26 široké; 26,5; 26,5 extra široké; 26,5 stredné; 26,5 úzke; 26,5 štandardné; 26,5 široké; 27; 27 extra široké; 27 stredné; 27 úzke; 27 štandardné; 27 široké; 27,5; 27,5 extra široké; 27,5 stredné; 27,5 úzke; 27,5 štandardné; 27,5 široké; 28; 28 extra široké; 28 stredné; 28 úzke; 28 štandardné; 28 široké; 28,5; 28,5 extra široké; 28,5 stredné; 28,5 úzke; 28,5 štandardné; 28,5 široké; 29; 29 extra široké; 29 stredné; 29 úzke; 29 štandardné; 29 široké; 29,5; 29,5 extra široké; 29,5 stredné; 29,5 úzke; 29,5 štandardné; 29,5 široké; 30; 30 extra široké; 30 stredné; 30 úzke; 30 štandardné; 30 široké; 30,5; 30,5 extra široké; 30,5 stredné; 30,5 úzke; 30,5 štandardné; 30,5 široké; 31; 31 extra široké; 31 stredné; 31 úzke; 31 štandardné; 31 široké; 31,5; 31,5 extra široké; 31,5 stredné; 31,5 úzke; 31,5 štandardné; 31,5 široké; 32; 32 extra široké; 32 stredné; 32 úzke; 32 štandardné; 32 široké; 32,5; 32,5 extra široké; 32,5 stredné; 32,5 úzke; 32,5 štandardné; 32,5 široké; 33; 33 extra široké; 33 stredné; 33 úzke; 33 štandardné; 33 široké; 33,5; 33,5 extra široké; 33,5 stredné; 33,5 úzke; 33,5 štandardné; 33,5 široké; 34; 34 extra široké; 34 stredné; 34 úzke; 34 štandardné; 34 široké; 34,5; 34,5 extra široké; 34,5 stredné; 34,5 úzke; 34,5 štandardné; 34,5 široké; 35; 35 extra široké; 35 stredné; 35 úzke; 35 štandardné; 35 široké; 35,5; 35,5 extra široké; 35,5 stredné; 35,5 úzke; 35,5 štandardné; 35,5 široké; 36; 36 extra široké; 36 stredné; 36 úzke; 36 štandardné; 36 široké; 36,5; 36,5 extra široké; 36,5 stredné; 36,5 úzke; 36,5 štandardné; 36,5 široké; 37; 37 extra široké; 37 stredné; 37 úzke; 37 štandardné; 37 široké; 37,5; 37,5 extra široké; 37,5 stredné; 37,5 úzke; 37,5 štandardné; 37,5 široké; 38; 38 extra široké; 38 stredné; 38 úzke; 38 štandardné; 38 široké; 38,5; 38,5 extra široké; 38,5 stredné; 38,5 úzke; 38,5 štandardné; 38,5 široké; 39; 39 extra široké; 39 stredné; 39 úzke; 39 štandardné; 39 široké; 39,5; 39,5 extra široké; 39,5 stredné; 39,5 úzke; 39,5 štandardné; 39,5 široké; 40; 40 extra široké; 40 stredné; 40 úzke; 40 štandardné; 40 široké; 40,5; 40,5 extra široké; 40,5 stredné; 40,5 úzke; 40,5 štandardné; 40,5 široké; 41; 41 extra široké; 41 stredné; 41 úzke; 41 štandardné; 41 široké; 41,5; 41,5 extra široké; 41,5 stredné; 41,5 úzke; 41,5 štandardné; 41,5 široké; 42; 42 extra široké; 42 stredné; 42 úzke; 42 štandardné; 42 široké; 42,5; 42,5 extra široké; 42,5 stredné; 42,5 úzke; 42,5 štandardné; 42,5 široké; 43; 43 extra široké; 43 stredné; 43 úzke; 43 štandardné; 43 široké; 43,5; 43,5 extra široké; 43,5 stredné; 43,5 úzke; 43,5 štandardné; 43,5 široké; 44; 44 extra široké; 44 stredné; 44 úzke; 44 štandardné; 44 široké; 44,5; 44,5 extra široké; 44,5 stredné; 44,5 úzke; 44,5 štandardné; 44,5 široké; 45; 45 extra široké; 45 stredné; 45 úzke; 45 štandardné; 45 široké; 45,5; 45,5 extra široké; 45,5 stredné; 45,5 úzke; 45,5 štandardné; 45,5 široké; 46; 46 extra široké; 46 stredné; 46 úzke; 46 štandardné; 46 široké; 46,5; 46,5 extra široké; 46,5 stredné; 46,5 úzke; 46,5 štandardné; 46,5 široké; 47; 47 extra široké; 47 stredné; 47 úzke; 47 štandardné; 47 široké; 47,5; 47,5 extra široké; 47,5 stredné; 47,5 úzke; 47,5 štandardné; 47,5 široké; 48; 48 extra široké; 48 stredné; 48 úzke; 48 štandardné; 48 široké; 48,5; 48,5 extra široké; 48,5 stredné; 48,5 úzke; 48,5 štandardné; 48,5 široké; 49; 49 extra široké; 49 stredné; 49 úzke; 49 štandardné; 49 široké; 49,5; 49,5 extra široké; 49,5 stredné; 49,5 úzke; 49,5 štandardné; 49,5 široké; 50; 50 extra široké; 50 stredné; 50 úzke; 50 štandardné; 50 široké; 50,5; 50,5 extra široké; 50,5 stredné; 50,5 úzke; 50,5 štandardné; 50,5 široké; 51; 51 extra široké; 51 stredné; 51 úzke; 51 štandardné; 51 široké; 51,5; 51,5 extra široké; 51,5 stredné; 51,5 úzke; 51,5 štandardné; 51,5 široké; 52; 52 extra široké; 52 stredné; 52 úzke; 52 štandardné; 52 široké; Iné
tr: AB ayakkabı numarası: 15; 15 Ekstra geniş; 15 Orta; 15 Dar; 15 Standart; 15 Geniş; 15,5; 15,5 Ekstra geniş; 15,5 Orta; 15,5 Dar; 15,5 Standart; 15,5 Geniş; 16; 16 Ekstra geniş; 16 Orta; 16 Dar; 16 Standart; 16 Geniş; 16,5; 16,5 Ekstra geniş; 16,5 Orta; 16,5 Dar; 16,5 Standart; 16,5 Geniş; 17; 17 Ekstra geniş; 17 Orta; 17 Dar; 17 Standart; 17 Geniş; 17,5; 17,5 Ekstra geniş; 17,5 Orta; 17,5 Dar; 17,5 Standart; 17,5 Geniş; 18; 18 Ekstra geniş; 18 Orta; 18 Dar; 18 Standart; 18 Geniş; 18,5; 18,5 Ekstra geniş; 18,5 Orta; 18,5 Dar; 18,5 Standart; 18,5 Geniş; 19; 19 Ekstra geniş; 19 Orta; 19 Dar; 19 Standart; 19 Geniş; 19,5; 19,5 Ekstra geniş; 19,5 Orta; 19,5 Dar; 19,5 Standart; 19,5 Geniş; 20; 20 Ekstra geniş; 20 Orta; 20 Dar; 20 Standart; 20 Geniş; 20,5; 20,5 Ekstra geniş; 20,5 Orta; 20,5 Dar; 20,5 Standart; 20,5 Geniş; 21; 21 Ekstra geniş; 21 Orta; 21 Dar; 21 Standart; 21 Geniş; 21,5; 21,5 Ekstra geniş; 21,5 Orta; 21,5 Dar; 21,5 Standart; 21,5 Geniş; 22; 22 Ekstra geniş; 22 Orta; 22 Dar; 22 Standart; 22 Geniş; 22,5; 22,5 Ekstra geniş; 22,5 Orta; 22,5 Dar; 22,5 Standart; 22,5 Geniş; 23; 23 Ekstra geniş; 23 Orta; 23 Dar; 23 Standart; 23 Geniş; 23,5; 23,5 Ekstra geniş; 23,5 Orta; 23,5 Dar; 23,5 Standart; 23,5 Geniş; 24; 24 Ekstra geniş; 24 Orta; 24 Dar; 24 Standart; 24 Geniş; 24,5; 24,5 Ekstra geniş; 24,5 Orta; 24,5 Dar; 24,5 Standart; 24,5 Geniş; 25; 25 Ekstra geniş; 25 Orta; 25 Dar; 25 Standart; 25 Geniş; 25,5; 25,5 Ekstra geniş; 25,5 Orta; 25,5 Dar; 25,5 Standart; 25,5 Geniş; 26; 26 Ekstra geniş; 26 Orta; 26 Dar; 26 Standart; 26 Geniş; 26,5; 26,5 Ekstra geniş; 26,5 Orta; 26,5 Dar; 26,5 Standart; 26,5 Geniş; 27; 27 Ekstra geniş; 27 Orta; 27 Dar; 27 Standart; 27 Geniş; 27,5; 27,5 Ekstra geniş; 27,5 Orta; 27,5 Dar; 27,5 Standart; 27,5 Geniş; 28; 28 Ekstra geniş; 28 Orta; 28 Dar; 28 Standart; 28 Geniş; 28,5; 28,5 Ekstra geniş; 28,5 Orta; 28,5 Dar; 28,5 Standart; 28,5 Geniş; 29; 29 Ekstra geniş; 29 Orta; 29 Dar; 29 Standart; 29 Geniş; 29,5; 29,5 Ekstra geniş; 29,5 Orta; 29,5 Dar; 29,5 Standart; 29,5 Geniş; 30; 30 Ekstra geniş; 30 Orta; 30 Dar; 30 Standart; 30 Geniş; 30,5; 30,5 Ekstra geniş; 30,5 Orta; 30,5 Dar; 30,5 Standart; 30,5 Geniş; 31; 31 Ekstra geniş; 31 Orta; 31 Dar; 31 Standart; 31 Geniş; 31,5; 31,5 Ekstra geniş; 31,5 Orta; 31,5 Dar; 31,5 Standart; 31,5 Geniş; 32; 32 Ekstra geniş; 32 Orta; 32 Dar; 32 Standart; 32 Geniş; 32,5; 32,5 Ekstra geniş; 32,5 Orta; 32,5 Dar; 32,5 Standart; 32,5 Geniş; 33; 33 Ekstra geniş; 33 Orta; 33 Dar; 33 Standart; 33 Geniş; 33,5; 33,5 Ekstra geniş; 33,5 Orta; 33,5 Dar; 33,5 Standart; 33,5 Geniş; 34; 34 Ekstra geniş; 34 Orta; 34 Dar; 34 Standart; 34 Geniş; 34,5; 34,5 Ekstra geniş; 34,5 Orta; 34,5 Dar; 34,5 Standart; 34,5 Geniş; 35; 35 Ekstra geniş; 35 Orta; 35 Dar; 35 Standart; 35 Geniş; 35,5; 35,5 Ekstra geniş; 35,5 Orta; 35,5 Dar; 35,5 Standart; 35,5 Geniş; 36; 36 Ekstra geniş; 36 Orta; 36 Dar; 36 Standart; 36 Geniş; 36,5; 36,5 Ekstra geniş; 36,5 Orta; 36,5 Dar; 36,5 Standart; 36,5 Geniş; 37; 37 Ekstra geniş; 37 Orta; 37 Dar; 37 Standart; 37 Geniş; 37,5; 37,5 Ekstra geniş; 37,5 Orta; 37,5 Dar; 37,5 Standart; 37,5 Geniş; 38; 38 Ekstra geniş; 38 Orta; 38 Dar; 38 Standart; 38 Geniş; 38,5; 38,5 Ekstra geniş; 38,5 Orta; 38,5 Dar; 38,5 Standart; 38,5 Geniş; 39; 39 Ekstra geniş; 39 Orta; 39 Dar; 39 Standart; 39 Geniş; 39,5; 39,5 Ekstra geniş; 39,5 Orta; 39,5 Dar; 39,5 Standart; 39,5 Geniş; 40; 40 Ekstra geniş; 40 Orta; 40 Dar; 40 Standart; 40 Geniş; 40,5; 40,5 Ekstra geniş; 40,5 Orta; 40,5 Dar; 40,5 Standart; 40,5 Geniş; 41; 41 Ekstra geniş; 41 Orta; 41 Dar; 41 Standart; 41 Geniş; 41,5; 41,5 Ekstra geniş; 41,5 Orta; 41,5 Dar; 41,5 Standart; 41,5 Geniş; 42; 42 Ekstra geniş; 42 Orta; 42 Dar; 42 Standart; 42 Geniş; 42,5; 42,5 Ekstra geniş; 42,5 Orta; 42,5 Dar; 42,5 Standart; 42,5 Geniş; 43; 43 Ekstra geniş; 43 Orta; 43 Dar; 43 Standart; 43 Geniş; 43,5; 43,5 Ekstra geniş; 43,5 Orta; 43,5 Dar; 43,5 Standart; 43,5 Geniş; 44; 44 Ekstra geniş; 44 Orta; 44 Dar; 44 Standart; 44 Geniş; 44,5; 44,5 Ekstra geniş; 44,5 Orta; 44,5 Dar; 44,5 Standart; 44,5 Geniş; 45; 45 Ekstra geniş; 45 Orta; 45 Dar; 45 Standart; 45 Geniş; 45,5; 45,5 Ekstra geniş; 45,5 Orta; 45,5 Dar; 45,5 Standart; 45,5 Geniş; 46; 46 Ekstra geniş; 46 Orta; 46 Dar; 46 Standart; 46 Geniş; 46,5; 46,5 Ekstra geniş; 46,5 Orta; 46,5 Dar; 46,5 Standart; 46,5 Geniş; 47; 47 Ekstra geniş; 47 Orta; 47 Dar; 47 Standart; 47 Geniş; 47,5; 47,5 Ekstra geniş; 47,5 Orta; 47,5 Dar; 47,5 Standart; 47,5 Geniş; 48; 48 Ekstra geniş; 48 Orta; 48 Dar; 48 Standart; 48 Geniş; 48,5; 48,5 Ekstra geniş; 48,5 Orta; 48,5 Dar; 48,5 Standart; 48,5 Geniş; 49; 49 Ekstra geniş; 49 Orta; 49 Dar; 49 Standart; 49 Geniş; 49,5; 49,5 Ekstra geniş; 49,5 Orta; 49,5 Dar; 49,5 Standart; 49,5 Geniş; 50; 50 Ekstra geniş; 50 Orta; 50 Dar; 50 Standart; 50 Geniş; 50,5; 50,5 Ekstra geniş; 50,5 Orta; 50,5 Dar; 50,5 Standart; 50,5 Geniş; 51; 51 Ekstra geniş; 51 Orta; 51 Dar; 51 Standart; 51 Geniş; 51,5; 51,5 Ekstra geniş; 51,5 Orta; 51,5 Dar; 51,5 Standart; 51,5 Geniş; 52; 52 Ekstra geniş; 52 Orta; 52 Dar; 52 Standart; 52 Geniş; Diğer
ro-RO: Dimensiuni încălțăminte UE: 15; 15 Foarte lat; 15 Mediu; 15 Îngust; 15 Standard; 15 Lat; 15,5; 15,5 Foarte lat; 15,5 Mediu; 15,5 Îngust; 15,5 Standard; 15,5 Lat; 16; 16 Foarte lat; 16 Mediu; 16 Îngust; 16 Standard; 16 Lat; 16,5; 16,5 Foarte lat; 16,5 Mediu; 16,5 Îngust; 16,5 Standard; 16,5 Lat; 17; 17 Foarte lat; 17 Mediu; 17 Îngust; 17 Standard; 17 Lat; 17,5; 17,5 Foarte lat; 17,5 Mediu; 17,5 Îngust; 17,5 Standard; 17,5 Lat; 18; 18 Foarte lat; 18 Mediu; 18 Îngust; 18 Standard; 18 Lat; 18,5; 18,5 Foarte lat; 18,5 Mediu; 18,5 Îngust; 18,5 Standard; 18,5 Lat; 19; 19 Foarte lat; 19 Mediu; 19 Îngust; 19 Standard; 19 Lat; 19,5; 19,5 Foarte lat; 19,5 Mediu; 19,5 Îngust; 19,5 Standard; 19,5 Lat; 20; 20 Foarte lat; 20 Mediu; 20 Îngust; 20 Standard; 20 Lat; 20,5; 20,5 Foarte lat; 20,5 Mediu; 20,5 Îngust; 20,5 Standard; 20,5 Lat; 21; 21 Foarte lat; 21 Mediu; 21 Îngust; 21 Standard; 21 Lat; 21,5; 21,5 Foarte lat; 21,5 Mediu; 21,5 Îngust; 21,5 Standard; 21,5 Lat; 22; 22 Foarte lat; 22 Mediu; 22 Îngust; 22 Standard; 22 Lat; 22,5; 22,5 Foarte lat; 22,5 Mediu; 22,5 Îngust; 22,5 Standard; 22,5 Lat; 23; 23 Foarte lat; 23 Mediu; 23 Îngust; 23 Standard; 23 Lat; 23,5; 23,5 Foarte lat; 23,5 Mediu; 23,5 Îngust; 23,5 Standard; 23,5 Lat; 24; 24 Foarte lat; 24 Mediu; 24 Îngust; 24 Standard; 24 Lat; 24,5; 24,5 Foarte lat; 24,5 Mediu; 24,5 Îngust; 24,5 Standard; 24,5 Lat; 25; 25 Foarte lat; 25 Mediu; 25 Îngust; 25 Standard; 25 Lat; 25,5; 25,5 Foarte lat; 25,5 Mediu; 25,5 Îngust; 25,5 Standard; 25,5 Lat; 26; 26 Foarte lat; 26 Mediu; 26 Îngust; 26 Standard; 26 Lat; 26,5; 26,5 Foarte lat; 26,5 Mediu; 26,5 Îngust; 26,5 Standard; 26,5 Lat; 27; 27 Foarte lat; 27 Mediu; 27 Îngust; 27 Standard; 27 Lat; 27,5; 27,5 Foarte lat; 27,5 Mediu; 27,5 Îngust; 27,5 Standard; 27,5 Lat; 28; 28 Foarte lat; 28 Mediu; 28 Îngust; 28 Standard; 28 Lat; 28,5; 28,5 Foarte lat; 28,5 Mediu; 28,5 Îngust; 28,5 Standard; 28,5 Lat; 29; 29 Foarte lat; 29 Mediu; 29 Îngust; 29 Standard; 29 Lat; 29,5; 29,5 Foarte lat; 29,5 Mediu; 29,5 Îngust; 29,5 Standard; 29,5 Lat; 30; 30 Foarte lat; 30 Mediu; 30 Îngust; 30 Standard; 30 Lat; 30,5; 30,5 Foarte lat; 30,5 Mediu; 30,5 Îngust; 30,5 Standard; 30,5 Lat; 31; 31 Foarte lat; 31 Mediu; 31 Îngust; 31 Standard; 31 Lat; 31,5; 31,5 Foarte lat; 31,5 Mediu; 31,5 Îngust; 31,5 Standard; 31,5 Lat; 32; 32 Foarte lat; 32 Mediu; 32 Îngust; 32 Standard; 32 Lat; 32,5; 32,5 Foarte lat; 32,5 Mediu; 32,5 Îngust; 32,5 Standard; 32,5 Lat; 33; 33 Foarte lat; 33 Mediu; 33 Îngust; 33 Standard; 33 Lat; 33,5; 33,5 Foarte lat; 33,5 Mediu; 33,5 Îngust; 33,5 Standard; 33,5 Lat; 34; 34 Foarte lat; 34 Mediu; 34 Îngust; 34 Standard; 34 Lat; 34,5; 34,5 Foarte lat; 34,5 Mediu; 34,5 Îngust; 34,5 Standard; 34,5 Lat; 35; 35 Foarte lat; 35 Mediu; 35 Îngust; 35 Standard; 35 Lat; 35,5; 35,5 Foarte lat; 35,5 Mediu; 35,5 Îngust; 35,5 Standard; 35,5 Lat; 36; 36 Foarte lat; 36 Mediu; 36 Îngust; 36 Standard; 36 Lat; 36,5; 36,5 Foarte lat; 36,5 Mediu; 36,5 Îngust; 36,5 Standard; 36,5 Lat; 37; 37 Foarte lat; 37 Mediu; 37 Îngust; 37 Standard; 37 Lat; 37,5; 37,5 Foarte lat; 37,5 Mediu; 37,5 Îngust; 37,5 Standard; 37,5 Lat; 38; 38 Foarte lat; 38 Mediu; 38 Îngust; 38 Standard; 38 Lat; 38,5; 38,5 Foarte lat; 38,5 Mediu; 38,5 Îngust; 38,5 Standard; 38,5 Lat; 39; 39 Extra lat; 39 Mediu; 39 Îngust; 39 Standard; 39 Lat; 39,5; 39,5 Extra lat; 39,5 Mediu; 39,5 Îngust; 39,5 Standard; 39,5 Lat; 40; 40 Extra lat; 40 Mediu; 40 Îngust; 40 Standard; 40 Lat; 40,5; 40,5 Extra lat; 40,5 Mediu; 40,5 Îngust; 40,5 Standard; 40,5 Lat; 41; 41 Extra lat; 41 Mediu; 41 Îngust; 41 Standard; 41 Lat; 41,5; 41,5 Extra lat; 41,5 Mediu; 41,5 Îngust; 41,5 Standard; 41,5 Lat; 42; 42 Extra lat; 42 Mediu; 42 Îngust; 42 Standard; 42 Lat; 42,5; 42,5 Extra lat; 42,5 Mediu; 42,5 Îngust; 42,5 Standard; 42,5 Lat; 43; 43 Extra lat; 43 Mediu; 43 Îngust; 43 Standard; 43 Lat; 43,5; 43,5 Extra lat; 43,5 Mediu; 43,5 Îngust; 43,5 Standard; 43,5 Lat; 44; 44 Extra lat; 44 Mediu; 44 Îngust; 44 Standard; 44 Lat; 44,5; 44,5 Extra lat; 44,5 Mediu; 44,5 Îngust; 44,5 Standard; 44,5 Lat; 45; 45 Extra lat; 45 Mediu; 45 Îngust; 45 Standard; 45 Lat; 45,5; 45,5 Extra lat; 45,5 Mediu; 45,5 Îngust; 45,5 Standard; 45,5 Lat; 46; 46 Extra lat; 46 Mediu; 46 Îngust; 46 Standard; 46 Lat; 46,5; 46,5 Extra lat; 46,5 Mediu; 46,5 Îngust; 46,5 Standard; 46,5 Lat; 47; 47 Extra lat; 47 Mediu; 47 Îngust; 47 Standard; 47 Lat; 47,5; 47,5 Extra lat; 47,5 Mediu; 47,5 Îngust; 47,5 Standard; 47,5 Lat; 48; 48 Extra lat; 48 Mediu; 48 Îngust; 48 Standard; 48 Lat; 48,5; 48,5 Extra lat; 48,5 Mediu; 48,5 Îngust; 48,5 Standard; 48,5 Lat; 49; 49 Extra lat; 49 Mediu; 49 Îngust; 49 Standard; 49 Lat; 49,5; 49,5 Extra lat; 49,5 Mediu; 49,5 Îngust; 49,5 Standard; 49,5 Lat; 50; 50 Extra lat; 50 Mediu; 50 Îngust; 50 Standard; 50 Lat; 50,5; 50,5 Extra lat; 50,5 Mediu; 50,5 Îngust; 50,5 Standard; 50,5 Lat; 51; 51 Extra lat; 51 Mediu; 51 Îngust; 51 Standard; 51 Lat; 51,5; 51,5 Extra lat; 51,5 Mediu; 51,5 Îngust; 51,5 Standard; 51,5 Lat; 52; 52 Extra lat; 52 Mediu; 52 Îngust; 52 Standard; 52 Lat; Altele
cs: Velikost boty v EU: 15; 15 extra široké; 15 střední; 15 úzké; 15 standardní; 15 široké; 15,5; 15,5 extra široké; 15,5 střední; 15,5 úzké; 15,5 standardní; 15,5 široké; 16; 16 extra široké; 16 střední; 16 úzké; 16 standardní; 16 široké; 16,5; 16,5 extra široké; 16,5 střední; 16,5 úzké; 16,5 standardní; 16,5 široké; 17; 17 extra široké; 17 střední; 17 úzké; 17 standardní; 17 široké; 17,5; 17,5 extra široké; 17,5 střední; 17,5 úzké; 17,5 standardní; 17,5 široké; 18; 18 extra široké; 18 střední; 18 úzké; 18 standardní; 18 široké; 18,5; 18,5 extra široké; 18,5 střední; 18,5 úzké; 18,5 standardní; 18,5 široké; 19; 19 extra široké; 19 střední; 19 úzké; 19 standardní; 19 široké; 19,5; 19,5 extra široké; 19,5 střední; 19,5 úzké; 19,5 standardní; 19,5 široké; 20; 20 extra široké; 20 střední; 20 úzké; 20 standardní; 20 široké; 20,5; 20,5 extra široké; 20,5 střední; 20,5 úzké; 20,5 standardní; 20,5 široké; 21; 21 extra široké; 21 střední; 21 úzké; 21 standardní; 21 široké; 21,5; 21,5 extra široké; 21,5 střední; 21,5 úzké; 21,5 standardní; 21,5 široké; 22; 22 extra široké; 22 střední; 22 úzké; 22 standardní; 22 široké; 22,5; 22,5 extra široké; 22,5 střední; 22,5 úzké; 22,5 standardní; 22,5 široké; 23; 23 extra široké; 23 střední; 23 úzké; 23 standardní; 23 široké; 23,5; 23,5 extra široké; 23,5 střední; 23,5 úzké; 23,5 standardní; 23,5 široké; 24; 24 extra široké; 24 střední; 24 úzké; 24 standardní; 24 široké; 24,5; 24,5 extra široké; 24,5 střední; 24,5 úzké; 24,5 standardní; 24,5 široké; 25; 25 extra široké; 25 střední; 25 úzké; 25 standardní; 25 široké; 25,5; 25,5 extra široké; 25,5 střední; 25,5 úzké; 25,5 standardní; 25,5 široké; 26; 26 extra široké; 26 střední; 26 úzké; 26 standardní; 26 široké; 26,5; 26,5 extra široké; 26,5 střední; 26,5 úzké; 26,5 standardní; 26,5 široké; 27; 27 extra široké; 27 střední; 27 úzké; 27 standardní; 27 široké; 27,5; 27,5 extra široké; 27,5 střední; 27,5 úzké; 27,5 standardní; 27,5 široké; 28; 28 extra široké; 28 střední; 28 úzké; 28 standardní; 28 široké; 28,5; 28,5 extra široké; 28,5 střední; 28,5 úzké; 28,5 standardní; 28,5 široké; 29; 29 extra široké; 29 střední; 29 úzké; 29 standardní; 29 široké; 29,5; 29,5 extra široké; 29,5 střední; 29,5 úzké; 29,5 standardní; 29,5 široké; 30; 30 extra široké; 30 střední; 30 úzké; 30 standardní; 30 široké; 30,5; 30,5 extra široké; 30,5 střední; 30,5 úzké; 30,5 standardní; 30,5 široké; 31; 31 extra široké; 31 střední; 31 úzké; 31 standardní; 31 široké; 31,5; 31,5 extra široké; 31,5 střední; 31,5 úzké; 31,5 standardní; 31,5 široké; 32; 32 extra široké; 32 střední; 32 úzké; 32 standardní; 32 široké; 32,5; 32,5 extra široké; 32,5 střední; 32,5 úzké; 32,5 standardní; 32,5 široké; 33; 33 extra široké; 33 střední; 33 úzké; 33 standardní; 33 široké; 33,5; 33,5 extra široké; 33,5 střední; 33,5 úzké; 33,5 standardní; 33,5 široké; 34; 34 extra široké; 34 střední; 34 úzké; 34 standardní; 34 široké; 34,5; 34,5 extra široké; 34,5 střední; 34,5 úzké; 34,5 standardní; 34,5 široké; 35; 35 extra široké; 35 střední; 35 úzké; 35 standardní; 35 široké; 35,5; 35,5 extra široké; 35,5 střední; 35,5 úzké; 35,5 standardní; 35,5 široké; 36; 36 extra široké; 36 střední; 36 úzké; 36 standardní; 36 široké; 36,5; 36,5 extra široké; 36,5 střední; 36,5 úzké; 36,5 standardní; 36,5 široké; 37; 37 extra široké; 37 střední; 37 úzké; 37 standardní; 37 široké; 37,5; 37,5 extra široké; 37,5 střední; 37,5 úzké; 37,5 standardní; 37,5 široké; 38; 38 extra široké; 38 střední; 38 úzké; 38 standardní; 38 široké; 38,5; 38,5 extra široké; 38,5 střední; 38,5 úzké; 38,5 standardní; 38,5 široké; 39; 39 extra široké; 39 střední; 39 úzké; 39 standardní; 39 široké; 39,5; 39,5 extra široké; 39,5 střední; 39,5 úzké; 39,5 standardní; 39,5 široké; 40; 40 extra široké; 40 střední; 40 úzké; 40 standardní; 40 široké; 40,5; 40,5 extra široké; 40,5 střední; 40,5 úzké; 40,5 standardní; 40,5 široké; 41; 41 extra široké; 41 střední; 41 úzké; 41 standardní; 41 široké; 41,5; 41,5 extra široké; 41,5 střední; 41,5 úzké; 41,5 standardní; 41,5 široké; 42; 42 extra široké; 42 střední; 42 úzké; 42 standardní; 42 široké; 42,5; 42,5 extra široké; 42,5 střední; 42,5 úzké; 42,5 standardní; 42,5 široké; 43; 43 extra široké; 43 střední; 43 úzké; 43 standardní; 43 široké; 43,5; 43,5 extra široké; 43,5 střední; 43,5 úzké; 43,5 standardní; 43,5 široké; 44; 44 extra široké; 44 střední; 44 úzké; 44 standardní; 44 široké; 44,5; 44,5 extra široké; 44,5 střední; 44,5 úzké; 44,5 standardní; 44,5 široké; 45; 45 extra široké; 45 střední; 45 úzké; 45 standardní; 45 široké; 45,5; 45,5 extra široké; 45,5 střední; 45,5 úzké; 45,5 standardní; 45,5 široké; 46; 46 extra široké; 46 střední; 46 úzké; 46 standardní; 46 široké; 46,5; 46,5 extra široké; 46,5 střední; 46,5 úzké; 46,5 standardní; 46,5 široké; 47; 47 extra široké; 47 střední; 47 úzké; 47 standardní; 47 široké; 47,5; 47,5 extra široké; 47,5 střední; 47,5 úzké; 47,5 standardní; 47,5 široké; 48; 48 extra široké; 48 střední; 48 úzké; 48 standardní; 48 široké; 48,5; 48,5 extra široké; 48,5 střední; 48,5 úzké; 48,5 standardní; 48,5 široké; 49; 49 extra široké; 49 střední; 49 úzké; 49 standardní; 49 široké; 49,5; 49,5 extra široké; 49,5 střední; 49,5 úzké; 49,5 standardní; 49,5 široké; 50; 50 extra široké; 50 střední; 50 úzké; 50 standardní; 50 široké; 50,5; 50,5 extra široké; 50,5 střední; 50,5 úzké; 50,5 standardní; 50,5 široké; 51; 51 extra široké; 51 střední; 51 úzké; 51 standardní; 51 široké; 51,5; 51,5 extra široké; 51,5 střední; 51,5 úzké; 51,5 standardní; 51,5 široké; 52; 52 extra široké; 52 střední; 52 úzké; 52 standardní; 52 široké; Ostatní
da: EU-skostørrelse: 15; 15 ekstra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 ekstra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 ekstra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 16,5; 16,5 ekstra bred; 16,5 medium; 16,5 smal; 16,5 standard; 16,5 bred; 17; 17 ekstra bred; 17 medium; 17 smal; 17 standard; 17 bred; 17,5; 17,5 ekstra bred; 17,5 medium; 17,5 smal; 17,5 standard; 17,5 bred; 18; 18 ekstra bred; 18 medium; 18 smal; 18 standard; 18 bred; 18,5; 18,5 ekstra bred; 18,5 medium; 18,5 smal; 18,5 standard; 18,5 bred; 19; 19 ekstra bred; 19 medium; 19 smal; 19 standard; 19 bred; 19,5; 19,5 ekstra bred; 19,5 medium; 19,5 smal; 19,5 standard; 19,5 bred; 20; 20 ekstra bred; 20 medium; 20 smal; 20 standard; 20 bred; 20,5; 20,5 ekstra bred; 20,5 medium; 20,5 smal; 20,5 standard; 20,5 bred; 21; 21 ekstra bred; 21 medium; 21 smal; 21 standard; 21 bred; 21,5; 21,5 ekstra bred; 21,5 medium; 21,5 smal; 21,5 standard; 21,5 bred; 22; 22 ekstra bred; 22 medium; 22 smal; 22 standard; 22 bred; 22,5; 22,5 ekstra bred; 22,5 medium; 22,5 smal; 22,5 standard; 22,5 bred; 23; 23 ekstra bred; 23 medium; 23 smal; 23 standard; 23 bred; 23,5; 23,5 ekstra bred; 23,5 medium; 23,5 smal; 23,5 standard; 23,5 bred; 24; 24 ekstra bred; 24 medium; 24 smal; 24 standard; 24 bred; 24,5; 24,5 ekstra bred; 24,5 medium; 24,5 smal; 24,5 standard; 24,5 bred; 25; 25 ekstra bred; 25 medium; 25 smal; 25 standard; 25 bred; 25,5; 25,5 ekstra bred; 25,5 medium; 25,5 smal; 25,5 standard; 25,5 bred; 26; 26 ekstra bred; 26 medium; 26 smal; 26 standard; 26 bred; 26,5; 26,5 ekstra bred; 26,5 medium; 26,5 smal; 26,5 standard; 26,5 bred; 27; 27 ekstra bred; 27 medium; 27 smal; 27 standard; 27 bred; 27,5; 27,5 ekstra bred; 27,5 medium; 27,5 smal; 27,5 standard; 27,5 bred; 28; 28 ekstra bred; 28 medium; 28 smal; 28 standard; 28 bred; 28,5; 28,5 ekstra bred; 28,5 medium; 28,5 smal; 28,5 standard; 28,5 bred; 29; 29 ekstra bred; 29 medium; 29 smal; 29 standard; 29 bred; 29,5; 29,5 ekstra bred; 29,5 medium; 29,5 smal; 29,5 standard; 29,5 bred; 30; 30 ekstra bred; 30 medium; 30 smal; 30 standard; 30 bred; 30,5; 30,5 ekstra bred; 30,5 medium; 30,5 smal; 30,5 standard; 30,5 bred; 31; 31 ekstra bred; 31 medium; 31 smal; 31 standard; 31 bred; 31,5; 31,5 ekstra bred; 31,5 medium; 31,5 smal; 31,5 standard; 31,5 bred; 32; 32 ekstra bred; 32 medium; 32 smal; 32 standard; 32 bred; 32,5; 32,5 ekstra bred; 32,5 medium; 32,5 smal; 32,5 standard; 32,5 bred; 33; 33 ekstra bred; 33 medium; 33 smal; 33 standard; 33 bred; 33,5; 33,5 ekstra bred; 33,5 medium; 33,5 smal; 33,5 standard; 33,5 bred; 34; 34 ekstra bred; 34 medium; 34 smal; 34 standard; 34 bred; 34,5; 34,5 ekstra bred; 34,5 medium; 34,5 smal; 34,5 standard; 34,5 bred; 35; 35 ekstra bred; 35 medium; 35 smal; 35 standard; 35 bred; 35,5; 35,5 ekstra bred; 35,5 medium; 35,5 smal; 35,5 standard; 35,5 bred; 36; 36 ekstra bred; 36 medium; 36 smal; 36 standard; 36 bred; 36,5; 36,5 ekstra bred; 36,5 medium; 36,5 smal; 36,5 standard; 36,5 bred; 37; 37 ekstra bred; 37 medium; 37 smal; 37 standard; 37 bred; 37,5; 37,5 ekstra bred; 37,5 medium; 37,5 smal; 37,5 standard; 37,5 bred; 38; 38 ekstra bred; 38 medium; 38 smal; 38 standard; 38 bred; 38,5; 38,5 ekstra bred; 38,5 medium; 38,5 smal; 38,5 standard; 38,5 bred; 39; 39 ekstra bred; 39 medium; 39 smal; 39 standard; 39 bred; 39,5; 39,5 ekstra bred; 39,5 medium; 39,5 smal; 39,5 standard; 39,5 bred; 40; 40 ekstra bred; 40 medium; 40 smal; 40 standard; 40 bred; 40,5; 40,5 ekstra bred; 40,5 medium; 40,5 smal; 40,5 standard; 40,5 bred; 41; 41 ekstra bred; 41 medium; 41 smal; 41 standard; 41 bred; 41,5; 41,5 ekstra bred; 41,5 medium; 41,5 smal; 41,5 standard; 41,5 bred; 42; 42 ekstra bred; 42 medium; 42 smal; 42 standard; 42 bred; 42,5; 42,5 ekstra bred; 42,5 medium; 42,5 smal; 42,5 standard; 42,5 bred; 43; 43 ekstra bred; 43 medium; 43 smal; 43 standard; 43 bred; 43,5; 43,5 ekstra bred; 43,5 medium; 43,5 smal; 43,5 standard; 43,5 bred; 44; 44 ekstra bred; 44 medium; 44 smal; 44 standard; 44 bred; 44,5; 44,5 ekstra bred; 44,5 medium; 44,5 smal; 44,5 standard; 44,5 bred; 45; 45 ekstra bred; 45 medium; 45 smal; 45 standard; 45 bred; 45,5; 45,5 ekstra bred; 45,5 medium; 45,5 smal; 45,5 standard; 45,5 bred; 46; 46 ekstra bred; 46 medium; 46 smal; 46 standard; 46 bred; 46,5; 46,5 ekstra bred; 46,5 medium; 46,5 smal; 46,5 standard; 46,5 bred; 47; 47 ekstra bred; 47 medium; 47 smal; 47 standard; 47 bred; 47,5; 47,5 ekstra bred; 47,5 medium; 47,5 smal; 47,5 standard; 47,5 bred; 48; 48 ekstra bred; 48 medium; 48 smal; 48 standard; 48 bred; 48,5; 48,5 ekstra bred; 48,5 medium; 48,5 smal; 48,5 standard; 48,5 bred; 49; 49 ekstra bred; 49 medium; 49 smal; 49 standard; 49 bred; 49,5; 49,5 ekstra bred; 49,5 medium; 49,5 smal; 49,5 standard; 49,5 bred; 50; 50 ekstra bred; 50 medium; 50 smal; 50 standard; 50 bred; 50,5; 50,5 ekstra bred; 50,5 medium; 50,5 smal; 50,5 standard; 50,5 bred; 51; 51 ekstra bred; 51 medium; 51 smal; 51 standard; 51 bred; 51,5; 51,5 ekstra bred; 51,5 medium; 51,5 smal; 51,5 standard; 51,5 bred; 52; 52 ekstra bred; 52 medium; 52 smal; 52 standard; 52 bred; Andet
en: EU shoe size: 15; 15 Extra Wide; 15 Medium; 15 Narrow; 15 Standard; 15 Wide; 15.5; 15.5 Extra Wide; 15.5 Medium; 15.5 Narrow; 15.5 Standard; 15.5 Wide; 16; 16 Extra Wide; 16 Medium; 16 Narrow; 16 Standard; 16 Wide; 16.5; 16.5 Extra Wide; 16.5 Medium; 16.5 Narrow; 16.5 Standard; 16.5 Wide; 17; 17 Extra Wide; 17 Medium; 17 Narrow; 17 Standard; 17 Wide; 17.5; 17.5 Extra Wide; 17.5 Medium; 17.5 Narrow; 17.5 Standard; 17.5 Wide; 18; 18 Extra Wide; 18 Medium; 18 Narrow; 18 Standard; 18 Wide; 18.5; 18.5 Extra Wide; 18.5 Medium; 18.5 Narrow; 18.5 Standard; 18.5 Wide; 19; 19 Extra Wide; 19 Medium; 19 Narrow; 19 Standard; 19 Wide; 19.5; 19.5 Extra Wide; 19.5 Medium; 19.5 Narrow; 19.5 Standard; 19.5 Wide; 20; 20 Extra Wide; 20 Medium; 20 Narrow; 20 Standard; 20 Wide; 20.5; 20.5 Extra Wide; 20.5 Medium; 20.5 Narrow; 20.5 Standard; 20.5 Wide; 21; 21 Extra Wide; 21 Medium; 21 Narrow; 21 Standard; 21 Wide; 21.5; 21.5 Extra Wide; 21.5 Medium; 21.5 Narrow; 21.5 Standard; 21.5 Wide; 22; 22 Extra Wide; 22 Medium; 22 Narrow; 22 Standard; 22 Wide; 22.5; 22.5 Extra Wide; 22.5 Medium; 22.5 Narrow; 22.5 Standard; 22.5 Wide; 23; 23 Extra Wide; 23 Medium; 23 Narrow; 23 Standard; 23 Wide; 23.5; 23.5 Extra Wide; 23.5 Medium; 23.5 Narrow; 23.5 Standard; 23.5 Wide; 24; 24 Extra Wide; 24 Medium; 24 Narrow; 24 Standard; 24 Wide; 24.5; 24.5 Extra Wide; 24.5 Medium; 24.5 Narrow; 24.5 Standard; 24.5 Wide; 25; 25 Extra Wide; 25 Medium; 25 Narrow; 25 Standard; 25 Wide; 25.5; 25.5 Extra Wide; 25.5 Medium; 25.5 Narrow; 25.5 Standard; 25.5 Wide; 26; 26 Extra Wide; 26 Medium; 26 Narrow; 26 Standard; 26 Wide; 26.5; 26.5 Extra Wide; 26.5 Medium; 26.5 Narrow; 26.5 Standard; 26.5 Wide; 27; 27 Extra Wide; 27 Medium; 27 Narrow; 27 Standard; 27 Wide; 27.5; 27.5 Extra Wide; 27.5 Medium; 27.5 Narrow; 27.5 Standard; 27.5 Wide; 28; 28 Extra Wide; 28 Medium; 28 Narrow; 28 Standard; 28 Wide; 28.5; 28.5 Extra Wide; 28.5 Medium; 28.5 Narrow; 28.5 Standard; 28.5 Wide; 29; 29 Extra Wide; 29 Medium; 29 Narrow; 29 Standard; 29 Wide; 29.5; 29.5 Extra Wide; 29.5 Medium; 29.5 Narrow; 29.5 Standard; 29.5 Wide; 30; 30 Extra Wide; 30 Medium; 30 Narrow; 30 Standard; 30 Wide; 30.5; 30.5 Extra Wide; 30.5 Medium; 30.5 Narrow; 30.5 Standard; 30.5 Wide; 31; 31 Extra Wide; 31 Medium; 31 Narrow; 31 Standard; 31 Wide; 31.5; 31.5 Extra Wide; 31.5 Medium; 31.5 Narrow; 31.5 Standard; 31.5 Wide; 32; 32 Extra Wide; 32 Medium; 32 Narrow; 32 Standard; 32 Wide; 32.5; 32.5 Extra Wide; 32.5 Medium; 32.5 Narrow; 32.5 Standard; 32.5 Wide; 33; 33 Extra Wide; 33 Medium; 33 Narrow; 33 Standard; 33 Wide; 33.5; 33.5 Extra Wide; 33.5 Medium; 33.5 Narrow; 33.5 Standard; 33.5 Wide; 34; 34 Extra Wide; 34 Medium; 34 Narrow; 34 Standard; 34 Wide; 34.5; 34.5 Extra Wide; 34.5 Medium; 34.5 Narrow; 34.5 Standard; 34.5 Wide; 35; 35 Extra Wide; 35 Medium; 35 Narrow; 35 Standard; 35 Wide; 35.5; 35.5 Extra Wide; 35.5 Medium; 35.5 Narrow; 35.5 Standard; 35.5 Wide; 36; 36 Extra Wide; 36 Medium; 36 Narrow; 36 Standard; 36 Wide; 36.5; 36.5 Extra Wide; 36.5 Medium; 36.5 Narrow; 36.5 Standard; 36.5 Wide; 37; 37 Extra Wide; 37 Medium; 37 Narrow; 37 Standard; 37 Wide; 37.5; 37.5 Extra Wide; 37.5 Medium; 37.5 Narrow; 37.5 Standard; 37.5 Wide; 38; 38 Extra Wide; 38 Medium; 38 Narrow; 38 Standard; 38 Wide; 38.5; 38.5 Extra Wide; 38.5 Medium; 38.5 Narrow; 38.5 Standard; 38.5 Wide; 39; 39 Extra Wide; 39 Medium; 39 Narrow; 39 Standard; 39 Wide; 39.5; 39.5 Extra Wide; 39.5 Medium; 39.5 Narrow; 39.5 Standard; 39.5 Wide; 40; 40 Extra Wide; 40 Medium; 40 Narrow; 40 Standard; 40 Wide; 40.5; 40.5 Extra Wide; 40.5 Medium; 40.5 Narrow; 40.5 Standard; 40.5 Wide; 41; 41 Extra Wide; 41 Medium; 41 Narrow; 41 Standard; 41 Wide; 41.5; 41.5 Extra Wide; 41.5 Medium; 41.5 Narrow; 41.5 Standard; 41.5 Wide; 42; 42 Extra Wide; 42 Medium; 42 Narrow; 42 Standard; 42 Wide; 42.5; 42.5 Extra Wide; 42.5 Medium; 42.5 Narrow; 42.5 Standard; 42.5 Wide; 43; 43 Extra Wide; 43 Medium; 43 Narrow; 43 Standard; 43 Wide; 43.5; 43.5 Extra Wide; 43.5 Medium; 43.5 Narrow; 43.5 Standard; 43.5 Wide; 44; 44 Extra Wide; 44 Medium; 44 Narrow; 44 Standard; 44 Wide; 44.5; 44.5 Extra Wide; 44.5 Medium; 44.5 Narrow; 44.5 Standard; 44.5 Wide; 45; 45 Extra Wide; 45 Medium; 45 Narrow; 45 Standard; 45 Wide; 45.5; 45.5 Extra Wide; 45.5 Medium; 45.5 Narrow; 45.5 Standard; 45.5 Wide; 46; 46 Extra Wide; 46 Medium; 46 Narrow; 46 Standard; 46 Wide; 46.5; 46.5 Extra Wide; 46.5 Medium; 46.5 Narrow; 46.5 Standard; 46.5 Wide; 47; 47 Extra Wide; 47 Medium; 47 Narrow; 47 Standard; 47 Wide; 47.5; 47.5 Extra Wide; 47.5 Medium; 47.5 Narrow; 47.5 Standard; 47.5 Wide; 48; 48 Extra Wide; 48 Medium; 48 Narrow; 48 Standard; 48 Wide; 48.5; 48.5 Extra Wide; 48.5 Medium; 48.5 Narrow; 48.5 Standard; 48.5 Wide; 49; 49 Extra Wide; 49 Medium; 49 Narrow; 49 Standard; 49 Wide; 49.5; 49.5 Extra Wide; 49.5 Medium; 49.5 Narrow; 49.5 Standard; 49.5 Wide; 50; 50 Extra Wide; 50 Medium; 50 Narrow; 50 Standard; 50 Wide; 50.5; 50.5 Extra Wide; 50.5 Medium; 50.5 Narrow; 50.5 Standard; 50.5 Wide; 51; 51 Extra Wide; 51 Medium; 51 Narrow; 51 Standard; 51 Wide; 51.5; 51.5 Extra Wide; 51.5 Medium; 51.5 Narrow; 51.5 Standard; 51.5 Wide; 52; 52 Extra Wide; 52 Medium; 52 Narrow; 52 Standard; 52 Wide; Other
sv: EU-skostorlek: 15; 15 extra bred; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standard; 15 bred; 15,5; 15,5 extra bred; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standard; 15,5 bred; 16; 16 extra bred; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standard; 16 bred; 16,5; 16,5 extra bred; 16,5 medium; 16,5 smal; 16,5 standard; 16,5 bred; 17; 17 extra bred; 17 medium; 17 smal; 17 standard; 17 bred; 17,5; 17,5 extra bred; 17,5 medium; 17,5 smal; 17,5 standard; 17,5 bred; 18; 18 extra bred; 18 medium; 18 smal; 18 standard; 18 bred; 18,5; 18,5 extra bred; 18,5 medium; 18,5 smal; 18,5 standard; 18,5 bred; 19; 19 extra bred; 19 medium; 19 smal; 19 standard; 19 bred; 19,5; 19,5 extra bred; 19,5 medium; 19,5 smal; 19,5 standard; 19,5 bred; 20; 20 extra bred; 20 medium; 20 smal; 20 standard; 20 bred; 20,5; 20,5 extra bred; 20,5 medium; 20,5 smal; 20,5 standard; 20,5 bred; 21; 21 extra bred; 21 medium; 21 smal; 21 standard; 21 bred; 21,5; 21,5 extra bred; 21,5 medium; 21,5 smal; 21,5 standard; 21,5 bred; 22; 22 extra bred; 22 medium; 22 smal; 22 standard; 22 bred; 22,5; 22,5 extra bred; 22,5 medium; 22,5 smal; 22,5 standard; 22,5 bred; 23; 23 extra bred; 23 medium; 23 smal; 23 standard; 23 bred; 23,5; 23,5 extra bred; 23,5 medium; 23,5 smal; 23,5 standard; 23,5 bred; 24; 24 extra bred; 24 medium; 24 smal; 24 standard; 24 bred; 24,5; 24,5 extra bred; 24,5 medium; 24,5 smal; 24,5 standard; 24,5 bred; 25; 25 extra bred; 25 medium; 25 smal; 25 standard; 25 bred; 25,5; 25,5 extra bred; 25,5 medium; 25,5 smal; 25,5 standard; 25,5 bred; 26; 26 extra bred; 26 medium; 26 smal; 26 standard; 26 bred; 26,5; 26,5 extra bred; 26,5 medium; 26,5 smal; 26,5 standard; 26,5 bred; 27; 27 extra bred; 27 medium; 27 smal; 27 standard; 27 bred; 27,5; 27,5 extra bred; 27,5 medium; 27,5 smal; 27,5 standard; 27,5 bred; 28; 28 extra bred; 28 medium; 28 smal; 28 standard; 28 bred; 28,5; 28,5 extra bred; 28,5 medium; 28,5 smal; 28,5 standard; 28,5 bred; 29; 29 extra bred; 29 medium; 29 smal; 29 standard; 29 bred; 29,5; 29,5 extra bred; 29,5 medium; 29,5 smal; 29,5 standard; 29,5 bred; 30; 30 extra bred; 30 medium; 30 smal; 30 standard; 30 bred; 30,5; 30,5 extra bred; 30,5 medium; 30,5 smal; 30,5 standard; 30,5 bred; 31; 31 extra bred; 31 medium; 31 smal; 31 standard; 31 bred; 31,5; 31,5 extra bred; 31,5 medium; 31,5 smal; 31,5 standard; 31,5 bred; 32; 32 extra bred; 32 medium; 32 smal; 32 standard; 32 bred; 32,5; 32,5 extra bred; 32,5 medium; 32,5 smal; 32,5 standard; 32,5 bred; 33; 33 extra bred; 33 medium; 33 smal; 33 standard; 33 bred; 33,5; 33,5 extra bred; 33,5 medium; 33,5 smal; 33,5 standard; 33,5 bred; 34; 34 extra bred; 34 medium; 34 smal; 34 standard; 34 bred; 34,5; 34,5 extra bred; 34,5 medium; 34,5 smal; 34,5 standard; 34,5 bred; 35; 35 extra bred; 35 medium; 35 smal; 35 standard; 35 bred; 35,5; 35,5 extra bred; 35,5 medium; 35,5 smal; 35,5 standard; 35,5 bred; 36; 36 extra bred; 36 medium; 36 smal; 36 standard; 36 bred; 36,5; 36,5 extra bred; 36,5 medium; 36,5 smal; 36,5 standard; 36,5 bred; 37; 37 extra bred; 37 medium; 37 smal; 37 standard; 37 bred; 37,5; 37,5 extra bred; 37,5 medium; 37,5 smal; 37,5 standard; 37,5 bred; 38; 38 extra bred; 38 medium; 38 smal; 38 standard; 38 bred; 38,5; 38,5 extra bred; 38,5 medium; 38,5 smal; 38,5 standard; 38,5 bred; 39; 39 extra bred; 39 medium; 39 smal; 39 standard; 39 bred; 39,5; 39,5 extra bred; 39,5 medium; 39,5 smal; 39,5 standard; 39,5 bred; 40; 40 extra bred; 40 medium; 40 smal; 40 standard; 40 bred; 40,5; 40,5 extra bred; 40,5 medium; 40,5 smal; 40,5 standard; 40,5 bred; 41; 41 extra bred; 41 medium; 41 smal; 41 standard; 41 bred; 41,5; 41,5 extra bred; 41,5 medium; 41,5 smal; 41,5 standard; 41,5 bred; 42; 42 extra bred; 42 medium; 42 smal; 42 standard; 42 bred; 42,5; 42,5 extra bred; 42,5 medium; 42,5 smal; 42,5 standard; 42,5 bred; 43; 43 extra bred; 43 medium; 43 smal; 43 standard; 43 bred; 43,5; 43,5 extra bred; 43,5 medium; 43,5 smal; 43,5 standard; 43,5 bred; 44; 44 extra bred; 44 medium; 44 smal; 44 standard; 44 bred; 44,5; 44,5 extra bred; 44,5 medium; 44,5 smal; 44,5 standard; 44,5 bred; 45; 45 extra bred; 45 medium; 45 smal; 45 standard; 45 bred; 45,5; 45,5 extra bred; 45,5 medium; 45,5 smal; 45,5 standard; 45,5 bred; 46; 46 extra bred; 46 medium; 46 smal; 46 standard; 46 bred; 46,5; 46,5 extra bred; 46,5 medium; 46,5 smal; 46,5 standard; 46,5 bred; 47; 47 extra bred; 47 medium; 47 smal; 47 standard; 47 bred; 47,5; 47,5 extra bred; 47,5 medium; 47,5 smal; 47,5 standard; 47,5 bred; 48; 48 extra bred; 48 medium; 48 smal; 48 standard; 48 bred; 48,5; 48,5 extra bred; 48,5 medium; 48,5 smal; 48,5 standard; 48,5 bred; 49; 49 extra bred; 49 medium; 49 smal; 49 standard; 49 bred; 49,5; 49,5 extra bred; 49,5 medium; 49,5 smal; 49,5 standard; 49,5 bred; 50; 50 extra bred; 50 medium; 50 smal; 50 standard; 50 bred; 50,5; 50,5 extra bred; 50,5 medium; 50,5 smal; 50,5 standard; 50,5 bred; 51; 51 extra bred; 51 medium; 51 smal; 51 standard; 51 bred; 51,5; 51,5 extra bred; 51,5 medium; 51,5 smal; 51,5 standard; 51,5 bred; 52; 52 extra bred; 52 medium; 52 smal; 52 standard; 52 bred; Övrigt
nl: EU-schoenmaat: 15; 15 extra breed; 15 medium; 15 smal; 15 standaard; 15 breed; 15,5; 15,5 extra breed; 15,5 medium; 15,5 smal; 15,5 standaard; 15,5 breed; 16; 16 extra breed; 16 medium; 16 smal; 16 standaard; 16 breed; 16,5; 16,5 extra breed; 16,5 medium; 16,5 smal; 16,5 standaard; 16,5 breed; 17; 17 extra breed; 17 medium; 17 smal; 17 standaard; 17 breed; 17,5; 17,5 extra breed; 17,5 medium; 17,5 smal; 17,5 standaard; 17,5 breed; 18; 18 extra breed; 18 medium; 18 smal; 18 standaard; 18 breed; 18,5; 18,5 extra breed; 18,5 medium; 18,5 smal; 18,5 standaard; 18,5 breed; 19; 19 extra breed; 19 medium; 19 smal; 19 standaard; 19 breed; 19,5; 19,5 extra breed; 19,5 medium; 19,5 smal; 19,5 standaard; 19,5 breed; 20; 20 extra breed; 20 medium; 20 smal; 20 standaard; 20 breed; 20,5; 20,5 extra breed; 20,5 medium; 20,5 smal; 20,5 standaard; 20,5 breed; 21; 21 Extra breed; 21 Medium; 21 Smal; 21 Standaard; 21 Breed; 21,5; 21,5 extra breed; 21,5 medium; 21,5 smal; 21,5 standaard; 21,5 breed; 22; 22 Extra breed; 22 Medium; 22 Smal; 22 Standaard; 22 Breed; 22,5; 22,5 Extra breed; 22,5 Medium; 22,5 Smal; 22,5 Standaard; 22,5 Breed; 23; 23 Extra breed; 23 Medium; 23 Smal; 23 Standaard; 23 Breed; 23,5; 23,5 Extra breed; 23,5 Medium; 23,5 Smal; 23,5 Standaard; 23,5 Breed; 24; 24 Extra breed; 24 Medium; 24 Smal; 24 Standaard; 24 Breed; 24,5; 24,5 Extra breed; 24,5 Medium; 24,5 Smal; 24,5 Standaard; 24,5 Breed; 25; 25 Extra breed; 25 Medium; 25 Smal; 25 Standaard; 25 Breed; 25,5; 25,5 Extra breed; 25,5 Medium; 25,5 Smal; 25,5 Standaard; 25,5 Breed; 26; 26 Extra breed; 26 Medium; 26 Smal; 26 Standaard; 26 Breed; 26,5; 26,5 Extra breed; 26,5 Medium; 26,5 Smal; 26,5 Standaard; 26,5 Breed; 27; 27 Extra breed; 27 Medium; 27 Smal; 27 Standaard; 27 Breed; 27,5; 27,5 Extra breed; 27,5 Medium; 27,5 Smal; 27,5 Standaard; 27,5 Breed; 28; 28 Extra breed; 28 Medium; 28 Smal; 28 Standaard; 28 Breed; 28,5; 28,5 Extra breed; 28,5 Medium; 28,5 Smal; 28,5 Standaard; 28,5 Breed; 29; 29 Extra breed; 29 Medium; 29 Smal; 29 Standaard; 29 Breed; 29,5; 29,5 Extra breed; 29,5 Medium; 29,5 Smal; 29,5 Standaard; 29,5 Breed; 30; 30 Extra breed; 30 Medium; 30 Smal; 30 Standaard; 30 Breed; 30,5; 30,5 Extra breed; 30,5 Medium; 30,5 Smal; 30,5 Standaard; 30,5 Breed; 31; 31 Extra breed; 31 Medium; 31 Smal; 31 Standaard; 31 Breed; 31,5; 31,5 Extra breed; 31,5 Medium; 31,5 Smal; 31,5 Standaard; 31,5 Breed; 32; 32 Extra breed; 32 Medium; 32 Smal; 32 Standaard; 32 Breed; 32,5; 32,5 Extra breed; 32,5 Medium; 32,5 Smal; 32,5 Standaard; 32,5 Breed; 33; 33 Extra breed; 33 Medium; 33 Smal; 33 Standaard; 33 Breed; 33,5; 33,5 Extra breed; 33,5 Medium; 33,5 Smal; 33,5 Standaard; 33,5 Breed; 34; 34 Extra breed; 34 Medium; 34 Smal; 34 Standaard; 34 Breed; 34,5; 34,5 Extra breed; 34,5 Medium; 34,5 Smal; 34,5 Standaard; 34,5 Breed; 35; 35 Extra breed; 35 Medium; 35 Smal; 35 Standaard; 35 Breed; 35,5; 35,5 Extra breed; 35,5 Medium; 35,5 Smal; 35,5 Standaard; 35,5 Breed; 36; 36 Extra breed; 36 Medium; 36 Smal; 36 Standaard; 36 Breed; 36,5; 36,5 Extra breed; 36,5 Medium; 36,5 Smal; 36,5 Standaard; 36,5 Breed; 37; 37 Extra breed; 37 Medium; 37 Smal; 37 Standaard; 37 Breed; 37,5; 37,5 Extra breed; 37,5 Medium; 37,5 Smal; 37,5 Standaard; 37,5 Breed; 38; 38 Extra breed; 38 Medium; 38 Smal; 38 Standaard; 38 Breed; 38,5; 38,5 Extra breed; 38,5 Medium; 38,5 Smal; 38,5 Standaard; 38,5 Breed; 39; 39 Extra breed; 39 Medium; 39 Smal; 39 Standaard; 39 Breed; 39,5; 39,5 Extra breed; 39,5 Medium; 39,5 Smal; 39,5 Standaard; 39,5 Breed; 40; 40 Extra breed; 40 Medium; 40 Smal; 40 Standaard; 40 Breed; 40,5; 40,5 Extra breed; 40,5 Medium; 40,5 Smal; 40,5 Standaard; 40,5 Breed; 41; 41 Extra breed; 41 Medium; 41 Smal; 41 Standaard; 41 Breed; 41,5; 41,5 Extra breed; 41,5 Medium; 41,5 Smal; 41,5 Standaard; 41,5 Breed; 42; 42 Extra breed; 42 Medium; 42 Smal; 42 Standaard; 42 Breed; 42,5; 42,5 Extra breed; 42,5 Medium; 42,5 Smal; 42,5 Standaard; 42,5 Breed; 43; 43 Extra breed; 43 Medium; 43 Smal; 43 Standaard; 43 Breed; 43,5; 43,5 Extra breed; 43,5 Medium; 43,5 Smal; 43,5 Standaard; 43,5 Breed; 44; 44 Extra breed; 44 Medium; 44 Smal; 44 Standaard; 44 Breed; 44,5; 44,5 Extra breed; 44,5 Medium; 44,5 Smal; 44,5 Standaard; 44,5 Breed; 45; 45 Extra breed; 45 Medium; 45 Smal; 45 Standaard; 45 Breed; 45,5; 45,5 Extra breed; 45,5 Medium; 45,5 Smal; 45,5 Standaard; 45,5 Breed; 46; 46 Extra breed; 46 Medium; 46 Smal; 46 Standaard; 46 Breed; 46,5; 46,5 Extra breed; 46,5 Medium; 46,5 Smal; 46,5 Standaard; 46,5 Breed; 47; 47 Extra breed; 47 Medium; 47 Smal; 47 Standaard; 47 Breed; 47,5; 47,5 Extra breed; 47,5 Medium; 47,5 Smal; 47,5 Standaard; 47,5 Breed; 48; 48 Extra breed; 48 Medium; 48 Smal; 48 Standaard; 48 Breed; 48,5; 48,5 Extra breed; 48,5 Medium; 48,5 Smal; 48,5 Standaard; 48,5 Breed; 49; 49 Extra breed; 49 Medium; 49 Smal; 49 Standaard; 49 Breed; 49,5; 49,5 Extra breed; 49,5 Medium; 49,5 Smal; 49,5 Standaard; 49,5 Breed; 50; 50 Extra breed; 50 Medium; 50 Smal; 50 Standaard; 50 Breed; 50,5; 50,5 Extra breed; 50,5 Medium; 50,5 Smal; 50,5 Standaard; 50,5 Breed; 51; 51 Extra breed; 51 Medium; 51 Smal; 51 Standaard; 51 Breed; 51,5; 51,5 Extra breed; 51,5 Medium; 51,5 Smal; 51,5 Standaard; 51,5 Breed; 52; 52 Extra breed; 52 Medium; 52 Smal; 52 Standaard; 52 Breed; Overig
it: Numero di scarpa UE: 15; 15 extra largo; 15 medio; 15 stretto; 15 standard; 15 largo; 15,5; 15,5 extra largo; 15,5 medio; 15,5 stretto; 15,5 standard; 15,5 largo; 16; 16 extra largo; 16 medio; 16 stretto; 16 standard; 16 largo; 16,5; 16,5 extra largo; 16,5 medio; 16,5 stretto; 16,5 standard; 16,5 largo; 17; 17 extra largo; 17 medio; 17 stretto; 17 standard; 17 largo; 17,5; 17,5 extra largo; 17,5 medio; 17,5 stretto; 17,5 standard; 17,5 largo; 18; 18 extra largo; 18 medio; 18 stretto; 18 standard; 18 largo; 18,5; 18,5 extra largo; 18,5 medio; 18,5 stretto; 18,5 standard; 18,5 largo; 19; 19 extra largo; 19 medio; 19 stretto; 19 standard; 19 largo; 19,5; 19,5 extra largo; 19,5 medio; 19,5 stretto; 19,5 standard; 19,5 largo; 20; 20 extra largo; 20 medio; 20 stretto; 20 standard; 20 largo; 20,5; 20,5 extra largo; 20,5 medio; 20,5 stretto; 20,5 standard; 20,5 largo; 21; 21 Extra largo; 21 Medio; 21 Stretto; 21 Standard; 21 Largo; 21,5; 21,5 extra largo; 21,5 medio; 21,5 stretto; 21,5 standard; 21,5 largo; 22; 22 Extra largo; 22 Medio; 22 Stretto; 22 Standard; 22 Largo; 22,5; 22,5 Extra largo; 22,5 Medio; 22,5 Stretto; 22,5 Standard; 22,5 Largo; 23; 23 Extra largo; 23 Medio; 23 Stretto; 23 Standard; 23 Largo; 23,5; 23,5 Extra largo; 23,5 Medio; 23,5 Stretto; 23,5 Standard; 23,5 Largo; 24; 24 Extra largo; 24 Medio; 24 Stretto; 24 Standard; 24 Largo; 24,5; 24,5 Extra largo; 24,5 Medio; 24,5 Stretto; 24,5 Standard; 24,5 Largo; 25; 25 Extra largo; 25 Medio; 25 Stretto; 25 Standard; 25 Largo; 25,5; 25,5 Extra largo; 25,5 Medio; 25,5 Stretto; 25,5 Standard; 25,5 Largo; 26; 26 Extra largo; 26 Medio; 26 Stretto; 26 Standard; 26 largo; 26,5; 26,5 Extra largo; 26,5 Medio; 26,5 Stretto; 26,5 Standard; 26,5 Largo; 27; 27 Extra largo; 27 Medio; 27 Stretto; 27 Standard; 27 Largo; 27,5; 27,5 Extra largo; 27,5 Medio; 27,5 Stretto; 27,5 Standard; 27,5 Largo; 28; 28 Extra largo; 28 Medio; 28 Stretto; 28 Standard; 28 Largo; 28,5; 28,5 Extra largo; 28,5 Medio; 28,5 Stretto; 28,5 Standard; 28,5 Largo; 29; 29 Extra largo; 29 Medio; 29 Stretto; 29 Standard; 29 Largo; 29,5; 29,5 Extra largo; 29,5 Medio; 29,5 Stretto; 29,5 Standard; 29,5 Largo; 30; 30 Extra largo; 30 Medio; 30 Stretto; 30 Standard; 30 Largo; 30,5; 30,5 Extra largo; 30,5 Medio; 30,5 Stretto; 30,5 Standard; 30,5 Largo; 31; 31 Extra largo; 31 Medio; 31 Stretto; 31 Standard; 31 Largo; 31,5; 31,5 Extra largo; 31,5 Medio; 31,5 Stretto; 31,5 Standard; 31,5 Largo; 32; 32 Extra largo; 32 Medio; 32 Stretto; 32 Standard; 32 Largo; 32,5; 32,5 Extra largo; 32,5 Medio; 32,5 Stretto; 32,5 Standard; 32,5 Largo; 33; 33 Extra largo; 33 Medio; 33 Stretto; 33 Standard; 33 Largo; 33,5; 33,5 Extra largo; 33,5 Medio; 33,5 Stretto; 33,5 Standard; 33,5 Largo; 34; 34 Extra largo; 34 Medio; 34 Stretto; 34 Standard; 34 Largo; 34,5; 34,5 Extra largo; 34,5 Medio; 34,5 Stretto; 34,5 Standard; 34,5 Largo; 35; 35 Extra largo; 35 Medio; 35 Stretto; 35 Standard; 35 Largo; 35,5; 35,5 Extra largo; 35,5 Medio; 35,5 Stretto; 35,5 Standard; 35,5 Largo; 36; 36 Extra largo; 36 Medio; 36 Stretto; 36 Standard; 36 Largo; 36,5; 36,5 Extra largo; 36,5 Medio; 36,5 Stretto; 36,5 Standard; 36,5 Largo; 37; 37 Extra largo; 37 Medio; 37 Stretto; 37 Standard; 37 Largo; 37,5; 37,5 Extra largo; 37,5 Medio; 37,5 Stretto; 37,5 Standard; 37,5 Largo; 38; 38 Extra largo; 38 Medio; 38 Stretto; 38 Standard; 38 Largo; 38,5; 38,5 Extra largo; 38,5 Medio; 38,5 Stretto; 38,5 Standard; 38,5 Largo; 39; 39 Extra largo; 39 Medio; 39 Stretto; 39 Standard; 39 Largo; 39,5; 39,5 Extra largo; 39,5 Medio; 39,5 Stretto; 39,5 Standard; 39,5 Largo; 40; 40 Extra largo; 40 Medio; 40 Stretto; 40 Standard; 40 Largo; 40,5; 40,5 Extra largo; 40,5 Medio; 40,5 Stretto; 40,5 Standard; 40,5 Largo; 41; 41 Extra largo; 41 Medio; 41 Stretto; 41 Standard; 41 Largo; 41,5; 41,5 Extra largo; 41,5 Medio; 41,5 Stretto; 41,5 Standard; 41,5 Largo; 42; 42 Extra largo; 42 Medio; 42 Stretto; 42 Standard; 42 Largo; 42,5; 42,5 Extra largo; 42,5 Medio; 42,5 Stretto; 42,5 Standard; 42,5 Largo; 43; 43 Extra largo; 43 Medio; 43 Stretto; 43 Standard; 43 Largo; 43,5; 43,5 Extra largo; 43,5 Medio; 43,5 Stretto; 43,5 Standard; 43,5 Largo; 44; 44 Extra largo; 44 Medio; 44 Stretto; 44 Standard; 44 Largo; 44,5; 44,5 Extra largo; 44,5 Medio; 44,5 Stretto; 44,5 Standard; 44,5 Largo; 45; 45 Extra largo; 45 Medio; 45 Stretto; 45 Standard; 45 Largo; 45,5; 45,5 Extra largo; 45,5 Medio; 45,5 Stretto; 45,5 Standard; 45,5 Largo; 46; 46 Extra largo; 46 Medio; 46 Stretto; 46 Standard; 46 Largo; 46,5; 46,5 Extra largo; 46,5 Medio; 46,5 Stretto; 46,5 Standard; 46,5 Largo; 47; 47 Extra largo; 47 Medio; 47 Stretto; 47 Standard; 47 Largo; 47,5; 47,5 Extra largo; 47,5 Medio; 47,5 Stretto; 47,5 Standard; 47,5 Largo; 48; 48 Extra largo; 48 Medio; 48 Stretto; 48 Standard; 48 Largo; 48,5; 48,5 Extra largo; 48,5 Medio; 48,5 Stretto; 48,5 Standard; 48,5 Largo; 49; 49 Extra largo; 49 Medio; 49 Stretto; 49 Standard; 49 Largo; 49,5; 49,5 Extra largo; 49,5 Medio; 49,5 Stretto; 49,5 Standard; 49,5 Largo; 50; 50 Extra largo; 50 Medio; 50 Stretto; 50 Standard; 50 Largo; 50,5; 50,5 Extra largo; 50,5 Medio; 50,5 Stretto; 50,5 Standard; 50,5 Largo; 51; 51 Extra largo; 51 Medio; 51 Stretto; 51 Standard; 51 Largo; 51,5; 51,5 Extra largo; 51,5 Medio; 51,5 Stretto; 51,5 Standard; 51,5 Largo; 52; 52 Extra largo; 52 Medio; 52 Stretto; 52 Standard; 52 Largo; Altro
bg-BG: Европейски размер на обувки: 15; 15 много широки; 15 средни; 15 тесни; 15 стандартни; 15 широки; 15,5; 15,5 много широки; 15,5 средни; 15,5 тесни; 15,5 стандартни; 15,5 широки; 16; 16 много широки; 16 средни; 16 тесни; 16 стандартни; 16 широки; 16,5; 16,5 много широки; 16,5 средни; 16,5 тесни; 16,5 стандартни; 16,5 широки; 17; 17 много широки; 17 средни; 17 тесни; 17 стандартни; 17 широки; 17,5; 17,5 много широки; 17,5 средни; 17,5 тесни; 17,5 стандартни; 17,5 широки; 18; 18 много широки; 18 средни; 18 тесни; 18 стандартни; 18 широки; 18,5; 18,5 много широки; 18,5 средни; 18,5 тесни; 18,5 стандартни; 18,5 широки; 19; 19 много широки; 19 средни; 19 тесни; 19 стандартни; 19 широки; 19,5; 19,5 много широки; 19,5 средни; 19,5 тесни; 19,5 стандартни; 19,5 широки; 20; 20 много широки; 20 средни; 20 тесни; 20 стандартни; 20 широки; 20,5; 20,5 много широки; 20,5 средни; 20,5 тесни; 20,5 стандартни; 20,5 широки; 21; 21 много широки; 21 средни; 21 тесни; 21 стандартни; 21 широки; 21,5; 21,5 много широки; 21,5 средни; 21,5 тесни; 21,5 стандартни; 21,5 широки; 22; 22 много широки; 22 средни; 22 тесни; 22 стандартни; 22 широки; 22,5; 22,5 много широки; 22,5 средни; 22,5 тесни; 22,5 стандартни; 22,5 широки; 23; 23 много широки; 23 средни; 23 тесни; 23 стандартни; 23 широки; 23,5; 23,5 много широки; 23,5 средни; 23,5 тесни; 23,5 стандартни; 23,5 широки; 24; 24 много широки; 24 средни; 24 тесни; 24 стандартни; 24 широки; 24,5; 24,5 много широки; 24,5 средни; 24,5 тесни; 24,5 стандартни; 24,5 широки; 25; 25 много широки; 25 средни; 25 тесни; 25 стандартни; 25 широки; 25,5; 25,5 много широки; 25,5 средни; 25,5 тесни; 25,5 стандартни; 25,5 широки; 26; 26 много широки; 26 средни; 26 тесни; 26 стандартни; 26 широки; 26,5; 26,5 много широки; 26,5 средни; 26,5 тесни; 26,5 стандартни; 26,5 широки; 27; 27 много широки; 27 средни; 27 тесни; 27 стандартни; 27 широки; 27,5; 27,5 много широки; 27,5 средни; 27,5 тесни; 27,5 стандартни; 27,5 широки; 28; 28 много широки; 28 средни; 28 тесни; 28 стандартни; 28 широки; 28,5; 28,5 много широки; 28,5 средни; 28,5 тесни; 28,5 стандартни; 28,5 широки; 29; 29 много широки; 29 средни; 29 тесни; 29 стандартни; 29 широки; 29,5; 29,5 много широки; 29,5 средни; 29,5 тесни; 29,5 стандартни; 29,5 широки; 30; 30 много широки; 30 средни; 30 тесни; 30 стандартни; 30 широки; 30,5; 30,5 много широки; 30,5 средни; 30,5 тесни; 30,5 стандартни; 30,5 широки; 31; 31 много широки; 31 средни; 31 тесни; 31 стандартни; 31 широки; 31,5; 31,5 много широки; 31,5 средни; 31,5 тесни; 31,5 стандартни; 31,5 широки; 32; 32 много широки; 32 средни; 32 тесни; 32 стандартни; 32 широки; 32,5; 32,5 много широки; 32,5 средни; 32,5 тесни; 32,5 стандартни; 32,5 широки; 33; 33 много широки; 33 средни; 33 тесни; 33 стандартни; 33 широки; 33,5; 33,5 много широки; 33,5 средни; 33,5 тесни; 33,5 стандартни; 33,5 широки; 34; 34 много широки; 34 средни; 34 тесни; 34 стандартни; 34 широки; 34,5; 34,5 много широки; 34,5 средни; 34,5 тесни; 34,5 стандартни; 34,5 широки; 35; 35 много широки; 35 средни; 35 тесни; 35 стандартни; 35 широки; 35,5; 35,5 много широки; 35,5 средни; 35,5 тесни; 35,5 стандартни; 35,5 широки; 36; 36 много широки; 36 средни; 36 тесни; 36 стандартни; 36 широки; 36,5; 36,5 много широки; 36,5 средни; 36,5 тесни; 36,5 стандартни; 36,5 широки; 37; 37 много широки; 37 средни; 37 тесни; 37 стандартни; 37 широки; 37,5; 37,5 много широки; 37,5 средни; 37,5 тесни; 37,5 стандартни; 37,5 широки; 38; 38 много широки; 38 средни; 38 тесни; 38 стандартни; 38 широки; 38,5; 38,5 много широки; 38,5 средни; 38,5 тесни; 38,5 стандартни; 38,5 широки; 39; 39 Много широк; 39 Среден; 39 Тесен; 39 Стандартен; 39 Широк; 39,5; 39,5 Много широк; 39,5 Среден; 39,5 Тесен; 39,5 Стандартен; 39,5 Широк; 40; 40 Много широк; 40 Среден; 40 Тесен; 40 Стандартен; 40 Широк; 40,5; 40,5 Много широк; 40,5 Среден; 40,5 Тесен; 40,5 Стандартен; 40,5 Широк; 41; 41 Много широк; 41 Среден; 41 Тесен; 41 Стандартен; 41 Широк; 41,5; 41,5 Много широк; 41,5 Среден; 41,5 Тесен; 41,5 Стандартен; 41,5 Широк; 42; 42 Много широк; 42 Среден; 42 Тесен; 42 Стандартен; 42 Широк; 42,5; 42,5 Много широк; 42,5 Среден; 42,5 Тесен; 42,5 Стандартен; 42,5 Широк; 43; 43 Много широк; 43 Среден; 43 Тесен; 43 Стандартен; 43 Широк; 43,5; 43,5 Много широк; 43,5 Среден; 43,5 Тесен; 43,5 Стандартен; 43,5 Широк; 44; 44 Много широк; 44 Среден; 44 Тесен; 44 Стандартен; 44 Широк; 44,5; 44,5 Много широк; 44,5 Среден; 44,5 Тесен; 44,5 Стандартен; 44,5 Широк; 45; 45 Много широк; 45 Среден; 45 Тесен; 45 Стандартен; 45 Широки; 45,5; 45,5 Много широк; 45,5 Среден; 45,5 Тесен; 45,5 Стандартен; 45,5 Широк; 46; 46 Много широк; 46 Среден; 46 Тесен; 46 Стандартен; 46 Широк; 46,5; 46,5 Много широк; 46,5 Среден; 46,5 Тесен; 46,5 Стандартен; 46,5 Широк; 47; 47 Много широк; 47 Среден; 47 Тесен; 47 Стандартен; 47 Широк; 47,5; 47,5 Много широк; 47,5 Среден; 47,5 Тесен; 47,5 Стандартен; 47,5 Широк; 48; 48 Много широк; 48 Среден; 48 Тесен; 48 Стандартен; 48 Широк; 48,5; 48,5 Много широк; 48,5 Среден; 48,5 Тесен; 48,5 Стандартен; 48,5 Широк; 49; 49 Много широк; 49 Среден; 49 Тесен; 49 Стандартен; 49 Широк; 49,5; 49,5 Много широк; 49,5 Среден; 49,5 Тесен; 49,5 Стандартен; 49,5 Широк; 50; 50 Много широк; 50 Среден; 50 Тесен; 50 Стандартен; 50 Широк; 50,5; 50,5 Много широк; 50,5 Среден; 50,5 Тесен; 50,5 Стандартен; 50,5 Широк; 51; 51 Много широк; 51 Среден; 51 Тесен; 51 Стандартен; 51 Широк; 51,5; 51,5 Много широк; 51,5 Среден; 51,5 Тесен; 51,5 Стандартен; 51,5 Широк; 52; 52 Много широк; 52 Среден; 52 Тесен; 52 Стандартен; 52 Широк; Други
vi: Kích cỡ giày EU: 15; 15 rất rộng; 15 vừa; 15 hẹp; 15 tiêu chuẩn; 15 rộng; 15,5; 15,5 rất rộng; 15,5 vừa; 15,5 hẹp; 15,5 tiêu chuẩn; 15,5 rộng; 16; 16 rất rộng; 16 vừa; 16 hẹp; 16 tiêu chuẩn; 16 rộng; 16,5; 16,5 rất rộng; 16,5 vừa; 16,5 hẹp; 16,5 tiêu chuẩn; 16,5 rộng; 17; 17 rất rộng; 17 vừa; 17 hẹp; 17 tiêu chuẩn; 17 rộng; 17,5; 17,5 rất rộng; 17,5 vừa; 17,5 hẹp; 17,5 tiêu chuẩn; 17,5 rộng; 18; 18 rất rộng; 18 vừa; 18 hẹp; 18 tiêu chuẩn; 18 rộng; 18,5; 18,5 rất rộng; 18,5 vừa; 18,5 hẹp; 18,5 tiêu chuẩn; 18,5 rộng; 19; 19 rất rộng; 19 vừa; 19 hẹp; 19 tiêu chuẩn; 19 rộng; 19,5; 19,5 rất rộng; 19,5 vừa; 19,5 hẹp; 19,5 tiêu chuẩn; 19,5 rộng; 20; 20 rất rộng; 20 vừa; 20 hẹp; 20 tiêu chuẩn; 20 rộng; 20,5; 20,5 rất rộng; 20,5 vừa; 20,5 hẹp; 20,5 tiêu chuẩn; 20,5 rộng; 21; 21 Cực rộng; 21 Vừa; 21 Hẹp; 21 Tiêu chuẩn; 21 Rộng; 21,5; 21,5 rất rộng; 21,5 vừa; 21,5 hẹp; 21,5 tiêu chuẩn; 21,5 rộng; 22; 22 Cực rộng; 22 Vừa; 22 Hẹp; 22 Tiêu chuẩn; 22 Rộng; 22,5; 22,5 Cực rộng; 22,5 Vừa; 22,5 Hẹp; 22,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 22,5 Rộng; 23; 23 Cực rộng; 23 Vừa; 23 Hẹp; 23 Tiêu chuẩn; 23 Rộng; 23,5; 23,5 Cực rộng; 23,5 Vừa; 23,5 Hẹp; 23,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 23,5 Rộng; 24; 24 Cực rộng; 24 Vừa; 24 Hẹp; 24 Tiêu chuẩn; 24 Rộng; 24,5; 24,5 Cực rộng; 24,5 Vừa; 24,5 Hẹp; 24,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 24,5 Rộng; 25; 25 Cực rộng; 25 Vừa; 25 Hẹp; 25 Tiêu chuẩn; 25 Rộng; 25,5; 25,5 Cực rộng; 25,5 Vừa; 25,5 Hẹp; 25,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 25,5 Rộng; 26; 26 Cực rộng; 26 Vừa; 26 Hẹp; 26 Tiêu chuẩn; 26 Rộng; 26,5; 26,5 Cực rộng; 26,5 Vừa; 26,5 Hẹp; 26,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 26,5 Rộng; 27; 27 Cực rộng; 27 Vừa; 27 Hẹp; 27 Tiêu chuẩn; 27 Rộng; 27,5; 27,5 Cực rộng; 27,5 Vừa; 27,5 Hẹp; 27,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 27,5 Rộng; 28; 28 Cực rộng; 28 Vừa; 28 Hẹp; 28 Tiêu chuẩn; 28 Rộng; 28,5; 28,5 Cực rộng; 28,5 Vừa; 28,5 Hẹp; 28,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 28,5 Rộng; 29; 29 Cực rộng; 29 Vừa; 29 Hẹp; 29 Tiêu chuẩn; 29 Rộng; 29,5; 29,5 Cực rộng; 29,5 Vừa; 29,5 Hẹp; 29,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 29,5 Rộng; 30; 30 Cực rộng; 30 Vừa; 30 Hẹp; 30 Tiêu chuẩn; 30 Rộng; 30,5; 30,5 Cực rộng; 30,5 Vừa; 30,5 Hẹp; 30,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 30,5 Rộng; 31; 31 Cực rộng; 31 Vừa; 31 Hẹp; 31 Tiêu chuẩn; 31 Rộng; 31,5; 31,5 Cực rộng; 31,5 Vừa; 31,5 Hẹp; 31,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 31,5 Rộng; 32; 32 Cực rộng; 32 Vừa; 32 Hẹp; 32 Tiêu chuẩn; 32 Rộng; 32,5; 32,5 Cực rộng; 32,5 Vừa; 32,5 Hẹp; 32,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 32,5 Rộng; 33; 33 Cực rộng; 33 Vừa; 33 Hẹp; 33 Tiêu chuẩn; 33 Rộng; 33,5; 33,5 Cực rộng; 33,5 Vừa; 33,5 Hẹp; 33,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 33,5 Rộng; 34; 34 Cực rộng; 34 Vừa; 34 Hẹp; 34 Tiêu chuẩn; 34 Rộng; 34,5; 34,5 Cực rộng; 34,5 Vừa; 34,5 Hẹp; 34,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 34,5 Rộng; 35; 35 Cực rộng; 35 Vừa; 35 Hẹp; 35 Tiêu chuẩn; 35 Rộng; 35,5; 35,5 Cực rộng; 35,5 Vừa; 35,5 Hẹp; 35,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 35,5 Rộng; 36; 36 Cực rộng; 36 Vừa; 36 Hẹp; 36 Tiêu chuẩn; 36 Rộng; 36,5; 36,5 Cực rộng; 36,5 Vừa; 36,5 Hẹp; 36,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 36,5 Rộng; 37; 37 Cực rộng; 37 Vừa; 37 Hẹp; 37 Tiêu chuẩn; 37 Rộng; 37,5; 37,5 Cực rộng; 37,5 Vừa; 37,5 Hẹp; 37,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 37,5 Rộng; 38; 38 Cực rộng; 38 Vừa; 38 Hẹp; 38 Tiêu chuẩn; 38 Rộng; 38,5; 38,5 Cực rộng; 38,5 Vừa; 38,5 Hẹp; 38,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 38,5 Rộng; 39; 39 Cực rộng; 39 Vừa; 39 Hẹp; 39 Tiêu chuẩn; 39 Rộng; 39,5; 39,5 Cực rộng; 39,5 Vừa; 39,5 Hẹp; 39,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 39,5 Rộng; 40; 40 Cực rộng; 40 Vừa; 40 Hẹp; 40 Tiêu chuẩn; 40 Rộng; 40,5; 40,5 Cực rộng; 40,5 Vừa; 40,5 Hẹp; 40,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 40,5 Rộng; 41; 41 Cực rộng; 41 Vừa; 41 Hẹp; 41 Tiêu chuẩn; 41 Rộng; 41,5; 41,5 Cực rộng; 41,5 Vừa; 41,5 Hẹp; 41,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 41,5 Rộng; 42; 42 Cực rộng; 42 Vừa; 42 Hẹp; 42 Tiêu chuẩn; 42 Rộng; 42,5; 42,5 Cực rộng; 42,5 Vừa; 42,5 Hẹp; 42,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 42,5 Rộng; 43; 43 Cực rộng; 43 Vừa; 43 Hẹp; 43 Tiêu chuẩn; 43 Rộng; 43,5; 43,5 Cực rộng; 43,5 Vừa; 43,5 Hẹp; 43,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 43,5 Rộng; 44; 44 Cực rộng; 44 Vừa; 44 Hẹp; 44 Tiêu chuẩn; 44 Rộng; 44,5; 44,5 Cực rộng; 44,5 Vừa; 44,5 Hẹp; 44,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 44,5 Rộng; 45; 45 Cực rộng; 45 Vừa; 45 Hẹp; 45 Tiêu chuẩn; 45 Rộng; 45,5; 45,5 Cực rộng; 45,5 Vừa; 45,5 Hẹp; 45,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 45,5 Rộng; 46; 46 Cực rộng; 46 Vừa; 46 Hẹp; 46 Tiêu chuẩn; 46 Rộng; 46,5; 46,5 Cực rộng; 46,5 Vừa; 46,5 Hẹp; 46,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 46,5 Rộng; 47; 47 Cực rộng; 47 Vừa; 47 Hẹp; 47 Tiêu chuẩn; 47 Rộng; 47,5; 47,5 Cực rộng; 47,5 Vừa; 47,5 Hẹp; 47,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 47,5 Rộng; 48; 48 Cực rộng; 48 Vừa; 48 Hẹp; 48 Tiêu chuẩn; 48 Rộng; 48,5; 48,5 Cực rộng; 48,5 Vừa; 48,5 Hẹp; 48,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 48,5 Rộng; 49; 49 Cực rộng; 49 Vừa; 49 Hẹp; 49 Tiêu chuẩn; 49 Rộng; 49,5; 49,5 Cực rộng; 49,5 Vừa; 49,5 Hẹp; 49,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 49,5 Rộng; 50; 50 Cực rộng; 50 Vừa; 50 Hẹp; 50 Tiêu chuẩn; 50 Rộng; 50,5; 50,5 Cực rộng; 50,5 Vừa; 50,5 Hẹp; 50,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 50,5 Rộng; 51; 51 Cực rộng; 51 Vừa; 51 Hẹp; 51 Tiêu chuẩn; 51 Rộng; 51,5; 51,5 Cực rộng; 51,5 Vừa; 51,5 Hẹp; 51,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 51,5 Rộng; 52; 52 Cực rộng; 52 Vừa; 52 Hẹp; 52 Tiêu chuẩn; 52 Rộng; Khác
pt-BR: Tamanho do sapato na UE: 15; 15 Extralargo; 15 Médio; 15 Estreito; 15 Padrão; 15 Largo; 15,5; 15,5 Extralargo; 15,5 Médio; 15,5 Estreito; 15,5 Padrão; 15,5 Largo; 16; 16 Extralargo; 16 Médio; 16 Estreito; 16 Padrão; 16 Largo; 16,5; 16,5 Extralargo; 16,5 Médio; 16,5 Estreito; 16,5 Padrão; 16,5 Largo; 17; 17 Extralargo; 17 Médio; 17 Estreito; 17 Padrão; 17 Largo; 17,5; 17,5 Extralargo; 17,5 Médio; 17,5 Estreito; 17,5 Padrão; 17,5 Largo; 18; 18 Extralargo; 18 Médio; 18 Estreito; 18 Padrão; 18 Largo; 18,5; 18,5 Extralargo; 18,5 Médio; 18,5 Estreito; 18,5 Padrão; 18,5 Largo; 19; 19 Extralargo; 19 Médio; 19 Estreito; 19 Padrão; 19 Largo; 19,5; 19,5 Extralargo; 19,5 Médio; 19,5 Estreito; 19,5 Padrão; 19,5 Largo; 20; 20 Extralargo; 20 Médio; 20 Estreito; 20 Padrão; 20 Largo; 20,5; 20,5 Extralargo; 20,5 Médio; 20,5 Estreito; 20,5 Padrão; 20,5 Largo; 21; 21 Extralargo; 21 Médio; 21 Estreito; 21 Padrão; 21 Largo; 21,5; 21,5 Extralargo; 21,5 Médio; 21,5 Estreito; 21,5 Padrão; 21,5 Largo; 22; 22 Extralargo; 22 Médio; 22 Estreito; 22 Padrão; 22 Largo; 22,5; 22,5 Extralargo; 22,5 Médio; 22,5 Estreito; 22,5 Padrão; 22,5 Largo; 23; 23 Extralargo; 23 Médio; 23 Estreito; 23 Padrão; 23 Largo; 23,5; 23,5 Extralargo; 23,5 Médio; 23,5 Estreito; 23,5 Padrão; 23,5 Largo; 24; 24 Extralargo; 24 Médio; 24 Estreito; 24 Padrão; 24 Largo; 24,5; 24,5 Extralargo; 24,5 Médio; 24,5 Estreito; 24,5 Padrão; 24,5 Largo; 25; 25 Extralargo; 25 Médio; 25 Estreito; 25 Padrão; 25 Largo; 25,5; 25,5 Extralargo; 25,5 Médio; 25,5 Estreito; 25,5 Padrão; 25,5 Largo; 26; 26 Extralargo; 26 Médio; 26 Estreito; 26 Padrão; 26 Largo; 26,5; 26,5 Extralargo; 26,5 Médio; 26,5 Estreito; 26,5 Padrão; 26,5 Largo; 27; 27 Extralargo; 27 Médio; 27 Estreito; 27 Padrão; 27 Largo; 27,5; 27,5 Extralargo; 27,5 Médio; 27,5 Estreito; 27,5 Padrão; 27,5 Largo; 28; 28 Extralargo; 28 Médio; 28 Estreito; 28 Padrão; 28 Largo; 28,5; 28,5 Extralargo; 28,5 Médio; 28,5 Estreito; 28,5 Padrão; 28,5 Largo; 29; 29 Extralargo; 29 Médio; 29 Estreito; 29 Padrão; 29 Largo; 29,5; 29,5 Extralargo; 29,5 Médio; 29,5 Estreito; 29,5 Padrão; 29,5 Largo; 30; 30 Extralargo; 30 Médio; 30 Estreito; 30 Padrão; 30 Largo; 30,5; 30,5 Extralargo; 30,5 Médio; 30,5 Estreito; 30,5 Padrão; 30,5 Largo; 31; 31 Extralargo; 31 Médio; 31 Estreito; 31 Padrão; 31 Largo; 31,5; 31,5 Extralargo; 31,5 Médio; 31,5 Estreito; 31,5 Padrão; 31,5 Largo; 32; 32 Extralargo; 32 Médio; 32 Estreito; 32 Padrão; 32 Largo; 32,5; 32,5 Extralargo; 32,5 Médio; 32,5 Estreito; 32,5 Padrão; 32,5 Largo; 33; 33 Extralargo; 33 Médio; 33 Estreito; 33 Padrão; 33 Largo; 33,5; 33,5 Extralargo; 33,5 Médio; 33,5 Estreito; 33,5 Padrão; 33,5 Largo; 34; 34 Extralargo; 34 Médio; 34 Estreito; 34 Padrão; 34 Largo; 34,5; 34,5 Extralargo; 34,5 Médio; 34,5 Estreito; 34,5 Padrão; 34,5 Largo; 35; 35 Extralargo; 35 Médio; 35 Estreito; 35 Padrão; 35 Largo; 35,5; 35,5 Extralargo; 35,5 Médio; 35,5 Estreito; 35,5 Padrão; 35,5 Largo; 36; 36 Extralargo; 36 Médio; 36 Estreito; 36 Padrão; 36 Largo; 36,5; 36,5 Extralargo; 36,5 Médio; 36,5 Estreito; 36,5 Padrão; 36,5 Largo; 37; 37 Extralargo; 37 Médio; 37 Estreito; 37 Padrão; 37 Largo; 37,5; 37,5 Extralargo; 37,5 Médio; 37,5 Estreito; 37,5 Padrão; 37,5 Largo; 38; 38 Extralargo; 38 Médio; 38 Estreito; 38 Padrão; 38 Largo; 38,5; 38,5 Extralargo; 38,5 Médio; 38,5 Estreito; 38,5 Padrão; 38,5 Largo; 39; 39 Extralargo; 39 Médio; 39 Estreito; 39 Padrão; 39 Largo; 39,5; 39,5 Extralargo; 39,5 Médio; 39,5 Estreito; 39,5 Padrão; 39,5 Largo; 40; 40 Extralargo; 40 Médio; 40 Estreito; 40 Padrão; 40 Largo; 40,5; 40,5 Extralargo; 40,5 Médio; 40,5 Estreito; 40,5 Padrão; 40,5 Largo; 41; 41 Extralargo; 41 Médio; 41 Estreito; 41 Padrão; 41 Largo; 41,5; 41,5 Extralargo; 41,5 Médio; 41,5 Estreito; 41,5 Padrão; 41,5 Largo; 42; 42 Extralargo; 42 Médio; 42 Estreito; 42 Padrão; 42 Largo; 42,5; 42,5 Extralargo; 42,5 Médio; 42,5 Estreito; 42,5 Padrão; 42,5 Largo; 43; 43 Extralargo; 43 Médio; 43 Estreito; 43 Padrão; 43 Largo; 43,5; 43,5 Extralargo; 43,5 Médio; 43,5 Estreito; 43,5 Padrão; 43,5 Largo; 44; 44 Extralargo; 44 Médio; 44 Estreito; 44 Padrão; 44 Largo; 44,5; 44,5 Extralargo; 44,5 Médio; 44,5 Estreito; 44,5 Padrão; 44,5 Largo; 45; 45 Extralargo; 45 Médio; 45 Estreito; 45 Padrão; 45 Largo; 45,5; 45,5 Extralargo; 45,5 Médio; 45,5 Estreito; 45,5 Padrão; 45,5 Largo; 46; 46 Extralargo; 46 Médio; 46 Estreito; 46 Padrão; 46 Largo; 46,5; 46,5 Extralargo; 46,5 Médio; 46,5 Estreito; 46,5 Padrão; 46,5 Largo; 47; 47 Extralargo; 47 Médio; 47 Estreito; 47 Padrão; 47 Largo; 47,5; 47,5 Extralargo; 47,5 Médio; 47,5 Estreito; 47,5 Padrão; 47,5 Largo; 48; 48 Extralargo; 48 Médio; 48 Estreito; 48 Padrão; 48 Largo; 48,5; 48,5 Extralargo; 48,5 Médio; 48,5 Estreito; 48,5 Padrão; 48,5 Largo; 49; 49 Extralargo; 49 Médio; 49 Estreito; 49 Padrão; 49 Largo; 49,5; 49,5 Extralargo; 49,5 Médio; 49,5 Estreito; 49,5 Padrão; 49,5 Largo; 50; 50 Extralargo; 50 Médio; 50 Estreito; 50 Padrão; 50 Largo; 50,5; 50,5 Extralargo; 50,5 Médio; 50,5 Estreito; 50,5 Padrão; 50,5 Largo; 51; 51 Extralargo; 51 Médio; 51 Estreito; 51 Padrão; 51 Largo; 51,5; 51,5 Extralargo; 51,5 Médio; 51,5 Estreito; 51,5 Padrão; 51,5 Largo; 52; 52 Extralargo; 52 Médio; 52 Estreito; 52 Padrão; 52 Largo; Outro
ko: EU 신발 사이즈: 15; 15 엑스트라 와이드; 15 미디엄; 15 내로우; 15 스탠다드; 15 와이드; 15.5; 15.5 엑스트라 와이드; 15.5 미디엄; 15.5 내로우; 15.5 스탠다드; 15.5 와이드; 16; 16 엑스트라 와이드; 16 미디엄; 16 내로우; 16 스탠다드; 16 와이드; 16.5; 16.5 엑스트라 와이드; 16.5 미디엄; 16.5 내로우; 16.5 스탠다드; 16.5 와이드; 17; 17 엑스트라 와이드; 17 미디엄; 17 내로우; 17 스탠다드; 17 와이드; 17.5; 17.5 엑스트라 와이드; 17.5 미디엄; 17.5 내로우; 17.5 스탠다드; 17.5 와이드; 18; 18 엑스트라 와이드; 18 미디엄; 18 내로우; 18 스탠다드; 18 와이드; 18.5; 18.5 엑스트라 와이드; 18.5 미디엄; 18.5 내로우; 18.5 스탠다드; 18.5 와이드; 19; 19 엑스트라 와이드; 19 미디엄; 19 내로우; 19 스탠다드; 19 와이드; 19.5; 19.5 엑스트라 와이드; 19.5 미디엄; 19.5 내로우; 19.5 스탠다드; 19.5 와이드; 20; 20 엑스트라 와이드; 20 미디엄; 20 내로우; 20 스탠다드; 20 와이드; 20.5; 20.5 엑스트라 와이드; 20.5 미디엄; 20.5 내로우; 20.5 스탠다드; 20.5 와이드; 21; 21 엑스트라 와이드; 21 미디엄; 21 내로우; 21 스탠다드; 21 와이드; 21.5; 21.5 엑스트라 와이드; 21.5 미디엄; 21.5 내로우; 21.5 스탠다드; 21.5 와이드; 22; 22 엑스트라 와이드; 22 미디엄; 22 내로우; 22 스탠다드; 22 와이드; 22.5; 22.5 엑스트라 와이드; 22.5 미디엄; 22.5 내로우; 22.5 스탠다드; 22.5 와이드; 23; 23 엑스트라 와이드; 23 미디엄; 23 내로우; 23 스탠다드; 23 와이드; 23.5; 23.5 엑스트라 와이드; 23.5 미디엄; 23.5 내로우; 23.5 스탠다드; 23.5 와이드; 24; 24 엑스트라 와이드; 24 미디엄; 24 내로우; 24 스탠다드; 24 와이드; 24.5; 24.5 엑스트라 와이드; 24.5 미디엄; 24.5 내로우; 24.5 스탠다드; 24.5 와이드; 25; 25 엑스트라 와이드; 25 미디엄; 25 내로우; 25 스탠다드; 25 와이드; 25.5; 25.5 엑스트라 와이드; 25.5 미디엄; 25.5 내로우; 25.5 스탠다드; 25.5 와이드; 26; 26 엑스트라 와이드; 26 미디엄; 26 내로우; 26 스탠다드; 26 와이드; 26.5; 26.5 엑스트라 와이드; 26.5 미디엄; 26.5 내로우; 26.5 스탠다드; 26.5 와이드; 27; 27 엑스트라 와이드; 27 미디엄; 27 내로우; 27 스탠다드; 27 와이드; 27.5; 27.5 엑스트라 와이드; 27.5 미디엄; 27.5 내로우; 27.5 스탠다드; 27.5 와이드; 28; 28 엑스트라 와이드; 28 미디엄; 28 내로우; 28 스탠다드; 28 와이드; 28.5; 28.5 엑스트라 와이드; 28.5 미디엄; 28.5 내로우; 28.5 스탠다드; 28.5 와이드; 29; 29 엑스트라 와이드; 29 미디엄; 29 내로우; 29 스탠다드; 29 와이드; 29.5; 29.5 엑스트라 와이드; 29.5 미디엄; 29.5 내로우; 29.5 스탠다드; 29.5 와이드; 30; 30 엑스트라 와이드; 30 미디엄; 30 내로우; 30 스탠다드; 30 와이드; 30.5; 30.5 엑스트라 와이드; 30.5 미디엄; 30.5 내로우; 30.5 스탠다드; 30.5 와이드; 31; 31 엑스트라 와이드; 31 미디엄; 31 내로우; 31 스탠다드; 31 와이드; 31.5; 31.5 엑스트라 와이드; 31.5 미디엄; 31.5 내로우; 31.5 스탠다드; 31.5 와이드; 32; 32 엑스트라 와이드; 32 미디엄; 32 내로우; 32 스탠다드; 32 와이드; 32.5; 32.5 엑스트라 와이드; 32.5 미디엄; 32.5 내로우; 32.5 스탠다드; 32.5 와이드; 33; 33 엑스트라 와이드; 33 미디엄; 33 내로우; 33 스탠다드; 33 와이드; 33.5; 33.5 엑스트라 와이드; 33.5 미디엄; 33.5 내로우; 33.5 스탠다드; 33.5 와이드; 34; 34 엑스트라 와이드; 34 미디엄; 34 내로우; 34 스탠다드; 34 와이드; 34.5; 34.5 엑스트라 와이드; 34.5 미디엄; 34.5 내로우; 34.5 스탠다드; 34.5 와이드; 35; 35 엑스트라 와이드; 35 미디엄; 35 내로우; 35 스탠다드; 35 와이드; 35.5; 35.5 엑스트라 와이드; 35.5 미디엄; 35.5 내로우; 35.5 스탠다드; 35.5 와이드; 36; 36 엑스트라 와이드; 36 미디엄; 36 내로우; 36 스탠다드; 36 와이드; 36.5; 36.5 엑스트라 와이드; 36.5 미디엄; 36.5 내로우; 36.5 스탠다드; 36.5 와이드; 37; 37 엑스트라 와이드; 37 미디엄; 37 내로우; 37 스탠다드; 37 와이드; 37.5; 37.5 엑스트라 와이드; 37.5 미디엄; 37.5 내로우; 37.5 스탠다드; 37.5 와이드; 38; 38 엑스트라 와이드; 38 미디엄; 38 내로우; 38 스탠다드; 38 와이드; 38.5; 38.5 엑스트라 와이드; 38.5 미디엄; 38.5 내로우; 38.5 스탠다드; 38.5 와이드; 39; 39 엑스트라 와이드; 39 미디엄; 39 내로우; 39 스탠다드; 39 와이드; 39.5; 39.5 엑스트라 와이드; 39.5 미디엄; 39.5 내로우; 39.5 스탠다드; 39.5 와이드; 40; 40 엑스트라 와이드; 40 미디엄; 40 내로우; 40 스탠다드; 40 와이드; 40.5; 40.5 엑스트라 와이드; 40.5 미디엄; 40.5 내로우; 40.5 스탠다드; 40.5 와이드; 41; 41 엑스트라 와이드; 41 미디엄; 41 내로우; 41 스탠다드; 41 와이드; 41.5; 41.5 엑스트라 와이드; 41.5 미디엄; 41.5 내로우; 41.5 스탠다드; 41.5 와이드; 42; 42 엑스트라 와이드; 42 미디엄; 42 내로우; 42 스탠다드; 42 와이드; 42.5; 42.5 엑스트라 와이드; 42.5 미디엄; 42.5 내로우; 42.5 스탠다드; 42.5 와이드; 43; 43 엑스트라 와이드; 43 미디엄; 43 내로우; 43 스탠다드; 43 와이드; 43.5; 43.5 엑스트라 와이드; 43.5 미디엄; 43.5 내로우; 43.5 스탠다드; 43.5 와이드; 44; 44 엑스트라 와이드; 44 미디엄; 44 내로우; 44 스탠다드; 44 와이드; 44.5; 44.5 엑스트라 와이드; 44.5 미디엄; 44.5 내로우; 44.5 스탠다드; 44.5 와이드; 45; 45 엑스트라 와이드; 45 미디엄; 45 내로우; 45 스탠다드; 45 와이드; 45.5; 45.5 엑스트라 와이드; 45.5 미디엄; 45.5 내로우; 45.5 스탠다드; 45.5 와이드; 46; 46 엑스트라 와이드; 46 미디엄; 46 내로우; 46 스탠다드; 46 와이드; 46.5; 46.5 엑스트라 와이드; 46.5 미디엄; 46.5 내로우; 46.5 스탠다드; 46.5 와이드; 47; 47 엑스트라 와이드; 47 미디엄; 47 내로우; 47 스탠다드; 47 와이드; 47.5; 47.5 엑스트라 와이드; 47.5 미디엄; 47.5 내로우; 47.5 스탠다드; 47.5 와이드; 48; 48 엑스트라 와이드; 48 미디엄; 48 내로우; 48 스탠다드; 48 와이드; 48.5; 48.5 엑스트라 와이드; 48.5 미디엄; 48.5 내로우; 48.5 스탠다드; 48.5 와이드; 49; 49 엑스트라 와이드; 49 미디엄; 49 내로우; 49 스탠다드; 49 와이드; 49.5; 49.5 엑스트라 와이드; 49.5 미디엄; 49.5 내로우; 49.5 스탠다드; 49.5 와이드; 50; 50 엑스트라 와이드; 50 미디엄; 50 내로우; 50 스탠다드; 50 와이드; 50.5; 50.5 엑스트라 와이드; 50.5 미디엄; 50.5 내로우; 50.5 스탠다드; 50.5 와이드; 51; 51 엑스트라 와이드; 51 미디엄; 51 내로우; 51 스탠다드; 51 와이드; 51.5; 51.5 엑스트라 와이드; 51.5 미디엄; 51.5 내로우; 51.5 스탠다드; 51.5 와이드; 52; 52 엑스트라 와이드; 52 미디엄; 52 내로우; 52 스탠다드; 52 와이드; 기타
lt-LT: ES batų dydis: 15; 15 itin platus; 15 vidutinis; 15 siauras; 15 standartinis; 15 platus; 15,5; 15,5 itin platus; 15,5 vidutinis; 15,5 siauras; 15,5 standartinis; 15,5 platus; 16; 16 itin platus; 16 vidutinis; 16 siauras; 16 standartinis; 16 platus; 16,5; 16,5 itin platus; 16,5 vidutinis; 16,5 siauras; 16,5 standartinis; 16,5 platus; 17; 17 itin platus; 17 vidutinis; 17 siauras; 17 standartinis; 17 platus; 17,5; 17,5 itin platus; 17,5 vidutinis; 17,5 siauras; 17,5 standartinis; 17,5 platus; 18; 18 itin platus; 18 vidutinis; 18 siauras; 18 standartinis; 18 platus; 18,5; 18,5 itin platus; 18,5 vidutinis; 18,5 siauras; 18,5 standartinis; 18,5 platus; 19; 19 itin platus; 19 vidutinis; 19 siauras; 19 standartinis; 19 platus; 19,5; 19,5 itin platus; 19,5 vidutinis; 19,5 siauras; 19,5 standartinis; 19,5 platus; 20; 20 itin platus; 20 vidutinis; 20 siauras; 20 standartinis; 20 platus; 20,5; 20,5 itin platus; 20,5 vidutinis; 20,5 siauras; 20,5 standartinis; 20,5 platus; 21; 21 itin platus; 21 vidutinis; 21 siauras; 21 standartinis; 21 platus; 21,5; 21,5 itin platus; 21,5 vidutinis; 21,5 siauras; 21,5 standartinis; 21,5 platus; 22; 22 itin platus; 22 vidutinis; 22 siauras; 22 standartinis; 22 platus; 22,5; 22,5 itin platus; 22,5 vidutinis; 22,5 siauras; 22,5 standartinis; 22,5 platus; 23; 23 itin platus; 23 vidutinis; 23 siauras; 23 standartinis; 23 platus; 23,5; 23,5 itin platus; 23,5 vidutinis; 23,5 siauras; 23,5 standartinis; 23,5 platus; 24; 24 itin platus; 24 vidutinis; 24 siauras; 24 standartinis; 24 platus; 24,5; 24,5 itin platus; 24,5 vidutinis; 24,5 siauras; 24,5 standartinis; 24,5 platus; 25; 25 itin platus; 25 vidutinis; 25 siauras; 25 standartinis; 25 platus; 25,5; 25,5 itin platus; 25,5 vidutinis; 25,5 siauras; 25,5 standartinis; 25,5 platus; 26; 26 itin platus; 26 vidutinis; 26 siauras; 26 standartinis; 26 platus; 26,5; 26,5 itin platus; 26,5 vidutinis; 26,5 siauras; 26,5 standartinis; 26,5 platus; 27; 27 itin platus; 27 vidutinis; 27 siauras; 27 standartinis; 27 platus; 27,5; 27,5 itin platus; 27,5 vidutinis; 27,5 siauras; 27,5 standartinis; 27,5 platus; 28; 28 itin platus; 28 vidutinis; 28 siauras; 28 standartinis; 28 platus; 28,5; 28,5 itin platus; 28,5 vidutinis; 28,5 siauras; 28,5 standartinis; 28,5 platus; 29; 29 itin platus; 29 vidutinis; 29 siauras; 29 standartinis; 29 platus; 29,5; 29,5 itin platus; 29,5 vidutinis; 29,5 siauras; 29,5 standartinis; 29,5 platus; 30; 30 itin platus; 30 vidutinis; 30 siauras; 30 standartinis; 30 platus; 30,5; 30,5 itin platus; 30,5 vidutinis; 30,5 siauras; 30,5 standartinis; 30,5 platus; 31; 31 itin platus; 31 vidutinis; 31 siauras; 31 standartinis; 31 platus; 31,5; 31,5 itin platus; 31,5 vidutinis; 31,5 siauras; 31,5 standartinis; 31,5 platus; 32; 32 itin platus; 32 vidutinis; 32 siauras; 32 standartinis; 32 platus; 32,5; 32,5 itin platus; 32,5 vidutinis; 32,5 siauras; 32,5 standartinis; 32,5 platus; 33; 33 itin platus; 33 vidutinis; 33 siauras; 33 standartinis; 33 platus; 33,5; 33,5 itin platus; 33,5 vidutinis; 33,5 siauras; 33,5 standartinis; 33,5 platus; 34; 34 itin platus; 34 vidutinis; 34 siauras; 34 standartinis; 34 platus; 34,5; 34,5 itin platus; 34,5 vidutinis; 34,5 siauras; 34,5 standartinis; 34,5 platus; 35; 35 itin platus; 35 vidutinis; 35 siauras; 35 standartinis; 35 platus; 35,5; 35,5 itin platus; 35,5 vidutinis; 35,5 siauras; 35,5 standartinis; 35,5 platus; 36; 36 itin platus; 36 vidutinis; 36 siauras; 36 standartinis; 36 platus; 36,5; 36,5 itin platus; 36,5 vidutinis; 36,5 siauras; 36,5 standartinis; 36,5 platus; 37; 37 itin platus; 37 vidutinis; 37 siauras; 37 standartinis; 37 platus; 37,5; 37,5 itin platus; 37,5 vidutinis; 37,5 siauras; 37,5 standartinis; 37,5 platus; 38; 38 itin platus; 38 vidutinis; 38 siauras; 38 standartinis; 38 platus; 38,5; 38,5 itin platus; 38,5 vidutinis; 38,5 siauras; 38,5 standartinis; 38,5 platus; 39; 39 ypač platus; 39 vidutinis; 39 siauras; 39 standartinis; 39 platus; 39,5; 39,5 ypač platus; 39,5 vidutinis; 39,5 siauras; 39,5 standartinis; 39,5 platus; 40; 40 ypač platus; 40 vidutinis; 40 siauras; 40 standartinis; 40 platus; 40,5; 40,5 ypač platus; 40,5 vidutinis; 40,5 siauras; 40,5 standartinis; 40,5 platus; 41; 41 ypač platus; 41 vidutinis; 41 siauras; 41 standartinis; 41 platus; 41,5; 41,5 ypač platus; 41,5 vidutinis; 41,5 siauras; 41,5 standartinis; 41,5 platus; 42; 42 ypač platus; 42 vidutinis; 42 siauras; 42 standartinis; 42 platus; 42,5; 42,5 ypač platus; 42,5 vidutinis; 42,5 siauras; 42,5 standartinis; 42,5 platus; 43; 43 ypač platus; 43 vidutinis; 43 siauras; 43 standartinis; 43 platus; 43,5; 43,5 ypač platus; 43,5 vidutinis; 43,5 siauras; 43,5 standartinis; 43,5 platus; 44; 44 ypač platus; 44 vidutinis; 44 siauras; 44 standartinis; 44 platus; 44,5; 44,5 ypač platus; 44,5 vidutinis; 44,5 siauras; 44,5 standartinis; 44,5 platus; 45; 45 ypač platus; 45 vidutinis; 45 siauras; 45 standartinis; 45 platus; 45,5; 45,5 ypač platus; 45,5 vidutinis; 45,5 siauras; 45,5 standartinis; 45,5 platus; 46; 46 ypač platus; 46 vidutinis; 46 siauras; 46 standartinis; 46 platus; 46,5; 46,5 ypač platus; 46,5 vidutinis; 46,5 siauras; 46,5 standartinis; 46,5 platus; 47; 47 ypač platus; 47 vidutinis; 47 siauras; 47 standartinis; 47 platus; 47,5; 47,5 ypač platus; 47,5 vidutinis; 47,5 siauras; 47,5 standartinis; 47,5 platus; 48; 48 ypač platus; 48 vidutinis; 48 siauras; 48 standartinis; 48 platus; 48,5; 48,5 ypač platus; 48,5 vidutinis; 48,5 siauras; 48,5 standartinis; 48,5 platus; 49; 49 ypač platus; 49 vidutinis; 49 siauras; 49 standartinis; 49 platus; 49,5; 49,5 ypač platus; 49,5 vidutinis; 49,5 siauras; 49,5 standartinis; 49,5 platus; 50; 50 ypač platus; 50 vidutinis; 50 siauras; 50 standartinis; 50 platus; 50,5; 50,5 ypač platus; 50,5 vidutinis; 50,5 siauras; 50,5 standartinis; 50,5 platus; 51; 51 ypač platus; 51 vidutinis; 51 siauras; 51 standartinis; 51 platus; 51,5; 51,5 ypač platus; 51,5 vidutinis; 51,5 siauras; 51,5 standartinis; 51,5 platus; 52; 52 ypač platus; 52 vidutinis; 52 siauras; 52 standartinis; 52 platus; Kita
ru: Европейский размер обуви: 15; 15 очень широкий; 15 средний; 15 узкий; 15 стандартный; 15 широкий; 15,5; 15,5 очень широкий; 15,5 средний; 15,5 узкий; 15,5 стандартный; 15,5 широкий; 16; 16 очень широкий; 16 средний; 16 узкий; 16 стандартный; 16 широкий; 16,5; 16,5 очень широкий; 16,5 средний; 16,5 узкий; 16,5 стандартный; 16,5 широкий; 17; 17 очень широкий; 17 средний; 17 узкий; 17 стандартный; 17 широкий; 17,5; 17,5 очень широкий; 17,5 средний; 17,5 узкий; 17,5 стандартный; 17,5 широкий; 18; 18 очень широкий; 18 средний; 18 узкий; 18 стандартный; 18 широкий; 18,5; 18,5 очень широкий; 18,5 средний; 18,5 узкий; 18,5 стандартный; 18,5 широкий; 19; 19 очень широкий; 19 средний; 19 узкий; 19 стандартный; 19 широкий; 19,5; 19,5 очень широкий; 19,5 средний; 19,5 узкий; 19,5 стандартный; 19,5 широкий; 20; 20 очень широкий; 20 средний; 20 узкий; 20 стандартный; 20 широкий; 20,5; 20,5 очень широкий; 20,5 средний; 20,5 узкий; 20,5 стандартный; 20,5 широкий; 21; 21 очень широкий; 21 средний; 21 узкий; 21 стандартный; 21 широкий; 21,5; 21,5 очень широкий; 21,5 средний; 21,5 узкий; 21,5 стандартный; 21,5 широкий; 22; 22 очень широкий; 22 средний; 22 узкий; 22 стандартный; 22 широкий; 22,5; 22,5 очень широкий; 22,5 средний; 22,5 узкий; 22,5 стандартный; 22,5 широкий; 23; 23 очень широкий; 23 средний; 23 узкий; 23 стандартный; 23 широкий; 23,5; 23,5 очень широкий; 23,5 средний; 23,5 узкий; 23,5 стандартный; 23,5 широкий; 24; 24 очень широкий; 24 средний; 24 узкий; 24 стандартный; 24 широкий; 24,5; 24,5 очень широкий; 24,5 средний; 24,5 узкий; 24,5 стандартный; 24,5 широкий; 25; 25 очень широкий; 25 средний; 25 узкий; 25 стандартный; 25 широкий; 25,5; 25,5 очень широкий; 25,5 средний; 25,5 узкий; 25,5 стандартный; 25,5 широкий; 26; 26 очень широкий; 26 средний; 26 узкий; 26 стандартный; 26 широкий; 26,5; 26,5 очень широкий; 26,5 средний; 26,5 узкий; 26,5 стандартный; 26,5 широкий; 27; 27 очень широкий; 27 средний; 27 узкий; 27 стандартный; 27 широкий; 27,5; 27,5 очень широкий; 27,5 средний; 27,5 узкий; 27,5 стандартный; 27,5 широкий; 28; 28 очень широкий; 28 средний; 28 узкий; 28 стандартный; 28 широкий; 28,5; 28,5 очень широкий; 28,5 средний; 28,5 узкий; 28,5 стандартный; 28,5 широкий; 29; 29 очень широкий; 29 средний; 29 узкий; 29 стандартный; 29 широкий; 29,5; 29,5 очень широкий; 29,5 средний; 29,5 узкий; 29,5 стандартный; 29,5 широкий; 30; 30 очень широкий; 30 средний; 30 узкий; 30 стандартный; 30 широкий; 30,5; 30,5 очень широкий; 30,5 средний; 30,5 узкий; 30,5 стандартный; 30,5 широкий; 31; 31 очень широкий; 31 средний; 31 узкий; 31 стандартный; 31 широкий; 31,5; 31,5 очень широкий; 31,5 средний; 31,5 узкий; 31,5 стандартный; 31,5 широкий; 32; 32 очень широкий; 32 средний; 32 узкий; 32 стандартный; 32 широкий; 32,5; 32,5 очень широкий; 32,5 средний; 32,5 узкий; 32,5 стандартный; 32,5 широкий; 33; 33 очень широкий; 33 средний; 33 узкий; 33 стандартный; 33 широкий; 33,5; 33,5 очень широкий; 33,5 средний; 33,5 узкий; 33,5 стандартный; 33,5 широкий; 34; 34 очень широкий; 34 средний; 34 узкий; 34 стандартный; 34 широкий; 34,5; 34,5 очень широкий; 34,5 средний; 34,5 узкий; 34,5 стандартный; 34,5 широкий; 35; 35 очень широкий; 35 средний; 35 узкий; 35 стандартный; 35 широкий; 35,5; 35,5 очень широкий; 35,5 средний; 35,5 узкий; 35,5 стандартный; 35,5 широкий; 36; 36 очень широкий; 36 средний; 36 узкий; 36 стандартный; 36 широкий; 36,5; 36,5 очень широкий; 36,5 средний; 36,5 узкий; 36,5 стандартный; 36,5 широкий; 37; 37 очень широкий; 37 средний; 37 узкий; 37 стандартный; 37 широкий; 37,5; 37,5 очень широкий; 37,5 средний; 37,5 узкий; 37,5 стандартный; 37,5 широкий; 38; 38 очень широкий; 38 средний; 38 узкий; 38 стандартный; 38 широкий; 38,5; 38,5 очень широкий; 38,5 средний; 38,5 узкий; 38,5 стандартный; 38,5 широкий; 39; 39 очень широкий; 39 средний; 39 узкий; 39 стандартный; 39 широкий; 39,5; 39,5 очень широкий; 39,5 средний; 39,5 узкий; 39,5 стандартный; 39,5 широкий; 40; 40 очень широкий; 40 средний; 40 узкий; 40 стандартный; 40 широкий; 40,5; 40,5 очень широкий; 40,5 средний; 40,5 узкий; 40,5 стандартный; 40,5 широкий; 41; 41 очень широкий; 41 средний; 41 узкий; 41 стандартный; 41 широкий; 41,5; 41,5 очень широкий; 41,5 средний; 41,5 узкий; 41,5 стандартный; 41,5 широкий; 42; 42 очень широкий; 42 средний; 42 узкий; 42 стандартный; 42 широкий; 42,5; 42,5 очень широкий; 42,5 средний; 42,5 узкий; 42,5 стандартный; 42,5 широкий; 43; 43 очень широкий; 43 средний; 43 узкий; 43 стандартный; 43 широкий; 43,5; 43,5 очень широкий; 43,5 средний; 43,5 узкий; 43,5 стандартный; 43,5 широкий; 44; 44 очень широкий; 44 средний; 44 узкий; 44 стандартный; 44 широкий; 44,5; 44,5 очень широкий; 44,5 средний; 44,5 узкий; 44,5 стандартный; 44,5 широкий; 45; 45 очень широкий; 45 средний; 45 узкий; 45 стандартный; 45 широкий; 45,5; 45,5 очень широкий; 45,5 средний; 45,5 узкий; 45,5 стандартный; 45,5 широкий; 46; 46 очень широкий; 46 средний; 46 узкий; 46 стандартный; 46 широкий; 46,5; 46,5 очень широкий; 46,5 средний; 46,5 узкий; 46,5 стандартный; 46,5 широкий; 47; 47 очень широкий; 47 средний; 47 узкий; 47 стандартный; 47 широкий; 47,5; 47,5 очень широкий; 47,5 средний; 47,5 узкий; 47,5 стандартный; 47,5 широкий; 48; 48 очень широкий; 48 средний; 48 узкий; 48 стандартный; 48 широкий; 48,5; 48,5 очень широкий; 48,5 средний; 48,5 узкий; 48,5 стандартный; 48,5 широкий; 49; 49 очень широкий; 49 средний; 49 узкий; 49 стандартный; 49 широкий; 49,5; 49,5 очень широкий; 49,5 средний; 49,5 узкий; 49,5 стандартный; 49,5 широкий; 50; 50 очень широкий; 50 средний; 50 узкий; 50 стандартный; 50 широкий; 50,5; 50,5 очень широкий; 50,5 средний; 50,5 узкий; 50,5 стандартный; 50,5 широкий; 51; 51 очень широкий; 51 средний; 51 узкий; 51 стандартный; 51 широкий; 51,5; 51,5 очень широкий; 51,5 средний; 51,5 узкий; 51,5 стандартный; 51,5 широкий; 52; 52 очень широкий; 52 средний; 52 узкий; 52 стандартный; 52 широкий; Другое
el: Μέγεθος υποδημάτων ΕΕ: 15; 15 Πολύ φαρδύ; 15 Μεσαίο; 15 Στενό; 15 Κανονικό; 15 Φαρδύ; 15,5; 15,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 15,5 Μεσαίο; 15,5 Στενό; 15,5 Κανονικό; 15,5 Φαρδύ; 16; 16 Πολύ φαρδύ; 16 Μεσαίο; 16 Στενό; 16 Κανονικό; 16 Φαρδύ; 16,5; 16,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 16,5 Μεσαίο; 16,5 Στενό; 16,5 Κανονικό; 16,5 Φαρδύ; 17; 17 Πολύ φαρδύ; 17 Μεσαίο; 17 Στενό; 17 Κανονικό; 17 Φαρδύ; 17,5; 17,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 17,5 Μεσαίο; 17,5 Στενό; 17,5 Κανονικό; 17,5 Φαρδύ; 18; 18 Πολύ φαρδύ; 18 Μεσαίο; 18 Στενό; 18 Κανονικό; 18 Φαρδύ; 18,5; 18,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 18,5 Μεσαίο; 18,5 Στενό; 18,5 Κανονικό; 18,5 Φαρδύ; 19; 19 Πολύ φαρδύ; 19 Μεσαίο; 19 Στενό; 19 Κανονικό; 19 Φαρδύ; 19,5; 19,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 19,5 Μεσαίο; 19,5 Στενό; 19,5 Κανονικό; 19,5 Φαρδύ; 20; 20 Πολύ φαρδύ; 20 Μεσαίο; 20 Στενό; 20 Κανονικό; 20 Φαρδύ; 20,5; 20,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 20,5 Μεσαίο; 20,5 Στενό; 20,5 Κανονικό; 20,5 Φαρδύ; 21; 21 Πολύ φαρδύ; 21 Μεσαίο; 21 Στενό; 21 Κανονικό; 21 Φαρδύ; 21,5; 21,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 21,5 Μεσαίο; 21,5 Στενό; 21,5 Κανονικό; 21,5 Φαρδύ; 22; 22 Πολύ φαρδύ; 22 Μεσαίο; 22 Στενό; 22 Κανονικό; 22 Φαρδύ; 22,5; 22,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 22,5 Μεσαίο; 22,5 Στενό; 22,5 Κανονικό; 22,5 Φαρδύ; 23; 23 Πολύ φαρδύ; 23 Μεσαίο; 23 Στενό; 23 Κανονικό; 23 Φαρδύ; 23,5; 23,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 23,5 Μεσαίο; 23,5 Στενό; 23,5 Κανονικό; 23,5 Φαρδύ; 24; 24 Πολύ φαρδύ; 24 Μεσαίο; 24 Στενό; 24 Κανονικό; 24 Φαρδύ; 24,5; 24,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 24,5 Μεσαίο; 24,5 Στενό; 24,5 Κανονικό; 24,5 Φαρδύ; 25; 25 Πολύ φαρδύ; 25 Μεσαίο; 25 Στενό; 25 Κανονικό; 25 Φαρδύ; 25,5; 25,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 25,5 Μεσαίο; 25,5 Στενό; 25,5 Κανονικό; 25,5 Φαρδύ; 26; 26 Πολύ φαρδύ; 26 Μεσαίο; 26 Στενό; 26 Κανονικό; 26 Φαρδύ; 26,5; 26,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 26,5 Μεσαίο; 26,5 Στενό; 26,5 Κανονικό; 26,5 Φαρδύ; 27; 27 Πολύ φαρδύ; 27 Μεσαίο; 27 Στενό; 27 Κανονικό; 27 Φαρδύ; 27,5; 27,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 27,5 Μεσαίο; 27,5 Στενό; 27,5 Κανονικό; 27,5 Φαρδύ; 28; 28 Πολύ φαρδύ; 28 Μεσαίο; 28 Στενό; 28 Κανονικό; 28 Φαρδύ; 28,5; 28,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 28,5 Μεσαίο; 28,5 Στενό; 28,5 Κανονικό; 28,5 Φαρδύ; 29; 29 Πολύ φαρδύ; 29 Μεσαίο; 29 Στενό; 29 Κανονικό; 29 Φαρδύ; 29,5; 29,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 29,5 Μεσαίο; 29,5 Στενό; 29,5 Κανονικό; 29,5 Φαρδύ; 30; 30 Πολύ φαρδύ; 30 Μεσαίο; 30 Στενό; 30 Κανονικό; 30 Φαρδύ; 30,5; 30,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 30,5 Μεσαίο; 30,5 Στενό; 30,5 Κανονικό; 30,5 Φαρδύ; 31; 31 Πολύ φαρδύ; 31 Μεσαίο; 31 Στενό; 31 Κανονικό; 31 Φαρδύ; 31,5; 31,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 31,5 Μεσαίο; 31,5 Στενό; 31,5 Κανονικό; 31,5 Φαρδύ; 32; 32 Πολύ φαρδύ; 32 Μεσαίο; 32 Στενό; 32 Κανονικό; 32 Φαρδύ; 32,5; 32,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 32,5 Μεσαίο; 32,5 Στενό; 32,5 Κανονικό; 32,5 Φαρδύ; 33; 33 Πολύ φαρδύ; 33 Μεσαίο; 33 Στενό; 33 Κανονικό; 33 Φαρδύ; 33,5; 33,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 33,5 Μεσαίο; 33,5 Στενό; 33,5 Κανονικό; 33,5 Φαρδύ; 34; 34 Πολύ φαρδύ; 34 Μεσαίο; 34 Στενό; 34 Κανονικό; 34 Φαρδύ; 34,5; 34,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 34,5 Μεσαίο; 34,5 Στενό; 34,5 Κανονικό; 34,5 Φαρδύ; 35; 35 Πολύ φαρδύ; 35 Μεσαίο; 35 Στενό; 35 Κανονικό; 35 Φαρδύ; 35,5; 35,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 35,5 Μεσαίο; 35,5 Στενό; 35,5 Κανονικό; 35,5 Φαρδύ; 36; 36 Πολύ φαρδύ; 36 Μεσαίο; 36 Στενό; 36 Κανονικό; 36 Φαρδύ; 36,5; 36,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 36,5 Μεσαίο; 36,5 Στενό; 36,5 Κανονικό; 36,5 Φαρδύ; 37; 37 Πολύ φαρδύ; 37 Μεσαίο; 37 Στενό; 37 Κανονικό; 37 Φαρδύ; 37,5; 37,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 37,5 Μεσαίο; 37,5 Στενό; 37,5 Κανονικό; 37,5 Φαρδύ; 38; 38 Πολύ φαρδύ; 38 Μεσαίο; 38 Στενό; 38 Κανονικό; 38 Φαρδύ; 38,5; 38,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 38,5 Μεσαίο; 38,5 Στενό; 38,5 Κανονικό; 38,5 Φαρδύ; 39; 39 Πολύ φαρδύ; 39 Μεσαίο; 39 Στενό; 39 Κανονικό; 39 Φαρδύ; 39,5; 39,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 39,5 Μεσαίο; 39,5 Στενό; 39,5 Κανονικό; 39,5 Φαρδύ; 40; 40 Πολύ φαρδύ; 40 Μεσαίο; 40 Στενό; 40 Κανονικό; 40 Φαρδύ; 40,5; 40,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 40,5 Μεσαίο; 40,5 Στενό; 40,5 Κανονικό; 40,5 Φαρδύ; 41; 41 Πολύ φαρδύ; 41 Μεσαίο; 41 Στενό; 41 Κανονικό; 41 Φαρδύ; 41,5; 41,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 41,5 Μεσαίο; 41,5 Στενό; 41,5 Κανονικό; 41,5 Φαρδύ; 42; 42 Πολύ φαρδύ; 42 Μεσαίο; 42 Στενό; 42 Κανονικό; 42 Φαρδύ; 42,5; 42,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 42,5 Μεσαίο; 42,5 Στενό; 42,5 Κανονικό; 42,5 Φαρδύ; 43; 43 Πολύ φαρδύ; 43 Μεσαίο; 43 Στενό; 43 Κανονικό; 43 Φαρδύ; 43,5; 43,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 43,5 Μεσαίο; 43,5 Στενό; 43,5 Κανονικό; 43,5 Φαρδύ; 44; 44 Πολύ φαρδύ; 44 Μεσαίο; 44 Στενό; 44 Κανονικό; 44 Φαρδύ; 44,5; 44,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 44,5 Μεσαίο; 44,5 Στενό; 44,5 Κανονικό; 44,5 Φαρδύ; 45; 45 Πολύ φαρδύ; 45 Μεσαίο; 45 Στενό; 45 Κανονικό; 45 Φαρδύ; 45,5; 45,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 45,5 Μεσαίο; 45,5 Στενό; 45,5 Κανονικό; 45,5 Φαρδύ; 46; 46 Πολύ φαρδύ; 46 Μεσαίο; 46 Στενό; 46 Κανονικό; 46 Φαρδύ; 46,5; 46,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 46,5 Μεσαίο; 46,5 Στενό; 46,5 Κανονικό; 46,5 Φαρδύ; 47; 47 Πολύ φαρδύ; 47 Μεσαίο; 47 Στενό; 47 Κανονικό; 47 Φαρδύ; 47,5; 47,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 47,5 Μεσαίο; 47,5 Στενό; 47,5 Κανονικό; 47,5 Φαρδύ; 48; 48 Πολύ φαρδύ; 48 Μεσαίο; 48 Στενό; 48 Κανονικό; 48 Φαρδύ; 48,5; 48,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 48,5 Μεσαίο; 48,5 Στενό; 48,5 Κανονικό; 48,5 Φαρδύ; 49; 49 Πολύ φαρδύ; 49 Μεσαίο; 49 Στενό; 49 Κανονικό; 49 Φαρδύ; 49,5; 49,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 49,5 Μεσαίο; 49,5 Στενό; 49,5 Κανονικό; 49,5 Φαρδύ; 50; 50 Πολύ φαρδύ; 50 Μεσαίο; 50 Στενό; 50 Κανονικό; 50 Φαρδύ; 50,5; 50,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 50,5 Μεσαίο; 50,5 Στενό; 50,5 Κανονικό; 50,5 Φαρδύ; 51; 51 Πολύ φαρδύ; 51 Μεσαίο; 51 Στενό; 51 Κανονικό; 51 Φαρδύ; 51,5; 51,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 51,5 Μεσαίο; 51,5 Στενό; 51,5 Κανονικό; 51,5 Φαρδύ; 52; 52 Πολύ φαρδύ; 52 Μεσαίο; 52 Στενό; 52 Κανονικό; 52 Φαρδύ; Άλλο
ja: EU靴の寸法: 15; 15 エクストラワイド; 15 ミディアム; 15 ナロー; 15 スタンダード; 15 ワイド; 15.5; 15.5 エクストラワイド; 15.5 ミディアム; 15.5 ナロー; 15.5 スタンダード; 15.5 ワイド; 16; 16 エクストラワイド; 16 ミディアム; 16 ナロー; 16 スタンダード; 16 ワイド; 16.5; 16.5 エクストラワイド; 16.5 ミディアム; 16.5 ナロー; 16.5 スタンダード; 16.5 ワイド; 17; 17 エクストラワイド; 17 ミディアム; 17 ナロー; 17 スタンダード; 17 ワイド; 17.5; 17.5 エクストラワイド; 17.5 ミディアム; 17.5 ナロー; 17.5 スタンダード; 17.5 ワイド; 18; 18 エクストラワイド; 18 ミディアム; 18 ナロー; 18 スタンダード; 18 ワイド; 18.5; 18.5 エクストラワイド; 18.5 ミディアム; 18.5 ナロー; 18.5 スタンダード; 18.5 ワイド; 19; 19 エクストラワイド; 19 ミディアム; 19 ナロー; 19 スタンダード; 19 ワイド; 19.5; 19.5 エクストラワイド; 19.5 ミディアム; 19.5 ナロー; 19.5 スタンダード; 19.5 ワイド; 20; 20 エクストラワイド; 20 ミディアム; 20 ナロー; 20 スタンダード; 20 ワイド; 20.5; 20.5 エクストラワイド; 20.5 ミディアム; 20.5 ナロー; 20.5 スタンダード; 20.5 ワイド; 21; 21 エクストラワイド; 21 ミディアム; 21 ナロー; 21 スタンダード; 21 ワイド; 21.5; 21.5 エクストラワイド; 21.5 ミディアム; 21.5 ナロー; 21.5 スタンダード; 21.5 ワイド; 22; 22 エクストラワイド; 22 ミディアム; 22 ナロー; 22 スタンダード; 22 ワイド; 22.5; 22.5 エクストラワイド; 22.5 ミディアム; 22.5 ナロー; 22.5 スタンダード; 22.5 ワイド; 23; 23 エクストラワイド; 23 ミディアム; 23 ナロー; 23 スタンダード; 23 ワイド; 23.5; 23.5 エクストラワイド; 23.5 ミディアム; 23.5 ナロー; 23.5 スタンダード; 23.5 ワイド; 24; 24 エクストラワイド; 24 ミディアム; 24 ナロー; 24 スタンダード; 24 ワイド; 24.5; 24.5 エクストラワイド; 24.5 ミディアム; 24.5 ナロー; 24.5 スタンダード; 24.5 ワイド; 25; 25 エクストラワイド; 25 ミディアム; 25 ナロー; 25 スタンダード; 25 ワイド; 25.5; 25.5 エクストラワイド; 25.5 ミディアム; 25.5 ナロー; 25.5 スタンダード; 25.5 ワイド; 26; 26 エクストラワイド; 26 ミディアム; 26 ナロー; 26 スタンダード; 26 ワイド; 26.5; 26.5 エクストラワイド; 26.5 ミディアム; 26.5 ナロー; 26.5 スタンダード; 26.5 ワイド; 27; 27 エクストラワイド; 27 ミディアム; 27 ナロー; 27 スタンダード; 27 ワイド; 27.5; 27.5 エクストラワイド; 27.5 ミディアム; 27.5 ナロー; 27.5 スタンダード; 27.5 ワイド; 28; 28 エクストラワイド; 28 ミディアム; 28 ナロー; 28 スタンダード; 28 ワイド; 28.5; 28.5 エクストラワイド; 28.5 ミディアム; 28.5 ナロー; 28.5 スタンダード; 28.5 ワイド; 29; 29 エクストラワイド; 29 ミディアム; 29 ナロー; 29 スタンダード; 29 ワイド; 29.5; 29.5 エクストラワイド; 29.5 ミディアム; 29.5 ナロー; 29.5 スタンダード; 29.5 ワイド; 30; 30 エクストラワイド; 30 ミディアム; 30 ナロー; 30 スタンダード; 30 ワイド; 30.5; 30.5 エクストラワイド; 30.5 ミディアム; 30.5 ナロー; 30.5 スタンダード; 30.5 ワイド; 31; 31 エクストラワイド; 31 ミディアム; 31 ナロー; 31 スタンダード; 31 ワイド; 31.5; 31.5 エクストラワイド; 31.5 ミディアム; 31.5 ナロー; 31.5 スタンダード; 31.5 ワイド; 32; 32 エクストラワイド; 32 ミディアム; 32 ナロー; 32 スタンダード; 32 ワイド; 32.5; 32.5 エクストラワイド; 32.5 ミディアム; 32.5 ナロー; 32.5 スタンダード; 32.5 ワイド; 33; 33 エクストラワイド; 33 ミディアム; 33 ナロー; 33 スタンダード; 33 ワイド; 33.5; 33.5 エクストラワイド; 33.5 ミディアム; 33.5 ナロー; 33.5 スタンダード; 33.5 ワイド; 34; 34 エクストラワイド; 34 ミディアム; 34 ナロー; 34 スタンダード; 34 ワイド; 34.5; 34.5 エクストラワイド; 34.5 ミディアム; 34.5 ナロー; 34.5 スタンダード; 34.5 ワイド; 35; 35 エクストラワイド; 35 ミディアム; 35 ナロー; 35 スタンダード; 35 ワイド; 35.5; 35.5 エクストラワイド; 35.5 ミディアム; 35.5 ナロー; 35.5 スタンダード; 35.5 ワイド; 36; 36 エクストラワイド; 36 ミディアム; 36 ナロー; 36 スタンダード; 36 ワイド; 36.5; 36.5 エクストラワイド; 36.5 ミディアム; 36.5 ナロー; 36.5 スタンダード; 36.5 ワイド; 37; 37 エクストラワイド; 37 ミディアム; 37 ナロー; 37 スタンダード; 37 ワイド; 37.5; 37.5 エクストラワイド; 37.5 ミディアム; 37.5 ナロー; 37.5 スタンダード; 37.5 ワイド; 38; 38 エクストラワイド; 38 ミディアム; 38 ナロー; 38 スタンダード; 38 ワイド; 38.5; 38.5 エクストラワイド; 38.5 ミディアム; 38.5 ナロー; 38.5 スタンダード; 38.5 ワイド; 39; 39 エクストラワイド; 39 ミディアム; 39 ナロー; 39 スタンダード; 39 ワイド; 39.5; 39.5 エクストラワイド; 39.5 ミディアム; 39.5 ナロー; 39.5 スタンダード; 39.5 ワイド; 40; 40 エクストラワイド; 40 ミディアム; 40 ナロー; 40 スタンダード; 40 ワイド; 40.5; 40.5 エクストラワイド; 40.5 ミディアム; 40.5 ナロー; 40.5 スタンダード; 40.5 ワイド; 41; 41 エクストラワイド; 41 ミディアム; 41 ナロー; 41 スタンダード; 41 ワイド; 41.5; 41.5 エクストラワイド; 41.5 ミディアム; 41.5 ナロー; 41.5 スタンダード; 41.5 ワイド; 42; 42 エクストラワイド; 42 ミディアム; 42 ナロー; 42 スタンダード; 42 ワイド; 42.5; 42.5 エクストラワイド; 42.5 ミディアム; 42.5 ナロー; 42.5 スタンダード; 42.5 ワイド; 43; 43 エクストラワイド; 43 ミディアム; 43 ナロー; 43 スタンダード; 43 ワイド; 43.5; 43.5 エクストラワイド; 43.5 ミディアム; 43.5 ナロー; 43.5 スタンダード; 43.5 ワイド; 44; 44 エクストラワイド; 44 ミディアム; 44 ナロー; 44 スタンダード; 44 ワイド; 44.5; 44.5 エクストラワイド; 44.5 ミディアム; 44.5 ナロー; 44.5 スタンダード; 44.5 ワイド; 45; 45 エクストラワイド; 45 ミディアム; 45 ナロー; 45 スタンダード; 45 ワイド; 45.5; 45.5 エクストラワイド; 45.5 ミディアム; 45.5 ナロー; 45.5 スタンダード; 45.5 ワイド; 46; 46 エクストラワイド; 46 ミディアム; 46 ナロー; 46 スタンダード; 46 ワイド; 46.5; 46.5 エクストラワイド; 46.5 ミディアム; 46.5 ナロー; 46.5 スタンダード; 46.5 ワイド; 47; 47 エクストラワイド; 47 ミディアム; 47 ナロー; 47 スタンダード; 47 ワイド; 47.5; 47.5 エクストラワイド; 47.5 ミディアム; 47.5 ナロー; 47.5 スタンダード; 47.5 ワイド; 48; 48 エクストラワイド; 48 ミディアム; 48 ナロー; 48 スタンダード; 48 ワイド; 48.5; 48.5 エクストラワイド; 48.5 ミディアム; 48.5 ナロー; 48.5 スタンダード; 48.5 ワイド; 49; 49 エクストラワイド; 49 ミディアム; 49 ナロー; 49 スタンダード; 49 ワイド; 49.5; 49.5 エクストラワイド; 49.5 ミディアム; 49.5 ナロー; 49.5 スタンダード; 49.5 ワイド; 50; 50 エクストラワイド; 50 ミディアム; 50 ナロー; 50 スタンダード; 50 ワイド; 50.5; 50.5 エクストラワイド; 50.5 ミディアム; 50.5 ナロー; 50.5 スタンダード; 50.5 ワイド; 51; 51 エクストラワイド; 51 ミディアム; 51 ナロー; 51 スタンダード; 51 ワイド; 51.5; 51.5 エクストラワイド; 51.5 ミディアム; 51.5 ナロー; 51.5 スタンダード; 51.5 ワイド; 52; 52 エクストラワイド; 52 ミディアム; 52 ナロー; 52 スタンダード; 52 ワイド; その他
fi: EU-kengännumero: 15; 15 erittäin leveä; 15 normaali; 15 kapea; 15 vakio; 15 leveä; 15,5; 15,5 erittäin leveä; 15,5 normaali; 15,5 kapea; 15,5 vakio; 15,5 leveä; 16; 16 erittäin leveä; 16 normaali; 16 kapea; 16 vakio; 16 leveä; 16,5; 16,5 erittäin leveä; 16,5 normaali; 16,5 kapea; 16,5 vakio; 16,5 leveä; 17; 17 erittäin leveä; 17 normaali; 17 kapea; 17 vakio; 17 leveä; 17,5; 17,5 erittäin leveä; 17,5 normaali; 17,5 kapea; 17,5 vakio; 17,5 leveä; 18; 18 erittäin leveä; 18 normaali; 18 kapea; 18 vakio; 18 leveä; 18,5; 18,5 erittäin leveä; 18,5 normaali; 18,5 kapea; 18,5 vakio; 18,5 leveä; 19; 19 erittäin leveä; 19 normaali; 19 kapea; 19 vakio; 19 leveä; 19,5; 19,5 erittäin leveä; 19,5 normaali; 19,5 kapea; 19,5 vakio; 19,5 leveä; 20; 20 erittäin leveä; 20 normaali; 20 kapea; 20 vakio; 20 leveä; 20,5; 20,5 erittäin leveä; 20,5 normaali; 20,5 kapea; 20,5 vakio; 20,5 leveä; 21; 21 erikoisleveä; 21 keskileveä; 21 kapea; 21 vakio; 21 leveä; 21,5; 21,5 erittäin leveä; 21,5 normaali; 21,5 kapea; 21,5 vakio; 21,5 leveä; 22; 22 erikoisleveä; 22 keskileveä; 22 kapea; 22 vakio; 22 leveä; 22,5; 22,5 erikoisleveä; 22,5 keskileveä; 22,5 kapea; 22,5 vakio; 22,5 leveä; 23; 23 erikoisleveä; 23 keskileveä; 23 kapea; 23 vakio; 23 leveä; 23,5; 23,5 erikoisleveä; 23,5 keskileveä; 23,5 kapea; 23,5 vakio; 23,5 leveä; 24; 24 erikoisleveä; 24 keskileveä; 24 kapea; 24 vakio; 24 leveä; 24,5; 24,5 erikoisleveä; 24,5 keskileveä; 24,5 kapea; 24,5 vakio; 24,5 leveä; 25; 25 erikoisleveä; 25 keskileveä; 25 kapea; 25 vakio; 25 leveä; 25,5; 25,5 erikoisleveä; 25,5 keskileveä; 25,5 kapea; 25,5 vakio; 25,5 leveä; 26; 26 erikoisleveä; 26 keskileveä; 26 kapea; 26 vakio; 26 leveä; 26,5; 26,5 erikoisleveä; 26,5 keskileveä; 26,5 kapea; 26,5 vakio; 26,5 leveä; 27; 27 erikoisleveä; 27 keskileveä; 27 kapea; 27 vakio; 27 leveä; 27,5; 27,5 erikoisleveä; 27,5 keskileveä; 27,5 kapea; 27,5 vakio; 27,5 leveä; 28; 28 erikoisleveä; 28 keskileveä; 28 kapea; 28 vakio; 28 leveä; 28,5; 28,5 erikoisleveä; 28,5 keskileveä; 28,5 kapea; 28,5 vakio; 28,5 leveä; 29; 29 erikoisleveä; 29 keskileveä; 29 kapea; 29 vakio; 29 leveä; 29,5; 29,5 erikoisleveä; 29,5 keskileveä; 29,5 kapea; 29,5 vakio; 29,5 leveä; 30; 30 erikoisleveä; 30 keskileveä; 30 kapea; 30 vakio; 30 leveä; 30,5; 30,5 erikoisleveä; 30,5 keskileveä; 30,5 kapea; 30,5 vakio; 30,5 leveä; 31; 31 erikoisleveä; 31 keskileveä; 31 kapea; 31 vakio; 31 leveä; 31,5; 31,5 erikoisleveä; 31,5 keskileveä; 31,5 kapea; 31,5 vakio; 31,5 leveä; 32; 32 erikoisleveä; 32 keskileveä; 32 kapea; 32 vakio; 32 leveä; 32,5; 32,5 erikoisleveä; 32,5 keskileveä; 32,5 kapea; 32,5 vakio; 32,5 leveä; 33; 33 erikoisleveä; 33 keskileveä; 33 kapea; 33 vakio; 33 leveä; 33,5; 33,5 erikoisleveä; 33,5 keskileveä; 33,5 kapea; 33,5 vakio; 33,5 leveä; 34; 34 erikoisleveä; 34 keskileveä; 34 kapea; 34 vakio; 34 leveä; 34,5; 34,5 erikoisleveä; 34,5 keskileveä; 34,5 kapea; 34,5 vakio; 34,5 leveä; 35; 35 erikoisleveä; 35 keskileveä; 35 kapea; 35 vakio; 35 leveä; 35,5; 35,5 erikoisleveä; 35,5 keskileveä; 35,5 kapea; 35,5 vakio; 35,5 leveä; 36; 36 erikoisleveä; 36 keskileveä; 36 kapea; 36 vakio; 36 leveä; 36,5; 36,5 erikoisleveä; 36,5 keskileveä; 36,5 kapea; 36,5 vakio; 36,5 leveä; 37; 37 erikoisleveä; 37 keskileveä; 37 kapea; 37 vakio; 37 leveä; 37,5; 37,5 erikoisleveä; 37,5 keskileveä; 37,5 kapea; 37,5 vakio; 37,5 leveä; 38; 38 erikoisleveä; 38 keskileveä; 38 kapea; 38 vakio; 38 leveä; 38,5; 38,5 erikoisleveä; 38,5 keskileveä; 38,5 kapea; 38,5 vakio; 38,5 leveä; 39; 39 erikoisleveä; 39 keskileveä; 39 kapea; 39 vakio; 39 leveä; 39,5; 39,5 erikoisleveä; 39,5 keskileveä; 39,5 kapea; 39,5 vakio; 39,5 leveä; 40; 40 erikoisleveä; 40 keskileveä; 40 kapea; 40 vakio; 40 leveä; 40,5; 40,5 erikoisleveä; 40,5 keskileveä; 40,5 kapea; 40,5 vakio; 40,5 leveä; 41; 41 erikoisleveä; 41 keskileveä; 41 kapea; 41 vakio; 41 leveä; 41,5; 41,5 erikoisleveä; 41,5 keskileveä; 41,5 kapea; 41,5 vakio; 41,5 leveä; 42; 42 erikoisleveä; 42 keskileveä; 42 kapea; 42 vakio; 42 leveä; 42,5; 42,5 erikoisleveä; 42,5 keskileveä; 42,5 kapea; 42,5 vakio; 42,5 leveä; 43; 43 erikoisleveä; 43 keskileveä; 43 kapea; 43 vakio; 43 leveä; 43,5; 43,5 erikoisleveä; 43,5 keskileveä; 43,5 kapea; 43,5 vakio; 43,5 leveä; 44; 44 erikoisleveä; 44 keskileveä; 44 kapea; 44 vakio; 44 leveä; 44,5; 44,5 erikoisleveä; 44,5 keskileveä; 44,5 kapea; 44,5 vakio; 44,5 leveä; 45; 45 erikoisleveä; 45 keskileveä; 45 kapea; 45 vakio; 45 leveä; 45,5; 45,5 erikoisleveä; 45,5 keskileveä; 45,5 kapea; 45,5 vakio; 45,5 leveä; 46; 46 erikoisleveä; 46 keskileveä; 46 kapea; 46 vakio; 46 leveä; 46,5; 46,5 erikoisleveä; 46,5 keskileveä; 46,5 kapea; 46,5 vakio; 46,5 leveä; 47; 47 erikoisleveä; 47 keskileveä; 47 kapea; 47 vakio; 47 leveä; 47,5; 47,5 erikoisleveä; 47,5 keskileveä; 47,5 kapea; 47,5 vakio; 47,5 leveä; 48; 48 erikoisleveä; 48 keskileveä; 48 kapea; 48 vakio; 48 leveä; 48,5; 48,5 erikoisleveä; 48,5 keskileveä; 48,5 kapea; 48,5 vakio; 48,5 leveä; 49; 49 erikoisleveä; 49 keskileveä; 49 kapea; 49 vakio; 49 leveä; 49,5; 49,5 erikoisleveä; 49,5 keskileveä; 49,5 kapea; 49,5 vakio; 49,5 leveä; 50; 50 erikoisleveä; 50 keskileveä; 50 kapea; 50 vakio; 50 leveä; 50,5; 50,5 erikoisleveä; 50,5 keskileveä; 50,5 kapea; 50,5 vakio; 50,5 leveä; 51; 51 erikoisleveä; 51 keskileveä; 51 kapea; 51 vakio; 51 leveä; 51,5; 51,5 erikoisleveä; 51,5 keskileveä; 51,5 kapea; 51,5 vakio; 51,5 leveä; 52; 52 erikoisleveä; 52 keskileveä; 52 kapea; 52 vakio; 52 leveä; Muu
es: Número de zapato de la UE: 15; 15 extra ancho; 15 medio; 15 estrecho; 15 estándar; 15 ancho; 15,5; 15,5 extra ancho; 15,5 medio; 15,5 estrecho; 15,5 estándar; 15,5 ancho; 16; 16 extra ancho; 16 medio; 16 estrecho; 16 estándar; 16 ancho; 16,5; 16,5 extra ancho; 16,5 medio; 16,5 estrecho; 16,5 estándar; 16,5 ancho; 17; 17 extra ancho; 17 medio; 17 estrecho; 17 estándar; 17 ancho; 17,5; 17,5 extra ancho; 17,5 medio; 17,5 estrecho; 17,5 estándar; 17,5 ancho; 18; 18 extra ancho; 18 medio; 18 estrecho; 18 estándar; 18 ancho; 18,5; 18,5 extra ancho; 18,5 medio; 18,5 estrecho; 18,5 estándar; 18,5 ancho; 19; 19 extra ancho; 19 medio; 19 estrecho; 19 estándar; 19 ancho; 19,5; 19,5 extra ancho; 19,5 medio; 19,5 estrecho; 19,5 estándar; 19,5 ancho; 20; 20 extra ancho; 20 medio; 20 estrecho; 20 estándar; 20 ancho; 20,5; 20,5 extra ancho; 20,5 medio; 20,5 estrecho; 20,5 estándar; 20,5 ancho; 21; 21 extra ancho; 21 medio; 21 estrecho; 21 estándar; 21 ancho; 21,5; 21,5 extra ancho; 21,5 medio; 21,5 estrecho; 21,5 estándar; 21,5 ancho; 22; 22 extra ancho; 22 medio; 22 estrecho; 22 estándar; 22 ancho; 22,5; 22,5 extra ancho; 22,5 medio; 22,5 estrecho; 22,5 estándar; 22,5 ancho; 23; 23 extra ancho; 23 medio; 23 estrecho; 23 estándar; 23 ancho; 23,5; 23,5 extra ancho; 23,5 medio; 23,5 estrecho; 23,5 estándar; 23,5 ancho; 24; 24 extra ancho; 24 medio; 24 estrecho; 24 estándar; 24 ancho; 24,5; 24,5 extra ancho; 24,5 medio; 24,5 estrecho; 24,5 estándar; 24,5 ancho; 25; 25 extra ancho; 25 medio; 25 estrecho; 25 estándar; 25 ancho; 25,5; 25,5 extra ancho; 25,5 medio; 25,5 estrecho; 25,5 estándar; 25,5 ancho; 26; 26 extra ancho; 26 medio; 26 estrecho; 26 estándar; 26 ancho; 26,5; 26,5 extra ancho; 26,5 medio; 26,5 estrecho; 26,5 estándar; 26,5 ancho; 27; 27 extra ancho; 27 medio; 27 estrecho; 27 estándar; 27 ancho; 27,5; 27,5 extra ancho; 27,5 medio; 27,5 estrecho; 27,5 estándar; 27,5 ancho; 28; 28 extra ancho; 28 medio; 28 estrecho; 28 estándar; 28 ancho; 28,5; 28,5 extra ancho; 28,5 medio; 28,5 estrecho; 28,5 estándar; 28,5 ancho; 29; 29 extra ancho; 29 medio; 29 estrecho; 29 estándar; 29 ancho; 29,5; 29,5 extra ancho; 29,5 medio; 29,5 estrecho; 29,5 estándar; 29,5 ancho; 30; 30 extra ancho; 30 medio; 30 estrecho; 30 estándar; 30 ancho; 30,5; 30,5 extra ancho; 30,5 medio; 30,5 estrecho; 30,5 estándar; 30,5 ancho; 31; 31 extra ancho; 31 medio; 31 estrecho; 31 estándar; 31 ancho; 31,5; 31,5 extra ancho; 31,5 medio; 31,5 estrecho; 31,5 estándar; 31,5 ancho; 32; 32 extra ancho; 32 medio; 32 estrecho; 32 estándar; 32 ancho; 32,5; 32,5 extra ancho; 32,5 medio; 32,5 estrecho; 32,5 estándar; 32,5 ancho; 33; 33 extra ancho; 33 medio; 33 estrecho; 33 estándar; 33 ancho; 33,5; 33,5 extra ancho; 33,5 medio; 33,5 estrecho; 33,5 estándar; 33,5 ancho; 34; 34 extra ancho; 34 medio; 34 estrecho; 34 estándar; 34 ancho; 34,5; 34,5 extra ancho; 34,5 medio; 34,5 estrecho; 34,5 estándar; 34,5 ancho; 35; 35 extra ancho; 35 medio; 35 estrecho; 35 estándar; 35 ancho; 35,5; 35,5 extra ancho; 35,5 medio; 35,5 estrecho; 35,5 estándar; 35,5 ancho; 36; 36 extra ancho; 36 medio; 36 estrecho; 36 estándar; 36 ancho; 36,5; 36,5 extra ancho; 36,5 medio; 36,5 estrecho; 36,5 estándar; 36,5 ancho; 37; 37 extra ancho; 37 medio; 37 estrecho; 37 estándar; 37 ancho; 37,5; 37,5 extra ancho; 37,5 medio; 37,5 estrecho; 37,5 estándar; 37,5 ancho; 38; 38 extra ancho; 38 medio; 38 estrecho; 38 estándar; 38 ancho; 38,5; 38,5 extra ancho; 38,5 medio; 38,5 estrecho; 38,5 estándar; 38,5 ancho; 39; 39 extra ancho; 39 medio; 39 estrecho; 39 estándar; 39 ancho; 39,5; 39,5 extra ancho; 39,5 medio; 39,5 estrecho; 39,5 estándar; 39,5 ancho; 40; 40 extra ancho; 40 medio; 40 estrecho; 40 estándar; 40 ancho; 40,5; 40,5 extra ancho; 40,5 medio; 40,5 estrecho; 40,5 estándar; 40,5 ancho; 41; 41 extra ancho; 41 medio; 41 estrecho; 41 estándar; 41 ancho; 41,5; 41,5 extra ancho; 41,5 medio; 41,5 estrecho; 41,5 estándar; 41,5 ancho; 42; 42 extra ancho; 42 medio; 42 estrecho; 42 estándar; 42 ancho; 42,5; 42,5 extra ancho; 42,5 medio; 42,5 estrecho; 42,5 estándar; 42,5 ancho; 43; 43 extra ancho; 43 medio; 43 estrecho; 43 estándar; 43 ancho; 43,5; 43,5 extra ancho; 43,5 medio; 43,5 estrecho; 43,5 estándar; 43,5 ancho; 44; 44 extra ancho; 44 medio; 44 estrecho; 44 estándar; 44 ancho; 44,5; 44,5 extra ancho; 44,5 medio; 44,5 estrecho; 44,5 estándar; 44,5 ancho; 45; 45 extra ancho; 45 medio; 45 estrecho; 45 estándar; 45 ancho; 45,5; 45,5 extra ancho; 45,5 medio; 45,5 estrecho; 45,5 estándar; 45,5 ancho; 46; 46 extra ancho; 46 medio; 46 estrecho; 46 estándar; 46 ancho; 46,5; 46,5 extra ancho; 46,5 medio; 46,5 estrecho; 46,5 estándar; 46,5 ancho; 47; 47 extra ancho; 47 medio; 47 estrecho; 47 estándar; 47 ancho; 47,5; 47,5 extra ancho; 47,5 medio; 47,5 estrecho; 47,5 estándar; 47,5 ancho; 48; 48 extra ancho; 48 medio; 48 estrecho; 48 estándar; 48 ancho; 48,5; 48,5 extra ancho; 48,5 medio; 48,5 estrecho; 48,5 estándar; 48,5 ancho; 49; 49 extra ancho; 49 medio; 49 estrecho; 49 estándar; 49 ancho; 49,5; 49,5 extra ancho; 49,5 medio; 49,5 estrecho; 49,5 estándar; 49,5 ancho; 50; 50 extra ancho; 50 medio; 50 estrecho; 50 estándar; 50 ancho; 50,5; 50,5 extra ancho; 50,5 medio; 50,5 estrecho; 50,5 estándar; 50,5 ancho; 51; 51 extra ancho; 51 medio; 51 estrecho; 51 estándar; 51 ancho; 51,5; 51,5 extra ancho; 51,5 medio; 51,5 estrecho; 51,5 estándar; 51,5 ancho; 52; 52 extra ancho; 52 medio; 52 estrecho; 52 estándar; 52 ancho; Otro
hu: EU-s cipőméret: 15; 15 extra széles; 15 normál; 15 keskeny; 15 normál; 15 széles; 15,5; 15,5 extra széles; 15,5 normál; 15,5 keskeny; 15,5 normál; 15,5 széles; 16; 16 extra széles; 16 normál; 16 keskeny; 16 normál; 16 széles; 16,5; 16,5 extra széles; 16,5 normál; 16,5 keskeny; 16,5 normál; 16,5 széles; 17; 17 extra széles; 17 normál; 17 keskeny; 17 normál; 17 széles; 17,5; 17,5 extra széles; 17,5 normál; 17,5 keskeny; 17,5 normál; 17,5 széles; 18; 18 extra széles; 18 normál; 18 keskeny; 18 normál; 18 széles; 18,5; 18,5 extra széles; 18,5 normál; 18,5 keskeny; 18,5 normál; 18,5 széles; 19; 19 extra széles; 19 normál; 19 keskeny; 19 normál; 19 széles; 19,5; 19,5 extra széles; 19,5 normál; 19,5 keskeny; 19,5 normál; 19,5 széles; 20; 20 extra széles; 20 normál; 20 keskeny; 20 normál; 20 széles; 20,5; 20,5 extra széles; 20,5 normál; 20,5 keskeny; 20,5 normál; 20,5 széles; 21; 21 extra széles; 21 közepes; 21 keskeny; 21 normál; 21 széles; 21,5; 21,5 extra széles; 21,5 normál; 21,5 keskeny; 21,5 normál; 21,5 széles; 22; 22 extra széles; 22 közepes; 22 keskeny; 22 normál; 22 széles; 22,5; 22,5 extra széles; 22,5 közepes; 22,5 keskeny; 22,5 normál; 22,5 széles; 23; 23 extra széles; 23 közepes; 23 keskeny; 23 normál; 23 széles; 23,5; 23,5 extra széles; 23,5 közepes; 23,5 keskeny; 23,5 normál; 23,5 széles; 24; 24 extra széles; 24 közepes; 24 keskeny; 24 normál; 24 széles; 24,5; 24,5 extra széles; 24,5 közepes; 24,5 keskeny; 24,5 normál; 24,5 széles; 25; 25 extra széles; 25 közepes; 25 keskeny; 25 normál; 25 széles; 25,5; 25,5 extra széles; 25,5 közepes; 25,5 keskeny; 25,5 normál; 25,5 széles; 26; 26 extra széles; 26 közepes; 26 keskeny; 26 normál; 26 széles; 26,5; 26,5 extra széles; 26,5 közepes; 26,5 keskeny; 26,5 normál; 26,5 széles; 27; 27 extra széles; 27 közepes; 27 keskeny; 27 normál; 27 széles; 27,5; 27,5 extra széles; 27,5 közepes; 27,5 keskeny; 27,5 normál; 27,5 széles; 28; 28 extra széles; 28 közepes; 28 keskeny; 28 normál; 28 széles; 28,5; 28,5 extra széles; 28,5 közepes; 28,5 keskeny; 28,5 normál; 28,5 széles; 29; 29 extra széles; 29 közepes; 29 keskeny; 29 normál; 29 széles; 29,5; 29,5 extra széles; 29,5 közepes; 29,5 keskeny; 29,5 normál; 29,5 széles; 30; 30 extra széles; 30 közepes; 30 keskeny; 30 normál; 30 széles; 30,5; 30,5 extra széles; 30,5 közepes; 30,5 keskeny; 30,5 normál; 30,5 széles; 31; 31 extra széles; 31 közepes; 31 keskeny; 31 normál; 31 széles; 31,5; 31,5 extra széles; 31,5 közepes; 31,5 keskeny; 31,5 normál; 31,5 széles; 32; 32 extra széles; 32 közepes; 32 keskeny; 32 normál; 32 széles; 32,5; 32,5 extra széles; 32,5 közepes; 32,5 keskeny; 32,5 normál; 32,5 széles; 33; 33 extra széles; 33 közepes; 33 keskeny; 33 normál; 33 széles; 33,5; 33,5 extra széles; 33,5 közepes; 33,5 keskeny; 33,5 normál; 33,5 széles; 34; 34 extra széles; 34 közepes; 34 keskeny; 34 normál; 34 széles; 34,5; 34,5 extra széles; 34,5 közepes; 34,5 keskeny; 34,5 normál; 34,5 széles; 35; 35 extra széles; 35 közepes; 35 keskeny; 35 normál; 35 széles; 35,5; 35,5 extra széles; 35,5 közepes; 35,5 keskeny; 35,5 normál; 35,5 széles; 36; 36 extra széles; 36 közepes; 36 keskeny; 36 normál; 36 széles; 36,5; 36,5 extra széles; 36,5 közepes; 36,5 keskeny; 36,5 normál; 36,5 széles; 37; 37 extra széles; 37 közepes; 37 keskeny; 37 normál; 37 széles; 37,5; 37,5 extra széles; 37,5 közepes; 37,5 keskeny; 37,5 normál; 37,5 széles; 38; 38 extra széles; 38 közepes; 38 keskeny; 38 normál; 38 széles; 38,5; 38,5 extra széles; 38,5 közepes; 38,5 keskeny; 38,5 normál; 38,5 széles; 39; 39 extra széles; 39 közepes; 39 keskeny; 39 normál; 39 széles; 39,5; 39,5 extra széles; 39,5 közepes; 39,5 keskeny; 39,5 normál; 39,5 széles; 40; 40 extra széles; 40 közepes; 40 keskeny; 40 normál; 40 széles; 40,5; 40,5 extra széles; 40,5 közepes; 40,5 keskeny; 40,5 normál; 40,5 széles; 41; 41 extra széles; 41 közepes; 41 keskeny; 41 normál; 41 széles; 41,5; 41,5 extra széles; 41,5 közepes; 41,5 keskeny; 41,5 normál; 41,5 széles; 42; 42 extra széles; 42 közepes; 42 keskeny; 42 normál; 42 széles; 42,5; 42,5 extra széles; 42,5 közepes; 42,5 keskeny; 42,5 normál; 42,5 széles; 43; 43 extra széles; 43 közepes; 43 keskeny; 43 normál; 43 széles; 43,5; 43,5 extra széles; 43,5 közepes; 43,5 keskeny; 43,5 normál; 43,5 széles; 44; 44 extra széles; 44 közepes; 44 keskeny; 44 normál; 44 széles; 44,5; 44,5 extra széles; 44,5 közepes; 44,5 keskeny; 44,5 normál; 44,5 széles; 45; 45 extra széles; 45 közepes; 45 keskeny; 45 normál; 45 széles; 45,5; 45,5 extra széles; 45,5 közepes; 45,5 keskeny; 45,5 normál; 45,5 széles; 46; 46 extra széles; 46 közepes; 46 keskeny; 46 normál; 46 széles; 46,5; 46,5 extra széles; 46,5 közepes; 46,5 keskeny; 46,5 normál; 46,5 széles; 47; 47 extra széles; 47 közepes; 47 keskeny; 47 normál; 47 széles; 47,5; 47,5 extra széles; 47,5 közepes; 47,5 keskeny; 47,5 normál; 47,5 széles; 48; 48 extra széles; 48 közepes; 48 keskeny; 48 normál; 48 széles; 48,5; 48,5 extra széles; 48,5 közepes; 48,5 keskeny; 48,5 normál; 48,5 széles; 49; 49 extra széles; 49 közepes; 49 keskeny; 49 normál; 49 széles; 49,5; 49,5 extra széles; 49,5 közepes; 49,5 keskeny; 49,5 normál; 49,5 széles; 50; 50 extra széles; 50 közepes; 50 keskeny; 50 normál; 50 széles; 50,5; 50,5 extra széles; 50,5 közepes; 50,5 keskeny; 50,5 normál; 50,5 széles; 51; 51 extra széles; 51 közepes; 51 keskeny; 51 normál; 51 széles; 51,5; 51,5 extra széles; 51,5 közepes; 51,5 keskeny; 51,5 normál; 51,5 széles; 52; 52 extra széles; 52 közepes; 52 keskeny; 52 normál; 52 széles; Egyéb